Health Topics,Links,Overview,Impacts,WHO Responses
Abortion,https://www.who.int/health-topics/abortion,"WHO defines health as a state of complete physical, mental and social well-being, and not merely the absence of disease or infirmity. Making health for all a reality, and moving towards the progressive realization of human rights, requires that all individuals have access to quality health care, including comprehensive abortion care services – which includes information, management of abortion, and post-abortion care. Lack of access to safe, timely, affordable and respectful abortion care poses a risk to not only the physical, but also the mental and social, well-being of women and girls.
Induced abortion is a simple and common health-care procedure. Each year, almost half of all pregnancies – 121 million – are unintended; 6 out of 10 unintended pregnancies and 3 out of 10 of all pregnancies end in induced abortion. Abortion is safe when carried out using a method recommended by WHO, appropriate to the pregnancy duration and by someone with the necessary skills. However, when women with unwanted pregnancies face barriers to obtaining quality abortion, they often resort to unsafe abortion.
Ensuring that women and girls have access to abortion care that is evidence-based – which includes being safe, respectful and non-discriminatory – is fundamental to meeting the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs) relating to good health and well-being (SDG3) and gender equality (SDG5).","Restricting access to abortion does not reduce the number of abortions; however, it dramatically affects whether abortions attained are safe.
Nearly half of all abortions are unsafe. Unsafe abortions
contribute to preventable maternal mortality and morbidity. Each year an
estimated 7 million women in developing countries are treated in hospital
facilities for complications from unsafe abortion.
Barriers to safe, timely, geographically reachable, affordable, respectful and non-discriminatory abortion care can cause emotional distress and violate women’s and girls’ right to privacy; right to equality and non-discrimination; and right to be free from torture, cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment and punishment. It also has financial and social implications for people and communities including negatively impacting women’s and girls’ possibilities to obtain education and full and effective participation in society.
Abortion regulations that force people to travel to attain legal care, or that require mandatory counselling or waiting periods, burden health systems and can result in women experiencing travel costs, loss of income or the need to resort to unsafe abortion.
A disproportionate share of resources is used for post-abortion care: in developing countries, treatments of complications of unsafe abortion cost health systems US$ 553 million per year, while households experience US$ 922 million in income loss due to disabilities.","Abortion can be safely and effectively performed in a range of settings and by a variety of people, including different types of health workers, and in early pregnancy by the woman herself.
Person-centred, equitable and accessible abortion care supports efficient use of resources and enables women to attain care in line with their values, preferences and circumstances. This is supported by well functioning health systems; availability and accessibility of information; and respect for human rights within a supportive framework of law and policy.
Ensuring that safe and dignified abortion care is attainable in practice by all who need it implies, among other things, that
enough health workers, of different types, provide abortion care within reach;
access to abortion care is enabled through a variety of delivery approaches, including self-management of abortion;
abortion care does not cause financial hardship to women;
laws and policies that cause barriers to quality abortion care (including criminalization of abortion, mandatory waiting periods and third-party authorization requirements) are removed;
health workers are trained to provide safe and respectful care, and to interpret laws and policies in a human rights-compliant way;
access to abortion is not negatively impacted by health workers refusing to provide care based on personal beliefs; and
people have access to accurate and non-biased information to prevent unintended pregnancies and make autonomous decisions about abortion."
Addictive behaviour,https://www.who.int/health-topics/addictive-behaviour,"Many people around the world are engaged in (video) gaming and gambling behaviours ,which are recognized as addictive behaviours, but usually do not result in any significant health consequences. However, a small proportion of people engaged in such behaviours may develop disorders due to addictive behaviours associated with functional impairment or distress.
Video gaming is highly prevalent in modern culture, particularly among young people, and a healthy hobby for most users. However, in recent years there has been increasing global recognition among public health professionals and academics that particular patterns of video gaming may lead to marked impairment in personal, family, social, educational, occupational or other important areas of functioning and psychological distress for a significant minority of players. People who partake in gaming should be alert to the amount of time they spend on gaming activities, particularly when it is to the exclusion of other daily activities, as well as to any changes in their physical or psychological health and social functioning that could be attributed to their pattern of gaming behaviour.
Gambling in many countries and jurisdictions is considered a form of entertainment, characterized by betting/wagering mechanics and monetization features. Like gaming, repetitive gambling behaviour can potentially lead to gambling disorder associated with distress or impairment.
In recent years, there has been an increasing convergence between gaming and gambling on various platforms, significantly aided by the Internet. This convergence may give rise to migration from games to gambling and co- occurrence of the two disorders.","Use of the Internet, computers, smartphones and other electronic devices has dramatically increased over recent decades, and this increase is associated not only with clear and tremendous benefits to the users and societies, but also with documented cases of excessive use which often has negative health consequences. Health concerns associated with gaming behaviour are not limited to gaming disorder, but also include other aspects of health such as insufficient physical activity, unhealthy diet, problems with eyesight or hearing, musculoskeletal problems, sleep deprivation, and associated health conditions such as depression and venous thromboembolism.
Prevalence estimates of gaming disorder vary considerably between countries and jurisdictions, largely due to the lack of a standardized assessment instrument, and prevalence of ""problem gaming"" which is a proxy measure for prevalence of “gaming disorder” varies in populations from 1.3 to 9.9%.
Past-year prevalence of “problem gambling” which is a proxy measure for prevalence of gambling disorder among adults varies between 0.1% and 5.8%.
Harms caused by the gambling are significant. For example, studies at a national level from Oceanian countries indicate that potential harms due to gambling are comparable to the harms due to depression and alcohol use disorders. Harms negatively impact the gamers/gamblers themselves as well as their families and community.
Further international research activities - particularly in the case of gaming disorder - are imperative in order to yield a comprehensive picture of past and current problems, generate prevalence estimates, inform prevention and treatment planning and to facilitate comparisons. Psychometrically sound instruments based on reliable diagnostic criteria must be developed for this purpose.","Disorders due to addictive behaviours are recognizable and clinically significant syndromes associated with distress or interference with personal functions that develop as a result of repetitive, rewarding behaviours other than the use of dependence-producing substances.
Gambling disorder has long been included in formal classification systems and epidemiological surveys, but Gaming disorder was introduced as a new condition in the 11th revision of the International Classification of Diseases (ICD-11) endorsed by the 72nd World Health Assembly (WHA72) in 2019.
Based on similarities in symptomatology, epidemiology and neurobiology, gaming disorder and gambling disorder are categorized as disorders due to addictive behaviors in ICD-11."
Adolescent health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/adolescent-health,"Adolescence is the phase of life between childhood and adulthood, from ages 10 to 19. It is a unique stage of human development and an important time for laying the foundations of good health.
Adolescents experience rapid physical, cognitive and psychosocial growth. This affects how they feel, think, make decisions, and interact with the world around them.
Despite being thought of as a healthy stage of life, there is significant death, illness and injury in the adolescent years. Much of this is preventable or treatable. During this phase, adolescents establish patterns of behaviour – for instance,
    related to diet, physical activity, substance use, and sexual activity – that can protect their health and the health of others around them, or put their health at risk now and in the future.
To grow and develop in good health, adolescents need information, including age-appropriate comprehensive sexuality education; opportunities to develop life skills; health services that are acceptable, equitable, appropriate and effective; and safe and
    supportive environments. They also need opportunities to meaningfully participate in the design and delivery of interventions to improve and maintain their health. Expanding such opportunities is key to responding to adolescents’ specific needs
    and rights.
Adolescents and youth and COVID-19
Resource bank for adolescent health","There are more adolescents in the world than ever before: 1.3 billion, totalling one sixth of the global population. This number is expected to rise through 2050, particularly in low- and middle-income countries where close to 90% of 10- to 19-year-olds
    live.
An estimated 1.1 million adolescents die each year. The leading causes are road traffic injuries, suicide and interpersonal violence. Millions of adolescents also experience illness and injury. Causes of mortality and morbidity among adolescents differ
    by sex and age, and also by geographic region.
For 10-14-year-olds, the leading risks for health are related to water, hygiene and sanitation. Risks for 15-19-year-olds are more often related to behaviours, such as alcohol use and unsafe sex. Poor diet and low physical activity are additional challenges
    which begin in childhood and adolescence, as does sexual abuse. Older adolescent girls are disproportionately affected by intimate partner violence. Pregnancy complications and unsafe abortions are the leading causes of death among 15-19-year-old
    girls.
Most adolescent mortality and morbidity is preventable or treatable, but adolescents face specific barriers in accessing health information and services. Restrictive laws and policies, parental or partner control, limited knowledge, distance, cost, lack
    of confidentiality, and provider bias can all restrict adolescents from getting the care they need to grow and develop in good health.","WHO supports countries to ensure that their national adolescent health responses are evidence-based and take account of the values and preferences of adolescents.
Improving the evidence base on adolescent health is crucial. WHO supports countries to improve measurement and  strengthen data, conducts research, and shares best practice.
WHO issues evidence-based recommendations that are relevant for – or specific to – adolescents across the full range of health areas including: positive development, communicable diseases, non-communicable diseases, sexual and reproductive health including HIV, unintentional injury, violence, and mental health, substance abuse and self-harm.
To support the implementation of these recommendations, WHO produces a range of policy and programme support tools. At the heart is the
Global Accelerated Action for the Health of Adolescents (AA-HA!)
, which guides national-level policy-makers and programme managers on how to plan, implement, monitor, and evaluate adolescent health programmes.
WHO also supports countries to scale up efforts in service delivery, financing and governance, helps to build the capacities of national-level researchers and programmers, and provides technical support for policy and programmes.
Adolescents need protection from harm on the one hand, and support to make independent decisions on the other. They have a key role to play in the response to their own health and wellbeing. WHO's 13th General Programme of Work recognizes this and is committed to working with adolescents as central partners to improve adolescent health."
Ageing,https://www.who.int/health-topics/ageing,"Every person – in every country in the world – should have the opportunity to live a long and healthy life. Yet, the environments in which we live can favour health or be harmful to it. Environments are highly influential on our behaviour and our exposure to health risks (for example, air pollution or violence), our access to services (for example, health and social care) and the opportunities that ageing brings.
The number and proportion of people aged 60 years and older in the population is increasing. In 2019, the number of people aged 60 years and older was 1 billion. This number will increase to 1.4 billion by 2030 and 2.1 billion by 2050. This increase is occurring at an unprecedented pace and will accelerate in coming decades, particularly in developing countries.
This historically significant change in the global population requires adaptations to the way societies are structured across all sectors. For example, health and social care, transportation, housing and urban planning. Working to make the world more age-friendly is an essential and urgent part of our changing demographics.
Older people and COVID-19","Ageing presents both challenges and opportunities. It will increase demand for primary health care and long-term care, require a larger and better trained workforce, intensify the need for physical and social environments to be made more age-friendly, and call for everyone in every sector to combat ageism. Yet, these investments can enable the many contributions of older people – whether it be within their family, to their local community (e.g., as volunteers or within the formal or informal workforce) or to society more broadly.
Societies that adapt to this changing demographic and invest in healthy ageing can enable individuals to live both longer and healthier lives and for societies to reap the dividends.","WHO works with Member States, UN agencies and diverse stakeholders from various sectors to foster healthy ageing in every country. Healthy ageing is defined as developing and maintaining the functional ability that enables well-being in older age. Functional ability is determined by the intrinsic capacity of an individual (i.e., an individual’s physical and mental capacities), the environment in which he or she lives (understood in the broadest sense and including physical, social and policy environments) and the interactions among them.
WHO does this work in line with the
Global strategy and action plan on ageing and health
2016–2020
and the related UN Decade of Healthy Ageing (2021–2030) in the following four action areas:
change how we think, feel and act towards age      and ageing;
ensure that communities foster the abilities      of older people;
deliver person-centred integrated care and      primary health services responsive to older people; and
provide access to long-term care for older      people who need it."
Ageism,https://www.who.int/health-topics/ageism,"Age is one of the first things we notice about other people. However, age is often used to categorize and divide people in ways that lead to harm, disadvantage and injustice and erode solidarity across generations. This is ageism: the stereotypes (how we think), prejudice (how we feel) and discrimination (how we act) towards others or ourselves based on age.
Ageism is pervasive, affects people of all ages from childhood onwards and has serious and far-reaching consequences for people’s health, well-being and human rights. Ageism can be found within institutions, in interactions between people and within ourselves. Globally, 1 in 2 people are ageist against older people and in Europe, younger people report more perceived ageism than other age groups.
Ageism remains largely invisible despite its wide reach and negative impact on individuals and society. However, it can be combated: policies and laws, educational activities and intergenerational interventions have all been proven to work to reduce ageism. To create a world for all ages, stakeholders across countries, sectors and disciplines must invest in these three strategies, support further research and data collection in this area and join the global movement to change negative narratives around age and ageing.","Ageism has far-reaching impacts on all aspects of our health and well-being when we are older:
It is associated with earlier death.
It is linked to poorer physical health,      affecting, among others, our ability to recover from disability and our      sexual and reproductive health.
It increases risky health behaviours (e.g.,      eating an unhealthy diet, smoking).
It is associated with poorer mental health,      including the onset of depression, increases in depressive symptoms over      time and lifetime depression.
It is associated with a lower quality of life      and contributes to social isolation and loneliness.
Ageism also takes a heavy economic toll on individuals and society and exacerbates other forms of disadvantage. More research is required to better understand both the impact that ageism has in earlier stages of life and cumulatively over the life-course.","WHO has been requested by its 194 Member States to work across sectors and stakeholder groups to establish a Global Campaign to Combat Ageism.
The Campaign envisions a world for all ages and aims to turn this vision into reality by changing how we all think, feel and act towards age and ageing. To do so, WHO works together with key partners to:
generate an evidence base on ageism to better      understand what ageism is, why it matters and how we can address it;
build a global coalition to coordinate efforts      to prevent and respond to ageism, improve data collection and enable      sharing of knowledge in this area of work; and
deliver and develop awareness raising events,      capacity building programmes and tools to enable others to spread the word      about ageism and challenge it when they encounter it."
Air pollution,https://www.who.int/health-topics/air-pollution,"Air pollution is contamination of the indoor or outdoor environment by any chemical, physical or biological agent that modifies the natural characteristics of the atmosphere.
Household combustion devices, motor vehicles, industrial facilities and forest fires are common sources of air pollution. Pollutants of major public health concern include particulate matter, carbon monoxide, ozone, nitrogen dioxide and sulfur dioxide. Outdoor and indoor air pollution cause respiratory and other diseases and are important sources of morbidity and mortality.
WHO data show that almost all of the global population (99%) breathe air that exceeds
WHO guideline limits
and contains high levels of
pollutants
, with low- and middle-income countries suffering from the highest exposures.
Air quality is closely linked to the earth’s climate and ecosystems globally. Many of the drivers of air pollution (i.e. combustion of fossil fuels) are also sources of greenhouse gas emissions. Policies to reduce air pollution, therefore, offer a win-win strategy for both climate and health, lowering the burden of disease attributable to air pollution, as well as contributing to the near- and long-term mitigation of climate change.","From smog hanging over cities to smoke inside the home, air pollution poses a major
threat to health
and climate.
Ambient (outdoor) air pollution in both cities and rural areas is causing fine particulate matter which result in strokes, heart diseases, lung cancer, acute and chronic respiratory diseases.
Additionally, around 2.4 billion people are exposed to dangerous levels of household air pollution, while using polluting open fires or simple stoves for cooking fuelled by kerosene, biomass (wood, animal dung and crop waste) and coal.
The combined effects of ambient air pollution and household air pollution is associated with 7 million premature deaths annually.
Sources of air pollution are multiple and context specific. The major outdoor pollution sources include residential energy for cooking and heating, vehicles, power generation, agriculture/waste incineration, and industry. Policies and investments that support sustainable land use, cleaner household energy and transport, energy-efficient housing, power generation, industry, and better municipal waste management can effectively reduce key sources of ambient air pollution.","WHO promotes interventions and initiatives for healthy sectoral policies (including energy, transport, housing, urban development and electrification of health-care facilities), addressing key risks to health from air pollution indoors and outdoors, and contributing to achieving health co-benefits from climate change mitigation policies.
WHO provides technical support to WHO’s Member States in the development of normative guidance, tools and provision of authoritative advice on health issues related to air pollution and its sources.
WHO monitors and reports on global trends and changes in health outcomes associated with actions taken to address air pollution at the national, regional and global levels.
WHO has also developed and implemented a strategy for raising awareness on the risk of air pollution, as well as available solutions that can be implemented to mitigate the risks of exposure to air pollution. Through digital outreach and partnerships, WHO has helped enrich the value proposition of addressing air pollution for health and environment ministries, city governments and other stakeholders from sectors with significant emissions."
Alcohol,https://www.who.int/health-topics/alcohol,"Alcohol is a toxic and psychoactive substance with dependence producing properties. In many of today’s societies, alcoholic beverages are a routine part of the social landscape for many in the population. This is particularly true for those in social environments with high visibility and societal influence, nationally and internationally, where alcohol frequently accompanies socializing. In this context, it is easy to overlook or discount the health and social damage caused or contributed to by drinking.
Alcohol consumption contributes to 2.6 million deaths each year globally as well as to the disabilities and poor health of millions of people. Overall, harmful use of alcohol is responsible for 4.7% of the global burden of disease.
Harmful use of alcohol is accountable for 6,9 % and 2.0% of the global burden of disease for males and females respectively. Alcohol is the leading risk factor for premature mortality and disability among those aged 20 to 39 years, accounting for 13% of all deaths in this age group. Disadvantaged and especially vulnerable populations have higher rates of alcohol-related death and hospitalization.","Alcohol as an intoxicant affects a wide range of structures and processes in the central nervous system and increases the risk for intentional and unintentional injuries and adverse social consequences. Alcohol has considerable toxic effects on the digestive and cardiovascular systems. Alcoholic beverages are classified as carcinogenic by the International Agency for Research on Cancer and increase the risk of several cancer types. Alcohol as an immunosuppressant increases the risk of communicable diseases, including tuberculosis and HIV.
Both the volume of lifetime alcohol use and a combination of context, frequency of alcohol consumption and amount consumed per occasion increase the risk of the wide range of health and social harms. The risks increase largely in a dose-dependent manner with the volume of alcohol consumed and with frequency of drinking, and exponentially with the amount consumed on a single occasion. Surrogate and illegally produced alcohols can bring an extra health risk from toxic contaminants.
Since any alcohol use is associated with some short-term and long-term health risks, it is difficult to define universally applicable population-based thresholds for low-risk drinking.","WHO works with Member States and partners to prevent and reduce the harmful use of alcohol as a public health priority. The
2010 WHO Global strategy to reduce the harmful use of alcohol
and the
2022 WHO Global action plan
are the most comprehensive international alcohol policy documents, endorsed by WHO Member States, that provides guidance on reducing the harmful use of alcohol at all levels. WHO’s approach aligns with and furthers work towards the UN Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs), specifically target 3.5 on substance abuse, including harmful use of alcohol, and target 3.4 on the prevention and control of noncommunicable diseases (NCDs) and promoting mental health and well-being.
WHO has identified that the most cost-effective actions to reduce the harmful use of alcohol include increasing taxes on alcoholic beverages, enforcing restrictions on exposure to alcohol advertising, and restrictions on the physical availability of retailed alcohol. In addition, enforcing drink driving countermeasures and securing access to screening, brief interventions, and treatment are effective and ethically sound interventions. The most cost-effective interventions are at the focus of WHO-led SAFER initiative aimed at providing support for Member States in reducing the harmful use of alcohol.
WHO’s work provides special attention to reducing harm to people other than the drinker and to populations that are at particular risk from harmful use of alcohol, such as children, adolescents, women of child-bearing age, pregnant and breastfeeding women, indigenous people and other minority groups or groups with low socioeconomic status."
Anaemia,https://www.who.int/health-topics/anaemia,"Anaemia is a condition in which the number of red blood cells or the haemoglobin concentration within them is lower than normal. Haemoglobin is needed to carry oxygen and if you have too few or abnormal red blood cells, or not enough haemoglobin, there will be a decreased capacity of the blood to carry oxygen to the body’s tissues. This results in symptoms such as fatigue, weakness, dizziness and shortness of breath, among others. The optimal haemoglobin concentration required to meet physiologic needs varies by age, sex, elevation of residence, smoking habits and pregnancy status.  Anaemia may be caused by several factors: nutrient deficiencies through inadequate diets or inadequate absorption of nutrients, infections (e.g. malaria, parasitic infections, tuberculosis, HIV), inflammation, chronic diseases, gynaecological and obstetric conditions, and inherited red blood cell disorders. The most common nutritional cause of anaemia is iron deficiency, although deficiencies in folate, vitamins B12 and A are also important causes.
Anaemia is a serious global public health problem that particularly affects young children, menstruating adolescent girls and women, and pregnant and postpartum women. WHO estimates that 40% of children 6–59 months of age, 37% of pregnant women, and 30% of women 15–49 years of age worldwide are anaemic.","Anaemia can cause a range of non-specific symptoms including tiredness, weakness, dizziness or light-headedness, drowsiness, and shortness of breath, especially upon exertion. Children and pregnant women are especially vulnerable, with more severe cases of anaemia leading to an increased risk of maternal and child mortality. Iron deficiency anaemia has also been shown to affect cognitive and physical development in children and reduce productivity in adults.
Anaemia is an indicator of both poor nutrition and poor health. It is problematic on its own, but it can also impact other global public health concerns such as stunting and wasting, low birth weight and childhood overweight and obesity due to lack of energy to exercise. School performance in children and reduced work productivity in adults due to anaemia can have further social and economic impacts for the individual and family.","Accurate characterization of anaemia is critical to understand the burden and epidemiology of this problem, for planning public health interventions, and for clinical care of people across the life course. While iron deficiency anaemia is the most common form and can often be treated through dietary changes, other forms of anaemia must be treated by addressing underlying infections and chronic conditions requiring comprehensive health interventions.
WHO has guidance that covers all WHO Regions to help reduce the prevalence of anaemia through prevention and treatment. These guidelines aim to increase dietary diversity, improve infant feeding practices and improve the bioavailability and intake of micronutrients through fortification or supplementation with iron, folic acid and other vitamins and mineral. Social and behaviour change communication strategies are used to change nutrition-related behaviours. Interventions to address the underlying and basic causes of anaemia look at issues such as disease control, water, sanitation and hygiene, reproductive health and root causes such as poverty, lack of education and gender norms.
Anaemia, as a public health issue, needs to be addressed from multiple perspectives and through multiple coordinated efforts, including multiple government sectors, nongovernmental organizations, United Nations agencies and the private sector – each with specific and complementary roles to collectively achieve anaemia reduction and improve health and well-being.
See
here
for more information."
Antimicrobial resistance,https://www.who.int/health-topics/antimicrobial-resistance,"Antimicrobial resistance
(AMR) threatens the effective prevention and treatment of an ever-increasing
range of infections caused by bacteria, parasites, viruses and fungi.
AMR occurs when
bacteria, viruses, fungi and parasites change over time and no longer respond
to medicines making infections harder to treat and increasing the risk of
disease spread, severe illness and death. As a result, the medicines become
ineffective and infections persist in the body, increasing the risk of spread
to others.
Antimicrobials -
including antibiotics, antivirals, antifungals and antiparasitics - are
medicines used to prevent and treat infections in humans, animals and plants.
Microorganisms that develop antimicrobial resistance are sometimes referred to
as “superbugs”.",N/A,N/A
Assistive technology,https://www.who.int/health-topics/assistive-technology,"Assistive technology enables and promotes inclusion and participation, especially of persons with disability, aging populations, and people with non-communicable diseases. The primary purpose of assistive products is to maintain or improve an individual’s functioning and independence, thereby promoting their well-being. They enable people to live healthy, productive, independent and dignified lives, and to participate in education, the labour market and civic life.
Examples of assistive products include hearing aids, wheelchairs, spectacles, prostheses and devices that support memory, among many others. While supporting independence and well-being, these products can also help to prevent or reduce the effects of secondary health conditions, such as lower limb amputation in people with diabetes. They can also reduce the need and impact on carers and mitigate the need for formal health and support services. Moreover, access to appropriate assistive products can have a tremendous impact on community development and economic growth.
Despite the global need and recognized benefits of assistive products, access to assistive products remains limited. Addressing this unmet need is essential to progress towards the achievement of the Sustainable Development Goals and realizing the Convention of the Rights of Persons with Disabilities.","Despite the growing number of people in need of assistive products in every country, many do not have the access they require. This is particularly the case in low- and middle-income countries, where access to these life-changing products has been found to be as low as 3%. These gaps exist for several reasons, including high cost and a lack of financing, availability, awareness and trained personnel.
Challenges exist both in low- and high-income countries. Very few countries globally have developed a national assistive technology policy or programme and so provide assistive products through the private sector. Even in high-income countries, assistive products are often rationed or not included within health and welfare schemes, leading to high out-of-pocket payments by users and their families. People may be left to rely on erratic donations or charity services, which often means the products are of low quality or inappropriate for the person’s needs. Those who can afford them often purchase items from pharmacies, private clinics, or workshops. In these scenarios, people often are not taught how to use the product safely and lack access to follow-up appointments, which are essential to ensure that the product meets the person’s needs and that it is in good working order.","WHO’s vision is that everyone, everywhere, has the right to the highest attainable standard of health. Assistive technology is fundamental to achieve this vision, as they ensure that people with disabilities, older people and those affected by health conditions are able to live a healthy and dignified life and are included in society.
As part of that commitment, the 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development places well-being and universal health coverage at the centre of its development vision, with the commitment to leave no one behind. In addition, the Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities has recognized access to assistive technology as a human right and has called for international cooperation to improve global access (Article 32).
In 2018, delegates at the Seventy-first World Health Assembly adopted the resolution Improving access to assistive technology, urging Member States to develop, implement and strengthen policies and programmes to improve access to assistive technology as a move towards universal health coverage.
WHO coordinates the
Global Cooperation on Assistive Technology (GATE)
as a step towards realizing the Sustainable Development Goals, the Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities and implementing the resolution WHA71.8 on assistive technology. The GATE initiative has the goal to support countries in addressing challenges and improving access to assistive products within their context.
Read about the GATE initiative
Join the GATE Community"
Biological weapons,https://www.who.int/health-topics/biological-weapons,"Biological and toxin weapons are either microorganisms like virus, 
bacteria or fungi, or toxic substances produced by living organisms that
 are produced and released deliberately to cause disease and death in 
humans, animals or plants.
Biological agents like anthrax, 
botulinum toxin and plague can pose a difficult public health challenge 
causing large numbers of deaths in a short amount of time. Biological 
agents which are capable of secondary transmission can lead to 
epidemics. An attack involving a biological agent may mimic a natural 
event, which may complicate the public health assessment and response. 
In case of war and conflict, high-threat pathogens laboratories can be 
targeted, which might lead to serious public health consequences.
Biological
 weapons form a subset of a larger class of weapons sometimes referred 
to as unconventional weapons or weapons of mass destruction, which also 
includes chemical, nuclear and radiological weapons. The use of 
biological agents is a serious concern, and the risk of using these 
agents in a terrorist attack is thought to be increasing.","WHO focuses on the possible public health consequences of an incident
 due to a biological agent, regardless of whether it is characterized as
 a deliberate act or a naturally occurring event.
When a Member 
State is concerned about biological agents and wants to be better 
prepared, WHO advises strengthening public health surveillance and 
response activities, with an emphasis on:
more effective 
national surveillance of outbreaks of illness, including alert and 
response systems at all levels that can detect diseases that may be 
deliberately caused;
improved biosafety and biosecurity throughout the health sector;
better
 communication between multiple sectors, including public health, animal
 health, water supply, food safety, poison control, civil protection, 
law enforcement, and security services;
improved assessments of 
vulnerability, and effective communication about risks and threats to 
both professionals and the public;
preparation for handling the psychosocial consequences of the deliberate use of pathogens to cause harm; and
contingency plans for an enhanced response capacity by all sectors.
WHO’s
 global alert and response activities and the Global Outbreak Alert and 
Response Network (GOARN) represent a major pillar of global health security 
aimed at the detection, verification and containment of epidemics. In 
the event of the intentional release of a biological agent, these 
activities would be vital to effective international containment 
efforts.","With the occurrence of a potential, suspected or confirmed deliberate
 biological event, WHO would, upon the invitation of the affected Member
 State(s), work closely with the Member State government(s), other UN 
agencies, and other international partners as appropriate, support the 
event response, and assess and mitigate the public health 
consequences. These activities could include:
working with relevant international or national organizations to better characterize the nature, scope and impact of the event;
facilitating
 the public health investigation of the event, including referral to 
appropriate laboratories for confirmation and characterization of the 
pathogen;
offering targeted training to public health responders;
facilitating
 the identification and acquisition of necessary materials (such as 
personal protective equipment) appropriate to the event;
supporting the continued delivery of essential health services; and
developing guidance material specific to the pathogen or toxin in question."
Biologicals,https://www.who.int/health-topics/biologicals,"Biological therapeutics, also referred to as Biologicals, are those class of medicines which are grown and then purified from large-scale cell cultures of bacteria or yeast, or plant or animal cells. Biologicals are a diverse group of medicines which includes vaccines, growth factors, immune modulators, monoclonal antibodies, as well as products derived from human blood and plasma. What distinguishes biologicals from other medicines is that these are generally proteins purified from living culture systems or from blood, whereas other medicines are considered as ‘small molecules’ and are either made synthetically or purified from plants.
Due to the differences in their nature and how they are produced, biological therapeutics are regulated, tested, and controlled differently than other medicines. To help ensure their quality, safety, and efficacy, each batch of a biological therapeutic product must be tested extensively at each stage of production in order to ensure consistency with prior batches.  The use of WHO international reference standards helps to further ensure the consistency of a product across many batches as well as to allow the comparability of biologicals between manufacturers and/or countries.  The establishment of general requirements applicable across a diverse range of product classes governing starting materials, manufacturing and regulatory oversight is an essential aspect of this process. Whereas guidelines may be established for specific biologicals to help .","The beneficial impact of biologicals is as diverse as the types of products themselves:
Vaccines are one of the most powerful and cost-effective ways to reduce the global burden of disease and are estimated to save 2–3 million lives every year. Some diseases, such as smallpox and two types of polio, have been eradicated thanks to global efforts to vaccinate and control their spread. However, as many transmissible diseases continue to claim millions of lives annually, the development of new vaccines and other biological products, and new methods to improve their quality, potency, safety and efficacy, remain major challenges in the field of public health.
Blood products are life-saving products used extensively during surgery, in patients with traumas, or those with bleeding disorders, and in people undergoing chemotherapy for the treatment of cancer.  Most donated blood is fractioned into its separate components so a single unit may be used to help multiple patients in need.
There are numerous other biological therapeutics, such as insulin used in the treatment of diabetes, interferons for viral infections and cancer therapy, monoclonal antibodies that are also used in the treatment of some cancers or autoimmune diseases.  This class of agent also includes stem cells and some gene therapies.
Together, these products are major human achievements and compelling examples of the power of biologicals in medicine.","WHO works with Member States, Collaborating Centres, partners and experts through its biological standardization programme to develop and revise guidance on biotherapeutic products and to establish international reference standards. The guidelines produced are promoted through their publication on the WHO website, as well as through workshops and training sessions to facilitate their implementation. This outreach has proved valuable in promoting WHO recommendations that promote international harmonization of guidance for biological therapeutics.
Similarly, the development and promotion of WHO international reference standards helps ensure that biological therapeutics are standardized between different manufacturers, countries, and laboratories.  They are used extensively in ensuring the quality and efficacy of biologicals, as well as in the calibration of diagnostic tests.
Several key programs reflect the importance WHO places on biological medicines as powerful agents to reduce the global burden of disease. These include the Global Vaccine Action Plan (GVAP) and the Blood Regulators Network (BRN), which is comprised of leading international authorities on blood, blood products and in vitro diagnostic devices. WHO also celebrates World Immunization Week each April, with associated events aimed at promoting the use and understanding of vaccines and combat vaccine hesitancy around the world."
Blood products,https://www.who.int/health-topics/blood-products,"A blood product is any therapeutic substance derived from human blood, including whole blood and other blood components for transfusion, and plasma-derived medicinal products (PDMPs).
Medicinal (medical therapeutic) products derived from human donations of blood and plasma play a critical role in health care. Safe, effective and quality-assured blood products contribute to improving and saving millions of lives every year, as they:
address child mortality and maternal health;
dramatically improve the life expectancy and quality of life of patients suffering from life-threatening inherited disorders, such as haemophilia, thalassaemia and immune deficiency, and acquired conditions such as cancer and traumatic haemorrhage; and
support complex medical and surgical procedures, including transplantation.
An insufficient or unsafe blood supply for transfusion has a negative impact on the effectiveness of key health services and programmes to provide appropriate patient care in numerous acute and chronic conditions. Ensuring access of all patients who require transfusion to safe, effective and quality-assured blood products is a key component of an effective health system and vital for patient safety.","Blood products contribute to the saving of millions of lives every year,
    improve dramatically life expectancy and the quality of life of patients
    suffering from life-threatening conditions, and support complex medical and
    surgical procedures.
In high-income countries, blood products are most commonly used to support
    advanced medical and surgical procedures, including treatments of cancer and
    haematological diseases, trauma resuscitation, cardiovascular surgery and
    transplantation. In lower-income countries where diagnosis and treatment
    options are limited, a greater portion of blood is used to treat women with
    obstetric emergencies and children suffering from severe anaemia, often
    resulting from malaria and malnutrition.
In many countries, demand outstrips supply, and blood services throughout
    the world face the daunting challenge of making sufficient supplies of blood
    products available, while also ensuring the quality and safety of these
    products in the face of known and emerging threats to public health","The WHO Action framework to advance universal access to safe, effective and quality-assured blood products 2020–2023 aims to provide strategic direction to global efforts to address present barriers to the safety and availability of blood products.
Working with Member States and partners, WHO aims to achieve universal access to safe, effective and quality assured blood products through the Framework’s 6 strategic objectives. The objectives focus on:
Appropriately structured, well-coordinated and sustainably      resourced national blood systems;
Appropriate national frameworks of regulatory controls, national      standards and quality assessment programmes;
Functioning and efficiently managed blood services in all      countries;
Effective implementation of patient blood management to optimize      clinical practice of transfusion;
Effective surveillance, haemovigilance and pharmacovigilance,      supported by comprehensive and accurate data collection systems;
Partnerships, collaboration and information exchange to achieve key      priorities and jointly address challenges and emerging threats at global,      regional and national levels."
Blood transfusion safety,https://www.who.int/health-topics/blood-transfusion-safety,"Nearly 120 million units of blood are donated every year. However, this is not sufficient to meet the global need many patients requiring a transfusion do not have timely access to safe blood. Blood cannot be stored indefinitely, meaning there is a constant need for donations. Regular donations are required to ensure there is always a supply for those in need. Despite global need, donation rates differ around the world and some high-income countries see up to seven times more donations than low-income countries.
Blood transfusions are needed for a wide range of health conditions including anaemia, complications during pregnancy and childbirth, severe trauma due to accidents, and surgical procedures. They are also regularly used for patients with conditions such as sickle cell disease and thalassaemia and for products to treat haemophilia.
Maintaining safe and effective procedures around the collection, storage and use of donated blood is essential. Collectively called haemovigilance, these procedures cover the entire blood transfusion chain and are used to standardize the use of blood in healthcare.","Donated blood is used in many ways beyond whole blood transfusions. Processing can convert it into plasma, red cell concentrates, platelet concentrates and more, with each used for specific cases in health-care delivery. In some cases, this allows a unit of donated blood to meet the needs of more than one patient and is an important aspect of the transfusion train. However, not all countries have facilities to process blood in this way, and only 50 of 173 reporting countries produce plasma-derived medicinal products domestically.
The world’s blood supply comes through over 12 000 blood centres and is donated by three types of people: unpaid volunteers, family members of patients and paid donors. WHO advocates the development of national blood systems based on unpaid volunteers because that group tends to have fewer bloodborne infections. Despite this, many countries continue to receive less than half of blood donations from unpaid volunteers, with much of their blood supply dependent on family donations and paid donors.","The unavailability of timely, safe blood transfusions has led to many otherwise avoidable deaths. A consistent supply of blood is a cornerstone of any health-care system, but this relies on regular donations and effective health-care infrastructure.
Huge gaps exist between low-, middle- and high-income countries regarding blood donation. Of the nearly 120 million units of blood donated each year around the world, 42% are in high-income countries, where just 16% of the global population lives. However, more young people donate in low- and middle-income countries than in high-income countries.
Compounding insufficient collection rates is the inability of many health-care systems to adequately screen donated blood for diseases such as HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C and syphilis according to quality system requirements. The inability to test blood can be due in part to the irregular supply of testing kits, particularly in low-income areas. Inadequate testing contributes to the spread of transfusion-transmissible infections, which can compromise the patient’s wellbeing and further strain health-care systems."
Brain health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/brain-health,"Brain health is the state of brain functioning across cognitive, sensory,
social-emotional, behavioural and motor domains, allowing a person to realize
their full potential over the life course, irrespective of the presence or
absence of disorders.
Different determinants related to physical health, healthy environments,
safety and security, life-long learning and social connection as well as access
to quality services influence the way our brains develop, adapt and respond to
stress and adversity. These give way to strategies for promotion and
prevention across the life course.
Optimizing brain health
by addressing these determinants not only improves mental and
physical health but also creates positive social and economic impacts that
contribute to greater well-being and help advance society.
However, conditions affecting the brain and nervous system in general emerge
throughout the life course and are characterized by disruptions in brain
growth, damage to brain structure and/or impaired brain functioning. These
include for example congenital and neurodevelopmental conditions as well as
neurological disorders across the life. Health and social care for these
conditions require multisectoral and interdisciplinary collaborations with a holistic
person-centred approach focused on promotion, prevention, treatment, care and
rehabilitation and the active engagement of persons with lived experience,
their families and carers.","The global burden of neurological and neurodevelopmental conditions is high,
with approximately 70% of the burden in low- and middle-income countries.
Neurological conditions are the leading cause of disability adjusted life years
(DALYs) and account for about 9 million deaths per year.
The largest contributors of neurological DALYs in 2016 were stroke (42.2%),
migraine (16.3%), dementia (10.4%), meningitis (7.9%) and epilepsy (5%).
Parkinson disease, propelled by an increasingly ageing population, is the
fastest growing neurological disorder. Premature birth, neonatal encephalopathy
and neuroinfections contribute substantially to high disease burden in South-East
Asia and Africa. In 2016, developmental disabilities accounted for 13.3% of the
29.3 million years lived with disability for all health conditions among
children younger than 5 years.
Despite the large burden, only 28% of low-income countries have a dedicated
policy for neurological diseases in comparison with 64% of high-income
countries. Available resources for these conditions are insufficient in most
countries, with unacceptably high treatment gaps for many neurological and
neurodevelopmental conditions. For example, in low- and middle-income
countries, there are only three adult neurologists per 10 million people while
high-income countries have approximately 160 times more. Resources for the
assessment and care of children with neurological and neurodevelopmental
conditions are even more scarce.","In May 2022, WHO Member States adopted the
Intersectoral global action plan on epilepsy and other neurological disorders 2022–2031
. This action plan aims to improve care, recovery, well-being and participation of people living with neurological disorders across the life-course, while reducing associated mortality, morbidity and disability associated with neurological conditions.
In the context of Universal Health Coverage and the UN Sustainable Development Goals and in line with WHO’s existing mandates for conditions affecting the brain such as
autism spectrum disorder
,
epilepsy
and
dementia
, WHO’s brain health work is focused on promoting optimal brain development, cognitive health and well-being across the life course. The main activities involve:
strengthening policies, service delivery, health information systems, technology      (including but not limited to artificial intelligence, e-health and big      data), research and innovation, especially in low- and middle-income      countries;
providing technical assistance on how to formulate an integrated approach to brain      health conditions focused on promotion, prevention, treatment, care and      rehabilitation, focusing on low- and middle-income countries; and
fostering increased investment and inter-agency collaboration globally as well as      the involvement of different specialties and sectors."
Breastfeeding,https://www.who.int/health-topics/breastfeeding,"Breastfeeding is one of the most effective ways to ensure child health and survival. However, contrary to WHO recommendations, fewer than half of infants under 6 months old are exclusively breastfed.
Breastmilk is the ideal food for infants. It is safe, clean and contains antibodies which help protect against many common childhood illnesses. Breastmilk provides all the energy and nutrients that the infant needs for the first months of life, and it continues to provide up to half or more of a child’s nutritional needs during the second half of the first year, and up to one third during the second year of life.
Breastfed children perform better on intelligence tests, are less likely to be overweight or obese and less prone to diabetes later in life. Women who breastfeed also have a reduced risk of breast and ovarian cancers.
Inappropriate marketing of breast-milk substitutes continues to undermine efforts to improve breastfeeding rates and duration worldwide.
Learn about Nutrition and Food Safety and COVID-19","WHO and UNICEF recommend that children initiate breastfeeding within the first hour of birth and be exclusively breastfed for the first 6 months of life – meaning no other foods or liquids are provided, including water.
Infants should be breastfed on demand – that is as often as the child wants, day and night. No bottles, teats or pacifiers should be used.
From the age of 6 months, children should begin eating safe and adequate complementary foods while continuing to breastfeed for up to two years of age or beyond.","WHO actively promotes breastfeeding as the best source of nourishment for infants and young children, and is working to increase the rate of exclusive breastfeeding for the first 6 months up to at least 50% by 2025.
WHO and UNICEF created the Global Breastfeeding Collective to rally political, legal, financial, and public support for breastfeeding. The Collective brings together implementers and donors from governments, philanthropies, international organizations, and civil society.
WHO’s Network for Global Monitoring and Support for Implementation of the International Code of Marketing of Breast-milk Substitutes, also known as NetCode, works to ensure that breast-milk substitutes are not marketed inappropriately.
Additionally, WHO provides training courses for health workers to provide skilled support to breastfeeding mothers, help them overcome problems, and monitor the growth of children."
Buruli ulcer  (Mycobacterium ulcerans infection),https://www.who.int/health-topics/buruli-ulcer,"Buruli ulcer is a chronic debilitating disease that mainly affects the skin and sometimes bones. First described by Sir Albert Cook in 1897 in Uganda, it was not until the 1930s that Australian scientists led by Peter MacCallum first succeeded in culturing the organism from lesions of patients from the Bairnsdale region. The name Buruli comes from an area of Uganda where many cases were reported in the 1960s. In Africa, about half of the patients are children under 15 years. In Australia, the average age is around 60 years. In 1998, WHO established the Global Buruli Ulcer Initiative in response to the growing spread of the disease, particularly in West Africa.
Buruli ulcer is caused by
Mycobacterium
and
belongs to the family of bacteria that causes tuberculosis and leprosy. Although the causative organism of Buruli ulcer is an environmental bacterium, the mode of transmission to humans remains unknown. The organism produces a unique toxin – mycolactone – that causes the damage to the skin. Early diagnosis and treatment are crucial to minimizing morbidity, costs and prevent long-term disability.","Symptoms of Buruli ulcer begin with painless nodules and swelling, usually on the arms and legs and sometimes on other parts of the body. These areas can then develop into large ulcers with a white and yellow base.
M.
ulcerans
produces the toxin mycolactone. This has local immunosuppressive properties that enable the disease to progress rapidly with no pain and fever, making early detection difficult. However, if the ulcers are treated quickly, most will heal completely.
If diagnosed late or left untreated, the condition can lead to scarring, permanent disfigurement and disability.
Buruli ulcer has been reported in 33 countries in Africa, the Americas, Asia and the Western Pacific. Most cases occur in tropical and subtropical regions except in Australia, China and Japan. Out of the 33 countries, 14 regularly report data to WHO. The number of annual cases can be found in
Global Health Observatory
.","Treatment consists of a combination of antibiotics and complementary treatments (under morbidity management and disability prevention/rehabilitation).
Antibiotics:
Current WHO recommendations are rifampicin 10 mg/kg per body weight daily and clarithromycin 7.5 mg/kg per body weight twice daily. Treatment guidance for health workers can be found in the WHO publication
Treatment of
mycobacterium
ulcerans
disease (Buruli ulcer)
.
Other interventions
In addition to the antibiotics and depending on the stage of the disease, other interventions such as wound care, lymphoedema management, surgery (mainly debridement and skin grafting to speed up healing) and physiotherapy are needed. Psychological support
    may also be needed for those with severe disease.
These same interventions are applicable to other neglected tropical diseases, such as leprosy and lymphatic filariasis, so it is important to integrate a long-term care approach into the health system to benefit all patients. The integrated approach to
    the control of skin related NTDs provides an opportunity to integrate Buruli ulcer detection and its management with these diseases."
Cancer,https://www.who.int/health-topics/cancer,"Cancer is a large group of diseases that can start in almost any organ or tissue of the body when abnormal cells grow uncontrollably, go beyond their usual boundaries to invade adjoining parts of the body and/or spread to other organs. The latter process is called metastasizing and is a major cause of death from cancer. A neoplasm and malignant tumour are other common names for cancer.
Cancer is the second leading cause of death globally, accounting for an estimated 9.6 million deaths, or 1 in 6 deaths, in 2018. Lung, prostate, colorectal, stomach and liver cancer are the most common types of cancer in men, while breast, colorectal, lung, cervical and thyroid cancer are the most common among women.
The cancer burden continues to grow globally, exerting tremendous physical, emotional and financial strain on individuals, families, communities and health systems. Many health systems in low- and middle-income countries are least prepared to manage this burden, and large numbers of cancer patients globally do not have access to timely quality diagnosis and treatment. In countries where health systems are strong, survival rates of many types of cancers are improving thanks to accessible early detection, quality treatment and survivorship care.","Between 30% and 50% of cancer deaths could be prevented by modifying or avoiding key risk factors and implementing existing evidence-based prevention strategies. The cancer burden can also be reduced through early detection of cancer and management of patients who develop cancer. Prevention also offers the most cost-effective long-term strategy for the control of cancer.
Modifying or avoiding the following key risk factors can help prevent cancer:
avoid tobacco use, including cigarettes and smokeless tobacco;
maintain a healthy weight;
eat a healthy diet with plenty of fruit and vegetables;
exercise regularly;
limit alcohol use;
practice safe sex;
get vaccinated against hepatitis B and human papillomavirus (HPV);
reduce exposure to ultraviolet radiation;
prevent unnecessary ionizing radiation exposure (e.g. minimize occupational exposure, ensure safe and appropriate medical use of radiation in diagnosis and treatment);
avoid urban air pollution and indoor smoke from household use of solid fuels;
get regular medical care; and
some chronic infections are also risk factors for cancer. People in low- and middle-income countries are more likely to develop cancer through chronic infections.","Cancer is more likely to respond to effective treatment when identified early, resulting in a greater probability of surviving as well as less morbidity and less expensive treatment.
There are two distinct strategies that promote early detection:
Early diagnosis identifies symptomatic cancer cases at the earliest possible stage.
Screening aims to identify individuals with abnormalities suggestive of a specific cancer or pre-cancer who have not developed any symptoms and refer them promptly for diagnosis and treatment .
Treatment options include surgery, cancer medicines and/or radiotherapy, administered alone or in combination. A multidisciplinary team of cancer professionals recommends the best possible treatment plan based on tumour type, cancer stage, clinical and other factors. The choice of treatment should be informed by patients’ preferences and consider the capacity of the health system.
Palliative care, which focuses on improving the quality of life of patients and their families, is an essential component of cancer care. Survivorship care includes a detailed plan for monitoring cancer recurrence and detection of new cancers, assessing and managing long-term effects associated with cancer and/or its treatment, and services to ensure that cancer survivor needs are met."
Cardiovascular diseases,https://www.who.int/health-topics/cardiovascular-diseases,"Cardiovascular diseases (CVDs) are the leading cause of death globally,
taking an estimated 17.9 million lives each year. CVDs are a group
of disorders of the heart and blood vessels and include coronary heart
disease, cerebrovascular disease, rheumatic heart disease and other conditions.
More than four out of five CVD deaths are due to heart attacks and strokes, and
one third of these deaths occur prematurely in people under 70 years of
age.
The most important behavioural risk factors of heart disease and stroke are
unhealthy diet, physical inactivity, tobacco use and harmful use of alcohol. Amongst
environmental risk factors, air pollution is an important factor. The effects
of behavioural risk factors may show up in individuals as raised blood
pressure, raised blood glucose, raised blood lipids, and overweight and
obesity. These “intermediate risks factors” can be measured in primary care
facilities and indicate an increased risk of heart attack, stroke, heart
failure and other complications.
Cessation of tobacco use, reduction of salt in the diet, eating more fruit
and vegetables, regular physical activity and avoiding harmful use of alcohol
have been shown to reduce the risk of cardiovascular disease. Health policies
that create conducive environments for making healthy choices affordable and
available, as well as improving air quality and reducing pollution, are
essential for motivating people to adopt and sustain healthy behaviours.
Identifying those at highest risk of CVDs and ensuring they receive
appropriate treatment can prevent premature deaths. Access to noncommunicable
disease medicines and basic health technologies in all primary health care
facilities is essential to ensure that those in need receive treatment and
counselling.","Heart attack and stroke
Often, there are no symptoms of the underlying disease of the blood vessels. A heart attack or stroke may be the first sign of underlying disease. Symptoms of a heart attack include:
pain or discomfort in the centre of the chest; and/or
pain or discomfort in the arms, the left shoulder, elbows, jaw, or back.
In addition the person may experience difficulty in breathing or shortness of breath; nausea or vomiting; light-headedness or faintness; a cold sweat; and turning pale. Women are more likely than men to have shortness of breath, nausea, vomiting, and back or jaw pain.
The most common symptom of a stroke is sudden weakness of the face, arm, or leg, most often on one side of the body. Other symptoms include sudden onset of:
numbness of the face, arm, or leg, especially on one side of the body;
confusion, difficulty speaking or understanding speech;
difficulty seeing with one or both eyes;
difficulty walking, dizziness and/or loss of balance or coordination;
severe headache with no known cause; and/or
fainting or unconsciousness.
People experiencing these symptoms should seek medical care immediately.
Rheumatic heart disease
Symptoms of rheumatic heart disease include: shortness of breath, fatigue, irregular heartbeats, chest pain and fainting. Symptoms of rheumatic fever (which can cause rheumatic heart disease if not treated) include: fever, pain and swelling of the joints, nausea, stomach cramps and vomiting.","WHO supports governments to prevent, manage and monitor CVDs by developing global strategies to reduce the incidence, morbidity and mortality of these diseases. These strategies include reducing risk factors, developing standards of care, enhancing health system capacity to care for patients with CVD, and monitoring disease patterns and trends to inform national and global actions.
The risk factors for CVD include behaviours such as tobacco use, an unhealthy diet, harmful use of alcohol and inadequate physical activity. They also include physiological factors, including high blood pressure (hypertension), high blood cholesterol and high blood sugar or glucose, which are linked to underlying social determinants and drivers such as ageing, income and urbanization."
Cervical cancer,https://www.who.int/health-topics/cervical-cancer,"Cervical cancer develops in a woman's cervix (the entrance to the uterus from the vagina).
Almost all cervical cancer cases (99%) are linked to infection with high-risk human papillomaviruses (HPV), an extremely common virus transmitted through sexual contact.
Although most infections with HPV resolve spontaneously and cause no symptoms, persistent infection can cause cervical cancer in women.
Cervical cancer is the fourth most common cancer in women. In 2022, an estimated 660 000 women were diagnosed with cervical cancer worldwide and about 350 000 women died from the disease.
Effective primary (HPV vaccination) and secondary prevention approaches (screening for, and treating precancerous lesions) will prevent most cervical cancer cases.
When diagnosed, cervical cancer is one of the most successfully treatable forms of cancer, as long as it is detected early and managed effectively. Cancers diagnosed in late stages can also be controlled with appropriate treatment and palliative care.
With a comprehensive approach to prevent, screen and treat, cervical cancer can be eliminated as a public health problem within a generation.","No woman should die from cervical cancer. We have the technical, medical and policy tools and approaches to eliminate it. The burden of cervical cancer falls on the women who lack access to health services, mainly in low-and middle income countries.
In May 2018, the Director-General
of  the World Health Organization announced a global call to action towards the elimination of cervical cancer, underscoring renewed political will to make elimination a reality, and called for all stakeholders to unite behind this common goal.
In January 2019, the Executive Board requested the Director-General to develop a draft global strategy to accelerate cervical cancer elimination, with clear targets for the period 2020–2030.
A Global Strategy towards the Elimination
of Cervical Cancer as a Public Health Problem
was developed in close consultation with Member States, and in collaboration with UN Agencies and other partners and organizations. It outlines key goals and agreed targets to be reached by 2030 and
set the world on track to elimination.",N/A
Chagas disease (American trypanosomiasis),https://www.who.int/health-topics/chagas-disease,"Chagas disease, also known as American trypanosomiasis, is a potentially life-threatening illness caused by the protozoan parasite
Trypanosoma cruzi
.
An estimated 6 to 7 million people worldwide are  infected with
T. cruzi
. Chagas disease is found mainly in endemic areas of 21 continental Latin American countries
, where it is mostly transmitted when humans come into contact with faeces and/or urine of infected blood-sucking triatomine bugs (vector-borne transmission).
Chagas disease was once entirely confined to the Region of the Americas. In the last decades the epidemiological pattern of the disease  changed from a rural to a mostly urban disease, mainly due to population mobility, urbanization and emigration. As a consequence, increased  number of cases have been detected in Canada and the United States of America, and in many European and some African, Eastern Mediterranean and Western Pacific countries. Due to the high number of people who remain undiagnosed or untreated, combined with the areas with remaining active transmission, put an estimated 75 million people at risk of infection.
Triatomine bugs typically live in the wall or roof cracks of poorly constructed homes in rural or suburban areas, becoming active at night, biting exposed areas of skin, then defecating close to the bite.
The parasites enter the body when: i) the person inadvertently smears the bug’s waste into the bite or another skin break, the eyes or the mouth; ii) by consumption of food that has been contaminated with waste from infected triatomine bugs, typically infecting groups of people (causing outbreaks or oral transmission) with a higher frequency of severe disease and number of deaths.
Everywhere Chagas disease can be also transmitted through blood or blood product transfusion from infected donors; by congenital (mother to child) transmission during pregnancy or childbirth; by organ transplantation from infected donors; and also by laboratory accidents.
In May 2019, following up on decision of the 72
n
d
World Health Assembly, the World Chagas Disease Day was established to be celebrated on 14 April (the date of the year 1909 when Carlos Chagas diagnosed the first human case of the disease, a two-year-old girl called Berenice).","After the infection is transmitted there is an initial, acute phase that lasts for about two months. In most cases, symptoms are absent or mild and unspecific. In people bitten by a triatomine bug, characteristic first visible signs of infection, such as a skin lesion or a purplish swelling of the lids of one eye (the so-called Romaña sign), can help in the diagnosis of new cases. With any transmission route, patients can present fever, headache, enlarged lymph glands, pallor, muscle pain, difficulty in breathing, swelling, and abdominal or chest pain.
During the chronic phase that succeeds the acute phase, up to 30% of patients suffer from cardiac disorders and up to 10% experience digestive, neurological or mixed disorders. In later years, the infection can lead to sudden death principally due to heart arrhythmia or heart failure caused by the destruction of the heart muscle and its nervous system.","Chagas disease can be treated with two antiparasitic medicines: benznidazole and nifurtimox. Both medicines are nearly 100% effective in curing the disease if given soon after infection, including the cases of congenital transmission. The efficacy of both diminishes, however, the longer a person has been infected and the adverse reactions are more frequent at older age.
Treatment is also indicated for those in whom the infection has been reactivated due to immunosuppression, and for patients during the early chronic phase. Infected adults, especially those with no symptoms, should be offered treatment because antiparasitic treatment can also prevent or curb disease progression and prevent congenital transmission in pregnant women. In other cases the potential benefits of medication in preventing or delaying the development of Chagas disease should be weighed against the duration of treatment (up to 2 months) and possible adverse reactions (occurring in up to 40% of treated adult patients).
Benznidazole and nifurtimox should not be taken by pregnant women or by people with kidney or liver failure. Nifurtimox is also contraindicated for people with a background of neurological or psychiatric disorders.
Additionally, specific treatment for cardiac, or digestive or neurological manifestations may be required."
Chemical incidents,https://www.who.int/health-topics/chemical-incidents,"A chemical incident is the uncontrolled release of a toxic substance, potentially resulting in harm to public health and the environment. Chemical incidents can occur as a result of natural events, or as a result of accidental or intentional events. These incidents can be sudden and acute or have a slow onset when there is a ‘silent’ release of a chemical. They can also range from small releases to full-scale major emergencies.
The term “chemical incident” might refer to anthropogenic or technological events, including:
an explosion at a factory that stores or uses chemicals
contamination of the food or water supply with a chemical
an oil spill
a leak from a storage unit during transportation
deliberate release of chemicals in conflict or terrorism
an outbreak of disease that is associated with a chemical exposure.
Chemical incidents arising from natural sources include volcanos, earthquakes and forest fires. An estimated 65 000 people died due to technological events between 2009-2018.
As the production and use of chemicals continues to increase worldwide the health sector must expand its traditional roles and responsibilities to be able to address the public health and medical issues associated with the use of chemicals and their health effects.","Chemical incidents, especially acts of terrorism, may also cause fear and anxiety in populations, as well as injury from fire, explosion or toxicity. Depending on the chemical exposure, symptoms may present themselves differently.
In general, the adverse health outcomes to toxic chemical exposure may be:
effects that are local or arise at the site of contact with the chemical, such as bronchoconstriction from respiratory irritants, or irritation of the skin and eyes by gases, liquids and solids;
effects that are systemic or affect organ systems remote from the site of absorption, such as depression of the central nervous system from inhalation of solvents, or necrosis of the liver from the inhalation of carbon tetrachloride; and
effects on mental health arising from real or perceived releases, which depend on the psychosocial stress associated with an incident.
The time elapsing between exposure and the onset of symptoms can vary:
Some effects, for example eye and respiratory irritation or central nervous system depression, can occur rapidly, within minutes or hours of exposure.
Other effects, for example congenital malformations or cancers, may take months or years to appear.","WHO works closely with countries and partners to monitor and report on their emergency preparedness capacities for all hazards, including for chemical incidents. Surveillance of diseases of possible chemical etiology is a daily element in WHO’s outbreak alert and response activities.
WHO also convenes regional meetings to strengthen the global network of poison centres and thus facilitate emergency responses to chemical incidents. Guidance and training materials to strengthen preparedness for chemical incidents and emergencies have been developed in collaboration with the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, the Inter-Organization Programme for the Sound Management of Chemicals, and relevant organizations in the United Nations system."
Chemical safety,https://www.who.int/health-topics/chemical-safety,"Chemical Safety is achieved by undertaking all activities involving chemicals in such a way as to ensure the safety of human health and the environment. It covers all chemicals, natural and manufactured, and the full range of exposure situations from
    the natural presence of chemicals in the environment to their extraction or synthesis, industrial production, transport use and disposal.
Chemical safety has many scientific and technical components. Among these are toxicology, ecotoxicology and the process of chemical risk assessment which requires a detailed knowledge of exposure and of biological effects.
Through the International Programme on Chemical Safety (IPCS), WHO works to establish the scientific basis for the sound management of chemicals, and to strengthen national capabilities and capacities for chemical safety.","Chemicals are part of our daily life. All living and inanimate matter is made up of chemicals and virtually every manufactured product involves the use of chemicals. Many chemicals can, when properly used, significantly contribute to the improvement of
    our quality of life, health and well-being. But other chemicals are highly hazardous and can negatively affect our health and environment when improperly managed.
The production and use of chemicals continues to grow worldwide, particularly in developing countries. This is likely to result in greater negative effect on health if sound chemicals management is not ensured. Multisectoral action is urgently needed
    to protect human health from the harmful effects of improperly managed chemicals.
WHO summarized scientific evidence and provides risk management recommendations for the
10 chemicals or groups of chemicals of major public health concern
.","The Seventieth World Health Assembly approved the
Road map
to enhance health sector engagement in the strategic approach to international chemicals management towards the 2020 goal and beyond. The WHO Secretariat has developed a
workbook
that offers a structured way to assist Member States to work through the
    road map, choose priorities and plan activities.
One of the actions in the Chemicals road map mandates the Secretariat to establish a global chemicals and health network, with links to existing subregional, regional and international networks,
    to facilitate health sector implementation of the road map. Over 70 Member States have joined the
WHO Global Chemicals and Health Network
with forty-one participating Member States attending the inaugural meeting of the Network held 5-8 November, 2018 in Geneva.
Roadmap and workbook
Identifying areas of primary focus for engagement and additional actions
The WHO Global Chemicals and Health Network
Facilitating health sector implementation of the road map
SAICM (Strategic Approach to International Chemicals Management)
Guide efforts to produce and use chemicals in ways that minimize significant adverse impacts on human health and the environment
Intersessional process
Preparing recommendations regarding the Strategic Approach and the sound management of chemicals and waste beyond 2020"
Chikungunya,https://www.who.int/health-topics/chikungunya,"Chikungunya is a mosquito-borne viral disease that causes fever and severe joint pain. It is caused by a ribonucleic acid (RNA) virus that belongs to the alphavirus genus of the family
Togaviridae
. The name “chikungunya” derives from a word in the Kimakonde language of southern Tanzania, meaning “to become contorted” and describes the stooped appearance of sufferers with joint pain (arthralgia).
Chikungunya virus (CHIKV) is transmitted to humans by the bites of infected female mosquitoes. Most commonly, the mosquitoes involved are
Aedes aegypti
and
Aedes albopictus
. These two species can also transmit other mosquito-borne viruses, including dengue and Zika viruses. They bite throughout daylight hours, although there may be peaks of activity in the early morning and late afternoon.
CHIKV was first identified in the United Republic of Tanzania in 1952 and subsequently in other countries in Africa and Asia. Urban outbreaks were first recorded in Asia in the 1970s, but since 2004, outbreaks of CHIKV have become more frequent and widespread. The first local, mosquito-transmitted chikungunya cases in the Americas were reported in late 2013, after which large outbreaks occurred affecting most of the countries in the region. Chikungunya has now been reported in 118 countries in Asia, Africa, Europe and the Americas.","Symptoms of chikungunya appear between 4 and 8 days after the patient has been bitten by the infected mosquito. Chikungunya is rarely fatal. Most symptoms are generally self-limiting and last for 2–3 days. The disease is characterized by an abrupt onset of fever, which is frequently accompanied by joint pain. Other common signs and symptoms include muscle pain, headache, nausea, fatigue and rash. The joint pain is often debilitating and usually lasts for a few days to a few weeks.
Most patients recover fully from the infection; however, occasional cases of eye, heart and neurological complications have been reported with CHIKV infections. Patients at extremes of the age spectrum are at higher risk for severe disease. Newborns infected during delivery and older people with underlying medical conditions may become severely ill and CHIKV infection can increase the risk of death. Often symptoms in infected individuals are mild and the infection may go unrecognized or be misdiagnosed in areas where dengue and other arboviruses also occur.","There is no specific antiviral drug treatment for chikungunya.
Treatment is directed primarily at relieving the symptoms, including joint pain. This is largely achieved by using anti-pyretic drugs to reduce fever, by optimizing the use of pain medication and by administering fluids. Aspirin and other non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs should not be administered until dengue can be ruled out to reduce the risk of bleeding.
Prevention and control rely heavily on reducing the number of water-filled habitats that allow mosquitoes to breed. During outbreaks, insecticides may be sprayed to kill flying mosquitoes; applied to surfaces in and around water-filled habitats where the mosquitoes land; and used to treat these habitats to kill the immature larvae. There is one vaccine approved in the United States of America and in Europe for use in travelers and laboratory workers; however, the vaccine is not widely available for public health use in endemic or outbreak settings. For protection in areas of chikungunya transmission, people with risk of exposure to infected mosquitoes are advised to wear clothing which minimizes skin exposure to day-biting mosquitoes. Repellents can be applied to exposed skin or to clothing in strict accordance with product label instructions.
For those who sleep during the daytime, particularly young children or sick or older people, insecticide-treated mosquito nets afford good protection. Mosquito coils or other insecticide vaporizers may also reduce indoor biting."
Child growth,https://www.who.int/health-topics/child-growth,"Child malnutrition is a major public health issue worldwide. An
estimated 144 million children under age 5 are stunted, 47 million are wasted
and 38.3 million have overweight or obesity. Around 45% of deaths among
children under 5 years of age are linked to undernutrition.
Measuring the growth of infants and children is an important part of child
health surveillance. Inadequate infant growth due to poor nutrition leads to
under-nutrition in children in many low- and middle-income countries, which, if
followed later in life by an increased intake of calories, can result in
overweight or obesity.
The WHO
Child Growth
Standards are a diagnostic
tool used to monitor and assess the nutritional status of infants and young
children worldwide. By tracking children’s height and body weight, the
standards detect children or populations not growing properly, or who are underweight
or at risk of overweight, and who may require specific health services or
public health responses.
The WHO Child Growth Standards have charts for boys and girls separated,
covering age birth to 5 years. They are used in doctors’ offices, clinics and
other health facilities, and by research institutions, child health advocacy
organizations and ministries of health
Learn about Nutrition and Food Safety and COVID-19","Child stunting refers to a child who is too short for his or her age and is
the result of chronic or recurrent malnutrition. Stunting is a contributing
risk factor to child mortality and is also a marker of inequalities in human
development. Child overweight refers to a child who is too heavy for his or her
height. This form of malnutrition usually results from expending too few calories
for the amount of food consumed or from endocrine disbalances, and it increases
the risk of noncommunicable diseases later in life. Child wasting refers to a
child who is too thin for his or her height and is the result of recent rapid
weight loss or the failure to gain weight. A child who is moderately or
severely wasted has an increased risk of death, but treatment is possible.
Childhood wasting and overweight are both forms of malnutrition and can
coexist in a population. In 2020, wasting (low weight for height) and
overweight was found in 6.7% of children under 5 (45.4 million) and 5.7% of
children under 5 (38.9 million), respectively.","In 2020, 22% of children under age 5 worldwide (149.2 million) suffered from
stunting, a decline from 24.4% in 2015. To achieve the target of a 50%
reduction in the number of stunted children by 2030, the annual rate of decline
must double (to 3.9% per year) from its current annual reduction rate of 2.1%
per year.
Although malnutrition can manifest in multiple ways, the path to prevention
is virtually identical: adequate maternal nutrition before and during pregnancy
and while breastfeeding; optimal breastfeeding in the first two years of life;
nutritious, diverse and safe complementary foods in early childhood; and a
healthy environment, including access to basic health, water, hygiene and
sanitation services and opportunities for safe physical activity.
Many of these vital pathways to good nutrition are under threat – including
due to the COVID-19 pandemic – and have the potential to undermine progress
towards ending malnutrition in all its forms. As the world responds to and
recovers from the pandemic, urgent action is critical to protect maternal and
child nutrition – especially in the most affected regions – and secure a future
where the right to nutrition is a reality for every child."
Child health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/child-health,"Protecting and improving the health of children is of fundamental importance. Over the past several decades, we have seen dramatic progress in improving the health and reducing the mortality rate of young children. Among other encouraging statistics,
    the number of children dying before the age of 5 was halved from 2000 to 2017, and more mothers and children are surviving today than ever before.
However, a great deal of work remains to further improve the health outcomes for children. The world is facing a double mandate. More than half of child deaths are due to conditions that could be easily prevented or treated given access to health care
    and improvements to their quality of life.
At the same time, children must also be given a stable environment in which to thrive, including good health and nutrition, protection from threats and access to opportunities to learn and grow. Investing in children is one of the most important things
    a society can do to build a better future.
Learn more about child health and COVID-19","Vast disparities exist around the world in a child’s chances of survival, with low- and middle-income countries disproportionately affected. Sub-Saharan Africa has the highest child mortality rate in the world, in some places 15 times higher than in high-income countries. The leading causes of death among children include respiratory infections, diarrhoeal diseases, measles, malaria, malnutrition and newborn conditions. Many child deaths are preventable through vaccination, adequate home care, access to health care services, improved rates of breastfeeding and better nutrition. However, many of the life-saving interventions are beyond the reach of the world’s poorest people.
Survival is just one of many issues relevant to children’s health. Child health, growth and development are inseparable. In 2016, at least 250 million children were not able to reach their full physical or psychological development. This represents the staggering figure of 43%. Violence against children is also rampant. In 2019, abuse or neglect affected as many as 1 billion children.","WHO works with partners and Member States to improve the lives of all children and meet the targets of Sustainable Development Goal 3, which aims to end preventable deaths of newborns and children under 5 by 2030. If all countries reach this goal, 11 million lives will be saved, more than half of them in sub-Saharan Africa.
WHO advocates for health equity through universal health coverage (UHC) and the global availability of vaccines to prevent some of the deadliest childhood diseases. WHO also promotes infant and young child feeding, with a focus on exclusive breastfeeding for infants. It has developed and promotes an integrated approach to managing childhood illness that considers all aspects of a child’s health, and a continuum of care throughout the early years to safeguard their developmental outcomes, including the reduction of risk factors for diseases that can arise later in life.
These goals are a collaboration between many WHO departments and coordinated through the Department of Maternal, Newborn, Child and Adolescent Health, and Ageing."
Children's environmental health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/children-environmental-health,"Reducing environmental risks could prevent 1 in 4 child deaths. In 2012, 1.7 million deaths in children under five were attributable to the environment. These included 570 000 deaths from respiratory infections, 361 000 deaths from diarrhoea, 270 000 deaths from neonatal conditions, 200 000 deaths from malaria and 200 000 deaths from unintentional injuries.
Environmental risks have an impact on the health and development of children, from conception through childhood and adolescence and also into adulthood. The environment determines a child’s future: early life exposures impact on adult health as fetal programming and early growth may be altered by environmental risk factors.
Adverse environmental conditions and pollution are a major contributor to childhood deaths, illnesses and disability, particularly in developing countries.
Children are particularly vulnerable to certain environmental risks, including: air pollution; inadequate water, sanitation and hygiene; hazardous chemicals and waste, radiation; climate change; as well as emerging threats like e-waste.","Children are more vulnerable than adults to
environmental risks
:
Children are constantly      growing. They breathe more air, consume more food, and drink more water      than adults do, in proportion to their weight.
Children's systems are still      developing. This includes their central nervous, immune, reproductive, and      digestive systems. At certain early stages of development, exposure to      environmental toxicants can lead to irreversible damage.
Children behave differently      from adults and this means there are different ways they can be exposed to      environmental risks. For example, young children crawl on the ground where      they may be exposed to dust and chemicals that accumulate on floors and      soils.
Children have little control      over their environment. Unlike adults, they may be both unaware of risks      and unable to make choices to protect their health.
Environmental risks account for 25% of the disease burden in children under five. Children's health problems often result from exposure to a number of environmental risk factors in the places where they live, work, play and learn.
Only through adopting a holistic approach to environmental risk factors can significant progress be made in reducing the environmental burden of disease on a global scale.  Such an approach means involvement across sectors and at all levels of society including individuals, communities, municipalities, healthcare professionals, and policy makers.
Main environmental risks are:
Climate change
Air pollution
Chemical safety
Water sanitation and hygiene
Radiation","Childhood diseases related to environmental factors represent an enormous global public health problem. This is particularly true in developing countries and impoverished communities, where there is often lack of awareness and knowledge about the effects of environmental hazards on children’s health.
To help address this problem, WHO prepares
information and training materials
and implements
training activities
.
To allow healthcare providers to better identify and prevent childhood diseases related to environmental risk factors, experts from both developed and developing countries have been involved in the preparation and peer-review of materials on specific environmental topics."
Cholera,https://www.who.int/health-topics/cholera,"Cholera is an acute diarrhoeal infection caused by eating or drinking food or water that is contaminated with the bacterium
Vibrio cholerae
. Cholera remains a global threat to public health and is an indicator of inequity and lack of social development. Researchers have estimated that every year, there are 1.3 to 4.0 million cases of cholera, and 21 000 to 143 000 deaths worldwide due to the infection.
Cholera is an extremely serious disease that can cause severe acute watery diarrhoea with severe dehydration. It takes between 12 hours and 5 days for a person to show symptoms after consuming contaminated food or water. Cholera affects both children and adults and can kill within hours if untreated.
Most people infected with
Vibrio cholerae
do not develop any symptoms, although the bacteria are present in their faeces for 1-10 days after infection. This means the bacteria are shed back into the environment, potentially infecting other people.
Cholera is often predictable and preventable. It can ultimately be eliminated where access to clean water and sanitation facilities, as well as good hygiene practices, are ensured and sustained for the whole population.","Measures for the prevention of cholera mostly consist of providing clean water and proper sanitation to populations who do not yet have access to basic services, as well as vaccination with Oral Cholera Vaccines. Health education and good food hygiene are also essential.
Communities should be reminded of basic hygienic behaviours. These include the need to always wash hands with soap after defecation and before handling food or eating, as well as safe preparation and conservation of food. Strengthening surveillance and early warning systems are important measures to allow detection of the first cases in an outbreak and to put in place control measures as quickly as possible.
Preventing and controlling cholera requires interventions beyond the health sector and it is vital to engage with partners across other sectors. The development and implementation of multi-sectoral cholera control plans is a useful mechanism to bring together all relevant sectors, and forge lines of communication and coordination that are valuable beyond cholera control.","Since the creation of the global stockpile in 2013, more than 50 million doses of Oral cholera vaccines (OCV) have been successfully used in various settings through mass campaigns. OCV is a tool that is used in addition to classic cholera control measures. It should be systematically considered in both endemic cholera hotspots as well as during outbreaks and emergencies.
OCV are safe and effective and are just one tool in a much larger toolbox that includes sustainable safe water, sanitation, and hygiene (WASH), but serve as a critical bridge to these longer-term efforts."
Chronic respiratory diseases,https://www.who.int/health-topics/chronic-respiratory-diseases,"Chronic respiratory diseases (CRDs) affect the airways and other structures of the lungs. Some of the most common are chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), asthma, occupational lung diseases and pulmonary hypertension. In addition to tobacco smoke, other risk factors include air pollution, occupational chemicals and dusts, and frequent lower respiratory infections during childhood. CRDs are not curable; however, various forms of treatment that help open the air passages and improve shortness of breath can help control symptoms and improve daily  life for people living with these conditions. The WHO Global Alliance against CRDs (GARD) vision is “a world in which all people breathe freely”. GARD focuses on the needs of people with CRDs in low- and middle-income countries.
The aim of the WHO Chronic Respiratory Diseases Programme is to support Member States in their efforts to reduce the toll of morbidity, disability and premature mortality related to chronic respiratory diseases, specifically asthma and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.","The two most common chronic respiratory diseases are asthma and chronic
obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). These both affect the airways in the
lungs.
Asthma is characterized by recurrent attacks of breathlessness and wheezing
due to airway narrowing, which vary in severity and frequency from person to
person. Symptoms may occur several times in a day or week in affected
individuals, and for some people become worse during physical activity or at
night. Asthma is the most common chronic disease among children.
In asthma, the airway obstruction is reversible with inhaled medicines, but
in COPD it is mostly fixed. COPD only affects adults and usually becomes worse
with time. The most common symptoms of COPD are breathlessness or a need for
air, sputum production and a chronic cough.
Risk factors for chronic respiratory diseases include tobacco smoking
(including second-hand smoke), air pollution, allergens and occupational risks.
Outdoor air pollution and indoor air pollution (often caused by cooking with
solid fuels) are also common causes.
Asthma and COPD may be prevented by reducing or avoiding exposure to these
risk factors.","Neither asthma nor chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) can be cured
but treatment can reduce symptoms, prevent deterioration and improve daily life.
During attacks of breathlessness caused by airway narrowing, inhaled
medicines (bronchodilators) can open the airways and relieve symptoms. If
untreated, severe attacks can lead to death.
Appropriate management of asthma with inhaled corticosteroid medicine can
control the progression of the disease and reduce deaths. Long-term treatment
is required for people with persistent symptoms and exposures which trigger
symptoms (e.g. smoke, fumes, dust, grass and tree pollen, animal fur and
feathers) should be avoided.
Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease is confirmed by a spirometry test,
which measures how much and how quickly a person can blow air out of their
lungs. Symptoms can be treated through medical and physical treatments;
however, with COPD in people who smoke tobacco, the most effective treatment
available is to stop smoking. This can slow down the progression of the disease
and decrease COPD-related deaths. In specific cases, people may benefit from using
inhaled corticosteroid medicines."
Climate change,https://www.who.int/health-topics/climate-change,"Climate change is impacting human lives and health in a variety of ways. It threatens the essential ingredients of good health – clean air, safe drinking water, nutritious food supply and safe shelter – and has the potential to undermine decades of progress in global health.
Between 2030 and 2050, climate change is expected to cause approximately 250 000 additional deaths per year from malnutrition, malaria, diarrhoea and heat stress alone. The direct damage costs to health are estimated to be between US$ 2–4 billion per year by 2030. Areas with weak health infrastructure – mostly in developing countries – will be the least able to cope without assistance to prepare and respond.
Greenhouse gas emissions that result from the extraction and burning of fossil fuels are major contributors to both climate
change
and air pollution. Many policies and individual measures, such as transport, food and energy use choices, have the potential to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and produce major health co-benefits, particularly by abating air pollution. The phase out of polluting energy systems, for example, or the promotion of public transportation and active movement, could both lower carbon emissions and cut the burden of household and ambient air pollution, which cause 7 million premature deaths per year","Climate change is already impacting health in a myriad of ways, including by leading to death and illness from increasingly frequent extreme weather events, such as heatwaves, storms and floods, the disruption of food systems, increases in zoonoses and food-, water- and vector-borne diseases, and mental health issues. Furthermore, climate change is undermining many of the social determinants for good health, such as livelihoods, equality and access to health care and social support structures. These climate-sensitive health risks are disproportionately felt by the most vulnerable and disadvantaged, including women, children, ethnic minorities, poor communities, migrants or displaced persons, older populations and those with underlying health conditions.
In the short to medium term, the health impacts of climate change will be determined mainly by the vulnerability of populations, their resilience to the current rate of climate change and the extent and pace of adaptation. In the longer term, the effects will increasingly depend on the extent to which transformational action is taken now to reduce emissions and avoid the breaching of dangerous temperature thresholds and potential irreversible tipping points.","WHO supports countries in building climate-resilient health systems and tracking national progress in protecting health from climate change, as well as in assessing the health gains that would result from the implementation of the existing Nationally Determined Contributions to the Paris Agreement, and the potential for larger gains from more ambitious climate action.
WHO’s work plan on climate change and health includes:
advocacy and partnerships: coordinating with partner agencies within the UN system, and ensuring that health is properly represented in the climate change agenda, as well as providing and disseminating information on the threats that climate change presents to human health and opportunities to promote health while cutting carbon emissions;
monitoring science and evidence: coordinating reviews of the scientific evidence on the links between climate change and health; assessing country's preparedness and needs when facing climate change; and developing a global research agenda;
supporting countries to protect human health from climate change: strengthening national capacities and improving the resilience and adaptive capacity of health systems to deal with the adverse health effects of climate change; and
building capacity on climate change and human health: assisting countries to build capacity to reduce health vulnerability to climate change and promoting health while reducing carbon emissions."
Clinical trials,https://www.who.int/health-topics/clinical-trials,"Clinical trials are a type of research that studies new tests and treatments and evaluates their effects on human health outcomes. People volunteer to take part in clinical trials to test medical interventions including drugs, cells and other biological products, surgical procedures, radiological procedures, devices, behavioural treatments and preventive care.
Clinical trials are carefully designed, reviewed and completed, and need to be approved before they can start. People of all ages can take part in clinical trials, including children.
There are 4 phases of biomedical clinical trials:
Phase I studies usually test new drugs for the first time in a small group of people to evaluate a safe dosage range and identify side effects.
Phase II studies test treatments that have been found to be safe in phase I but now need a larger group of human subjects to monitor for any adverse effects.
Phase III studies are conducted on larger populations and in different regions and countries, and are often the step right before a new treatment is approved.
Phase IV studies take place after country approval and there is a need for further testing in a wide population over a longer timeframe.","Clinical trials usually involve participants from more than one medical or research institution, and often more than one country. As each country has its own requirements for clinical trials research it is possible that single trials could be included on more than one registry, and hence appear on more than one registry database. However, data on various clinical trial registries varies.
WHO’s International Clinical Trials Registry Platform (ICTRP) links clinical trials registers globally in order to ensure a single point of access and the unambiguous identification of trials with a view to enhancing access to information by patients, families, patient groups and others.
The ICTRP is a global initiative that aims to make information about all clinical trials involving humans publicly available. It also aims to:
improve the comprehensiveness, completeness and accuracy of registered clinical trial data;
communicate and raise awareness of the need to register clinical trials;
ensure the accessibility of registered data;
build capacity for clinical trial registration;
encourage the utilization of registered data; and
ensure the sustainability of the ICTRP.",N/A
Commercial determinants of health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/commercial-determinants-of-health,"Commercial determinants of health (CDoH) are the private sector activities impacting public health, either positively or negatively, and the enabling political economic systems and norms.
CDoH includes all products and services provided by private entities to gain a financial profit, as well as market strategies, working conditions, production externalities and political activities, such as misinformation, lobbying and donations. Some parts of the private sector also use instrumental, structural and discursive power to undermine public health policies that threaten profits.
Commercial activities, especially by transnational corporations, affect non-communicable disease, infectious diseases and pandemics, injuries and climate change. These impacts also worsen inequities between and within countries. Profit shifting and the aggressive use of trade agreements by the unhealthy commodity industries are particularly detrimental to the global south.
Simultaneously, the private sector is an indispensable partner for development by, for example, creating vaccines, medicines and assistive products, financing, building infrastructure and delivering health services towards Universal Health Coverage, or by ensuring food security. Member States should work to leverage these opportunities while protecting populations from harm.
Communities, civil society organizations, governments at all levels, philanthropists and, where aligned, the private sector, must work together to achieve health for all. This requires addressing CDoH through conflict of interest, regulative, legal, economic, whole-of-government and geopolitical reforms.","The commercial determinants of health (CDoH) can negatively impact health, wellbeing, equity and health-systems. For example, half of all tobacco consumers will die from health issues related to these products, with annual deaths hitting 8 million. Many others are harmed by the actions of the alcohol, fast-food and sugar-sweetened beverage industries. Additionally, 20% of suicides are related to pesticide product self-poisoning. These especially affect disadvantaged population groups and low- and middle- income countries.
CDoH also have health promoting and protective effects. Nearly 2 billion people will need assistive devices by 2050, greatly improving wellbeing. Installing and mandating the use of safety devices such as seatbelts, child restraints or helmets significantly reduces serious and fatal injuries. Pharmaceuticals and vaccines have significant effects, with the measles vaccines alone preventing 25.5 million deaths since 2000.
There are also broader existential and societal impacts. Industry action drives climate change while also preventing meaningful action. Around 66% of all antimicrobials are used in agricultural practices, worsening antimicrobial resistance and creating further pandemic risks.
Other evidence has shown exposure to long working hours was the key occupational risk, attributable to approximately 750 000 out of 1.9 million work-related deaths in 2016. Finally, privatization, deregulation and tax avoidance can worsen public services and increase inequities.","WHO urges Member States to address the commercial determinants of health (CDoH) to improve health and health equity, thereby leveraging the benefits while protecting populations from harm.
On a microlevel, this includes taxation, fiscal policies and meaningful government regulations on advertising, promotion and sponsorship of harmful products. Millions of lives have been saved thanks to the control policies under the WHO Framework Convention on Tobacco Control and MPOWER.
Member States should collaborate to address structural elements of CDoH, including the national and global political, economic, legal, financial and trade systems that enable and promote detrimental corporate practice. This broader agenda means repositioning social outcomes ahead of profit through alternative economic models and metrics, and reforming governance, including lobbying, donations and conflict of interest management.
The private sector can promote health and well-being. During the COVID-19 pandemic, several entertainment companies joined WHO in partnerships to prevent the spread of the virus.
Governments are also encouraged to ensure the equitable availability of those commercial products and services that promote or improve health and well-being.
Civil society organizations can lead this action, enhancing transparency, accountability and harnessing citizen power to set progressive agendas. This can motivate government regulation and directly on the private sector to eliminate the harmful and enhance favourable impacts of their activities."
Common goods for health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/common-goods-for-health,"Common goods for health are population-based functions or interventions that require collective financing, either from governments or donors based on the following conditions:
Contribute to health and economic progress;
There is a clear economic rationale for interventions based on market failures, with focus on (i) Public Goods (Non-Rival, Non-Exclusionary) or (ii) large social externalities.
These common goods for health are fundamental to protecting and promoting health and well-being. Due to the broad-based benefits of these goods, related externalities, and often multisectoral nature, targeted action and investments are necessary by both governments and the global community.
Common goods for health generally fall into five categories:
Policy and Coordination (ex. disease control policies and strategies)
Taxes and Subsidies (ex. taxes on products with impact on health to create market signals leading to behaviour change)
Regulations and Legislation (ex. environmental regulations and guidelines)
Information, analysis & communication* (ex. surveillance systems)
Population Services* (ex. medical and solid waste management)
*Some may have private goods characteristics and related private financing in certain circumstances.","The common goods for health functions and interventions have been grouped into five categories explained below to provide greater clarity for formulating budgets, plans and implementation arrangements.
Planning and coordination
The formation of national policies, institutional capacities and coordination mechanism across sectors and levels of government. These must be inclusive of all groups and will need to be monitored and formally linked with national budgetary processes.
Regulation and legislation
Refers to use of a government’s coercive power to impose constraints on organizations and individuals. It includes the full range of legal instruments (such as laws, decrees, orders, codes, administrative rules and guidelines).
Taxes and subsidies
Financial instruments that influence individual and market behaviour, which can have a considerable impact on population health.
Information collection, analysis and communication
Involves the collection and analyses of information, and the monitoring of population-level change through a comprehensive and centrally-coordinated information system.
Population services
Services that impact all of society and are fundamental to public health (such as water and sanitation, waste management, vector control and emergency response operations), but which markets either do not provide or under-provide.","Common goods for health are essential to building national and global health security and for making progress towards universal health coverage, including preventing and mitigating epidemic and environmental threats to societies. Well-functioning health systems rely on strong governance, clear regulations and standards, population-based services and coordinated policies, all of which are common goods for health. Common goods for heath provide the economic rationale for why it is necessary for governments to invest in
International Health Regulation 2005
capacities for health security and critical functions to ensure progress towards universal health coverage.
The common goods for health agenda must be integrated into annual and multiyear budget dialogues as well as health financing and national budget reform dialogues. Financing these cross-cutting functions requires pooled resources, as well as coordination across relevant sectors. Medium-term expenditure frameworks can aid in this coordination and can make sure common goods for health are prioritized over time and across levels of government, even in the face of fiscal and political constraints. Some countries may adjust their public financial management to expand and reprioritize budgetary space to allow funds to flow to these functions."
Complementary feeding,https://www.who.int/health-topics/complementary-feeding,"Around the age of 6 months, an infant’s need for energy and nutrients starts to exceed what is provided by breast milk, and complementary foods are necessary to meet those needs. An infant of this age is also developmentally ready for other foods.
This transition is referred to as complementary feeding.
If complementary foods are not introduced around the age of 6 months, or if they are given inappropriately, an infant’s growth may falter.
Ensuring that infants nutritional needs are met requires that complementary foods be:
timely
– meaning that they are introduced when the need for energy and nutrients exceeds what can be provided through exclusive breastfeeding;
adequate
– meaning that they provide sufficient energy, protein and micronutrients to meet a growing child’s nutritional needs;
safe
– meaning that they are hygienically stored and prepared, and fed with clean hands using clean utensils and not bottles and teats;
properly fed
– meaning that they are given consistent with a child’s signals of appetite and satiety, and that meal frequency and feeding are suitable for age.
Caregivers should take active care in the feeding of infants by being responsive to the child’s clues for hunger and also encouraging the child to eat.","WHO recommends that infants start receiving complementary foods at 6 months of age in addition to breast milk. Initially, they should receive complementary foods 2–3 times a day between 6–8 months and increase to 3–4 times daily between 9–11 months and 12–24 months. Additional nutritious snacks should also be offered 1–2 times per day for ages 12–24 months, as desired.
Gradually increase food consistency and variety as the infant gets older, adapting to the infant’s requirements and abilities. Infants can eat pureed, mashed and semi-solid foods beginning at 6 months. By 8 months most infants can also eat “finger foods” (snacks that can be eaten by children alone).
By 12 months, most children can eat the same types of foods as consumed by the rest of the family, while keeping in mind the need for nutrient-dense foods, including animal-sourced foods like meat, poultry, fish, eggs and dairy products.
Avoid foods in a form that may cause choking, such as whole grapes or raw carrots. Avoid giving drinks with low nutrient value, such as tea, coffee and sugary soft drinks. Limit the amount of juice offered, to avoid displacing more nutrient-rich foods.","WHO is committed to support countries with implementation and monitoring of the ""
Comprehensive implementation plan on maternal, infant and young child nutrition
”, which includes 6 targets, including reducing the number of children under-5 who are stunted by 40% by 2025. The ""
Global strategy for infant and young child feeding
"", also aims to protect, promote and support appropriate infant and young child feeding.
Appropriate complementary feeding depends on accurate information and skilled support from the family, community and health care system. WHO works with Member States to ensure key populations have adequate knowledge about appropriate foods and feeding practices in order to prevent malnutrition.
WHO developed the guide ""
Complementary feeding: family foods for breastfed children
"", which gives more detailed guidance for health workers on how to support complementary feeding. The guidelines are also included as part of WHO’s Infant and young child feeding counselling course and the Complementary feeding counselling course for health workers."
Congenital disorders,https://www.who.int/health-topics/congenital-anomalies,"Congenital disorders can be defined as structural or functional anomalies
that occur during intrauterine life. Also called birth defects, congenital anomalies
or congenital malformations, these conditions develop prenatally and may be
identified before or at birth, or later in life. An estimated 6% of babies
worldwide are born with a congenital disorder, resulting in hundreds of
thousands of associated deaths. However, the true number of cases may be much
higher because statistics do not often consider terminated pregnancies and
stillbirths.
Some congenital disorders can be treated with surgical and non-surgical
options, such as cleft lip and palate, clubfoot and hernias. Others, including
heart defects, neural tube defects, and down syndrome, can cause lifelong
impacts.
Congenital disorders are one of the main causes of the global burden of
disease, and low- and middle-income countries are disproportionately affected.
These areas are also less likely to have facilities to treat reversible conditions
such as clubfoot, leading to more pronounced and long-lasting effects.","Approximately 50% of
congenital disorders cannot be linked to a specific cause. However, known
causes include single gene defects, chromosomal disorders, multifactorial
inheritance, environmental teratogens and micronutrient deficiencies. Genetic
causes can be traced to inherited genes or from mutations. Consanguinity – when
parents are related by blood – increases the risk of congenital anomalies and
nearly doubles the risk of neonatal and early childhood death, intellectual
disability and other health conditions. Advanced maternal age also increases
the risk of chromosomal abnormalities, including Down syndrome. Some diseases
are known to cause increases in rates of congenital disorders including Zika
virus, syphilis and rubella. Other anomalies, such as cystic fibrosis and
haemophilia C, are more prevalent in specific ethnic communities.
The vast majority
(94%) of congenital disorders occur in low- and middle-income countries.
Possible causes include lack of screening and prenatal care, insufficient
access to nutritious foods for pregnant women, use or contact with alcohol or
tobacco, and increased exposure to infection or environmental
contaminants.
Some congenital disorders
can be prevented through screening, vaccination, fortification of staple foods
with nutrients such as folic acid and iodine, and adequate antenatal care,
among other methods.","Around the world each year, an estimated 295 000 newborns die before
reaching 4 weeks of age due to congenital disorders and associated
complications.
Congenital anomalies can contribute to life-long disability and health
conditions. Over 50% of disability-adjusted life years (DALYs) lost each year
due to congenital disorders could be prevented with prompt surgery or other treatment.
For example, 100 000 babies are born each year with clubfoot, which can be
easily corrected. Left untreated, however, this condition can cause severe and
permanent disability.
Many congenital disorders result in social stigma and discrimination, which
can lead to embarrassment, isolation and other reductions in community
interaction. These conditions also have a high economic cost; long-term
disability creates significant impact on individuals, families, health care
systems and societies. These effects are amplified in low- and middle-income
countries where lack of accessibility and availability of support services may
make living with an impairment more difficult."
Contraception,https://www.who.int/health-topics/contraception,"Family planning allows people to attain their desired number of children, if any, and to determine the spacing of their pregnancies. It is achieved through use of contraceptive methods and the treatment of infertility.
Contraceptive information and services are fundamental to the health and human rights of all individuals.
The prevention of unintended pregnancies helps to lower maternal ill-health and the number of pregnancy-related deaths. Delaying pregnancies in young girls who are at increased risk of health problems from early childbearing, and preventing pregnancies among older women who also face increased risks, are important health benefits of family planning.
By reducing rates of unintended pregnancies, contraception also reduces the need for unsafe abortion and reduces HIV transmissions from mothers to newborns. This can also benefit the education of girls and create opportunities for women to participate more fully in society, including paid employment.
According to 2023 estimates, 257 million women of reproductive age have an unmet need for contraception. Reasons for this include:
limited access to contraception
a limited choice of methods
a fear or experience of side-effects
cultural or religious opposition
poor quality of available services
gender-based barriers.","It is important that family planning is widely available and easily accessible through trained health workers to anyone who is sexually active, including adolescents.
There are many cadres of health care workers who are trained to provide (where authorised) locally available and culturally acceptable contraceptive methods including doctors and midwives. Other trained health workers, for example community health workers,
also provide counselling and some family planning methods, for example pills and condoms. For methods such as sterilization, women and men need to be referred to a clinician.
The Sustainable Development Goals set for 2030 will need to ensure that sexual and reproductive health services are widely available and used. This includes supporting contraceptive services through effective government policies and the provision of high-quality
services for individuals.
WHO is working to promote contraception by producing evidence-based guidelines on safety and service delivery of contraceptive methods and on ensuring human rights in contraceptive programmes. It is also developing quality standards and providing pre-qualification
of contraceptive commodities.
WHO assists countries to adapt and implement these tools to strengthen contraceptive policies and programmes. Additionally, WHO participates in developing new contraceptive technologies to and leads and conducts implementation research for expanding access
to and strengthening delivery contraceptive information and services.","There are many different types of contraception, with varying rates of effectiveness depending on correct usage. Some methods may be obtained over the counter, others may require medical advice or even surgical intervention.
Health care providers play an important role in helping people find and use a method that is both effective and acceptable. Methods include:
Hormonal contraceptive methods
Usually oral pills or implants, patches or vaginal rings. They release small amounts of one or more hormones which prevent ovulation.
Intrauterine devices (IUDs)
Devices inserted into the uterus where they release either a copper component or a small amount of a hormone (Levnorgesterol) to prevent the sperm from reaching the egg.
Emergency contraception
It is possible to prevent pregnancy after unprotected sex or if contraception has failed, either with a pill or with an IUD. There is a five-day window for this.
Condoms
Male condoms sheath a penis. Female condoms fit loosely inside a vagina. Both form a barrier that prevent sperm and egg from meeting. 
Sterilization
Considered a permanent method that blocks sperm in men and eggs in women. Voluntary and informed choice is essential.
Lactational amenorrhea method
A temporary method of contraception for new mothers whose monthly bleeding has not returned. During this period, eggs are not released and so pregnancy cannot occur."
Coronavirus disease (COVID-19),https://www.who.int/health-topics/coronavirus,"Coronavirus disease (COVID-19) is an infectious disease caused by the SARS-CoV-2 virus.
Most people infected with the virus will experience mild to moderate respiratory illness and recover without requiring special treatment. However, some will become seriously ill and require medical attention. Older people and those with underlying medical conditions like cardiovascular disease, diabetes, chronic respiratory disease, or cancer are more likely to develop serious illness. Anyone can get sick with COVID-19 and become seriously ill or die at any age.
The best way to prevent and slow down transmission is to be well informed about the disease and how the virus spreads. Protect yourself and others from infection by staying at least 1 metre apart from others, wearing a properly fitted mask, and washing your hands or using an alcohol-based rub frequently. Get vaccinated when it’s your turn and follow local guidance.
The virus can spread from an infected person’s mouth or nose in small liquid particles when they cough, sneeze, speak, sing or breathe. These particles range from larger respiratory droplets to smaller aerosols. It is important to practice respiratory etiquette, for example by coughing into a flexed elbow, and to stay home and self-isolate until you recover if you feel unwell.
Stay informed:
Advice for the public
Myth busters
Questions and answers
Situation reports
All information on the COVID-19 outbreak","To prevent infection and to slow transmission of COVID-19, do the following:
Get vaccinated when a vaccine is available to you.
Stay at least 1 metre apart from others, even if they don’t appear to be sick.
Wear a properly fitted mask when physical distancing is not possible or when in poorly ventilated settings.
Choose open, well-ventilated spaces over closed ones. Open a window if indoors.
Wash your hands regularly with soap and water or clean them with alcohol-based hand rub.
Cover your mouth and nose when coughing or sneezing.
If you feel unwell, stay home and self-isolate until you recover.","COVID-19 affects different people in different ways. Most infected people will develop mild to moderate illness and recover without hospitalization.
Most common symptoms:
fever
cough
tiredness
loss of taste or smell.
Less common symptoms:
sore throat
headache
aches and pains
diarrhoea
a rash on skin, or discolouration of fingers or toes
red or irritated eyes.
Serious symptoms:
difficulty breathing or shortness of breath
loss of speech or mobility, or confusion
chest pain.
Seek immediate medical attention if you have serious symptoms.  Always call before visiting your doctor or health facility.
People with mild symptoms who are otherwise healthy should manage their symptoms at home.
On average it takes 5–6 days from when someone is infected with the virus for symptoms to show, however it can take up to 14 days."
Crimean-Congo haemorrhagic fever,https://www.who.int/health-topics/crimean-congo-haemorrhagic-fever,"Crimean-Congo haemorrhagic fever (CCHF) is a viral haemorrhagic fever usually transmitted by ticks. It can also be contracted through contact with viraemic animal tissues (animal tissue where the virus has entered the bloodstream) during and immediately post-slaughter
    of animals. CCHF outbreaks constitute a threat to public health services as the virus can lead to epidemics, has a high case fatality ratio (10–40%), potentially results in hospital and health facility outbreaks, and is difficult to prevent and treat.
    CCHF is endemic in all of Africa, the Balkans, the Middle East and in Asia.
The disease was first described in the Crimean Peninsula in 1944 and given the name Crimean haemorrhagic fever. In 1969 it was recognized that the pathogen causing Crimean haemorrhagic fever was the same as that responsible for an illness identified in 1956 in the
    Congo Basin. The linkage of the two place names resulted in the current name for the disease and the virus.","Following infection by a tick bite, the incubation period of Crimean-Congo haemorrhagic fever (CCHF) is usually 1–3 days, with a maximum of 9 days. Following contact with infected blood or tissues, the incubation period is usually 5–6 days, with a maximum of 13 days.
Onset of symptoms is sudden and can include fever, muscle ache, dizziness, neck pain, backache, headache, sore eyes and photophobia (sensitivity to light). There may be nausea, vomiting, diarrhoea,
    abdominal pain and sore throat early on, followed by sharp mood swings and confusion. After 2–4 days the agitation may be replaced by sleepiness, depression and lassitude, and the abdominal pain may localize to the upper right quadrant, with
    detectable hepatomegaly (liver enlargement).
Other clinical signs include tachycardia (fast heart rate), lymphadenopathy (enlarged lymph nodes), and a petechial rash (a rash caused by bleeding into the skin) on internal mucosal surfaces, such as in the mouth and throat, and
    on the skin. The petechiae may give way to larger rashes called ecchymoses, and other haemorrhagic phenomena. There is usually evidence of hepatitis, and severely ill patients may experience rapid kidney deterioration, sudden liver failure or pulmonary
    failure after the fifth day of illness.","General supportive care with treatment of symptoms is the main approach to managing Crimean-Congo haemorrhagic fever (CCHF) in people. The antiviral drug ribavirin has been used to treat CCHF infection with apparent benefit. Both oral and intravenous
    formulations seem to be effective.
The mortality rate from CCHF is approximately 30%, with death occurring in the second week of illness. In patients who recover, improvement generally begins on the ninth or tenth day after the onset of illness.
It is difficult to prevent or control CCHF infection in animals and ticks as the tick-animal-tick cycle usually goes unnoticed and the infection in domestic animals is usually not apparent. Furthermore, the tick vectors are numerous and widespread, so
    tick control with acaricides (chemicals intended to kill ticks) is only a realistic option for well-managed livestock production facilities.
There are no vaccines widely available for human or animal use. In the absence of a vaccine, the only way to reduce infection in people is by raising awareness of the risk factors and educating people about the measures they can take to reduce exposure
    to the virus."
Deafness and hearing loss,https://www.who.int/health-topics/hearing-loss,"A person is said to have hearing loss if they are not able to hear as well as someone with normal hearing, meaning hearing thresholds of 20 dB or better in both ears. It can be mild, moderate, moderately severe, severe or profound, and can affect one or both ears. Major causes of hearing loss include congenital or early onset childhood hearing loss, chronic middle ear infections, noise-induced hearing loss, age-related hearing loss, and ototoxic drugs that damage the inner ear.
The impacts of hearing loss are broad and can be profound. They include a loss of the ability to communicate with others delayed language development in children, which can lead to social isolation, loneliness and frustration, particularly among older people with hearing loss. Many areas lack sufficient accommodations for hearing loss, which effect academic performance and options for employment. Children with hearing loss and deafness in developing countries rarely receive any schooling. WHO estimates that unaddressed hearing loss costs the global economy US$ 980 billion annually due to health sector costs (excluding the cost of hearing devices), costs of educational support, loss of productivity and societal costs.","Deafness and hearing loss are widespread and found in every
region and country. Currently
more than 1.5 billion people (nearly 20% of the global population) live with hearing
loss; 430 million of them have disabling hearing loss. It is expected that by
2050, there could be over 700 million people with disabling hearing loss.
Globally, 34 million children have deafness or hearing loss, of
which 60% of cases are due to preventable causes. At the other end of the
lifespan, approximately 30% of people over 60 years of age have hearing loss.
Many of the impacts of hearing loss can be mitigated through
early detection and interventions. These include specialized education programs
and sign language instruction for young children and their families. Assistive
technologies, including hearing aids, cochlear implants, closed captioning and
other devices can help people with hearing loss at any age. People may also
benefit from speech therapy, aural rehabilitation and other related services.
Low- and middle-income countries bear a disproportionate burden
from hearing loss. WHO estimates that global hearing aid production covers just
3% of the need in these countries.","WHO estimates that 50% of hearing loss can be prevented through public health measures. Some prevention strategies target individual lifestyle choices such as exposure to loud sounds and music or wearing protective equipment such as earplugs. This can be assisted through implementing audio standards for personal audio systems and devices.
Further reductions in hearing loss can be gained through screening and early interventions in childhood, including application of assistive technologies or surgical options. Screenings can also prevent the use of damaging pharmaceuticals in high-risk cases.
Hearing loss and deafness can also occur as a complication of other diseases such as measles, meningitis, rubella and mumps. Work to prevent these diseases through vaccination and hygiene programs can have a beneficial impact on rates of hearing loss and deafness. Immunizing adolescent girls and women of reproductive age against rubella before pregnancy, and preventing cytomegalovirus infections in pregnant women, can reduce the risk of babies born with congenital hearing loss or deafness."
Deliberate events,https://www.who.int/health-topics/deliberate-events,"Deliberate events (DEs) are malicious act with intentions to cause harm to the target. Traditionally, DEs involve the use of hazardous substances such as chemicals, biological agents, toxins or radio-nuclear materials (CBRN) while emerging threats include disinformation, misuse of digital, cyber means and other new technologies.
DEs can cause harm in several ways, for example through the intentional release of a harmful material or a dangerous pathogen directly targeting humans and/or animals, or indirectly through contaminating food or water, destroying crops or damaging the environment.
Addressing DEs involves both health and security dimensions. The health sector’s role is to protect and manage the health and well-being of those at risk of or affected by DEs. The security sector and law enforcement’s role is to identify and control the source of the DE and prevent the situation from worsening (see
Strengthening the global health-security interface
).
Preparing for DEs is an integral part of developing and updating national emergency preparedness and response plans. The work of WHO focuses on increasing Member States’ awareness, preparedness and readiness related to DEs and developing the Organization’s capacity to coordinate the international public health response to a DE.","Preparing for deliberate events (DEs) is an integral part of developing and updating national emergency preparedness and response plans. WHO advises Member States to 1) strengthen public health surveillance and preparedness activities and to 2) link public health and security authorities to prepare for possible DEs, with an emphasis on:
evaluating and identifying gaps in national preparedness and readiness, as well as national capacities to manage risks posed by deliberate exposure to hazardous materials, disinformation or cyberattacks. This could be done by using the section dedicated to DE
(1)
of the National Self-Assessment toolkit (NSAT), which provides a baseline measurement of national capacity and capabilities related to DEs. NSAT is typically used in
preparation for a Joint External Evaluation (JEE)
or as part of a
National Action Plan for Health Security (NAPHS)
;
developing training material packages for online (
OpenWHO course series
) and in-person sessions;
identifying and recommending actions to fill gaps in readiness by conducting DE simulation exercises in collaboration with relevant partners;
developing national, sub-national or local stockpile systems to provide deployable pharmaceuticals, supplies and equipment to support rapid national response operations; and
putting in place national protocols or formal agreements to work with partners and benefit from international assistance for responses.
Beta-version available for test use. Please request by sending an e-mail to:
BSP@who.int","Similar to non-deliberate event response, WHO experts can be deployed at country, regional and global levels to support the DE response upon the request of the affected Member State(s). Specific WHO response activities specific to DEs include:
working with international or national partners and laboratories to characterize the nature, scope, and impact of the DE;
offering targeted training to public health and frontline responders;
facilitating the identification and acquisition of necessary response materials (such as personal protective equipment or medical countermeasures) and providing medical countermeasures in certain circumstances; and
coordinating additional international expert support through WHO Networks including the Global Outbreak and Response Network (GOARN), WHO Collaborating Centres, or the UN Humanitarian Emergency Cluster system. WHO can join the United Nations Secretary-General’s mechanism (UNSGM) in very specific cases.
The nature and cause of an event may not be clear when the response is initiated and may or may not be conclusively determined over time. WHO does not have mandate to lead or investigate an attribution process, though WHO may collaborate with and support other entities whose role is to determine the identity of the perpetrators of a DE."
Dementia,https://www.who.int/health-topics/dementia,"Dementia is an umbrella term for several diseases affecting memory, other cognitive abilities and behaviour that interfere significantly with a person’s ability to maintain their activities of daily living. Although age is the strongest known risk factor for dementia, it is not a normal part of ageing.
WHO is working very closely with Member States and other relevant stakeholders to improve the lives of people with dementia and their carers, while decreasing the impact of dementia on communities and countries.","Currently more than 55 million people have dementia worldwide, over 60% of whom live in low-and middle-income countries. Every year, there are nearly 10 million new cases.
Dementia is one of the major causes of disability and dependency among older people worldwide. It can be overwhelming, not only for people who have dementia, but also for their carers and families, who globally provide the majority of care and support.
There is often a lack of awareness and understanding of dementia, resulting in stigmatization and barriers to diagnosis and care. The impact of dementia on carers, family and society at large can be physical, psychological, social and economic.","WHO recognizes dementia as a public health priority. In May 2017, the World Health Assembly endorsed the
Global action plan on the public health response to dementia 2017-2025
. The global action plan aims to improve the lives of people with dementia, their families and carers, while decreasing the impact of dementia on communities and countries.
It provides a comprehensive blueprint for action across seven areas: (1) making dementia a public health priority, (2) increasing dementia awareness, inclusion and friendliness; (3) reducing the risk of dementia; (4) improving diagnosis, treatment and care; (5) supporting dementia carers, (6) enhancing health information systems for dementia and (7) fostering research and innovation."
Dengue and severe dengue,https://www.who.int/health-topics/dengue-and-severe-dengue,"Dengue is a mosquito-borne viral infection that is common in warm, tropical climates. Infection is caused by any one of four closely related dengue viruses (called serotypes) and these can lead to a wide spectrum of symptoms, including some which are
    extremely mild (unnoticeable) to those that may require medical intervention and hospitalization. In severe cases, fatalities can occur. There is no treatment for the infection itself but the symptoms that a patient experiences can be managed.
Earlier
this year, WHO listed dengue as a potential threat among ten diseases for 2019 and current outbreaks in many countries confirm this observation. Dengue epidemics tend to have seasonal patterns, with transmission often peaking
during and after rainy seasons
. There are several factors contributing to this increase and they include high mosquito population levels, susceptibility to circulating serotypes, favourable
air temperatures
, precipitation and humidity, all of which affect the reproduction
        and feeding patterns of mosquito populations, as well as the dengue virus incubation period. Lack of proactive control interventions and staff are some of the other challenges.","Dengue is a self-limiting febrile illness with symptoms ranging from asymptomatic to severe. Symptoms of dengue may be observed around 4–10 days after the bite of an infected mosquito. Common symptoms are like that of the flu, with patients experiencing:
fever
headaches
pain behind the eyes
muscle and joint pain
nausea/vomiting
rash
fatigue.
As the disease progresses, patients can also suffer from respiratory distress, bleeding from the nose and gums and have a rapid drop in blood pressure leading to shock. If left unmanaged, this can lead to death. Sound case management of dengue in hospitals has helped to reduce case fatality rates to less than 1% in most affected countries.
Dengue is increasing at a higher rate than any
other communicable disease, with 400% increase over 13 years (2000–2013).
Annual dengue incidence is estimated to be in the order of 100 million
symptomatic cases a year, with another ~300 million asymptomatic infections.
The greatest burden is seen in Asia (75%) followed by Latin America and
Africa.","There are no specific vaccines or antiviral treatments against dengue fever. Use of paracetamol to bring down the fever is indicated. Aspirin and related non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIs) such as ibuprofen should be avoided.
Recovery from infection by one dengue virus provides lifelong immunity against that particular virus serotype. However, this immunity confers only partial and transient protection against subsequent infection by the other three serotypes of the virus. Evidence points to the fact that sequential infection increases the risk of developing severe dengue. The time interval between infections and the particular viral sequence of infections may also be of importance.
The best way to prevent infection is to avoid being bitten by mosquitoes during daytime. Mosquitoes that commonly transmit dengue virus often live in and around the home and in the garden. People should:
wear clothing that covers the body well (especially legs and feet);
keep mosquitoes out of the house by placing insect screens over doors and windows;
apply insect repellents according to the manufacturer’s label instructions;
sleep under a net, even during the day; and
take extra precaution to prevent transmission if a family member is infected by avoiding mosquito bites."
Depression,https://www.who.int/health-topics/depression,"Depressive disorder, or depression, is a common mental health condition that can happen to anyone. It is characterized by a low mood or loss of pleasure or interest in activities for long periods of time.
This is different from regular mood changes and feelings about everyday life. Depressive episodes last most of the day, nearly every day, for at least two weeks. People with depression may experience disturbed sleep and changes to their appetite. They may have feelings of low self-worth, thoughts about dying and hopelessness about the future. Tiredness and poor concentration are also common.
Depression results from a complex interaction of social, psychological and biological factors. People who have lived through abuse, severe losses or other adverse events are more likely to develop depression. Problems at school and work can also result in depression.
Prevention programmes have been shown to reduce depression. There are also effective psychological treatments and medications for depression. However, these are often absent or inaccessible, especially in low- and middle-income countries. It is estimated that more than 75% of people experiencing mental disorders in low- and middle-income countries receive no treatment.","In 2019, an estimated 280 million people, including 5% of all adults, experienced depression. Depression is more common among women than men. Worldwide, more than 10% of pregnant women and women who have just given birth experience depression.
Depression can cause difficulties in all aspects of life, including performance at school, productivity at work, relationships with family, friends and community.
Researchers estimate that 12 billion productive work days are lost every year to depression and anxiety alone, at a cost of nearly US$ 1 trillion.
People with depression are at increased risk of suicide. Research also shows strong relationships between depression and physical health, including cardiovascular disease, cancer, diabetes and respiratory diseases.","WHO works with Member States and partners to reduce the burden of mental health conditions, including depression. The
Comprehensive Mental Health Action Plan 2013–2030
highlights the steps required to provide appropriate interventions for people with mental health conditions, including depression.
Depression and self-harm/suicide are among the priority conditions covered by
WHO’s Mental Health Gap Action Programme (mhGAP)
. The programme aims to help countries increase services for people with depression and other disorders through care provided by non-specialist health workers in primary health care.
WHO has developed brief psychological intervention manuals for depression that may be delivered by non-specialists to individuals and groups. Examples include
Problem Management Plus
,
Group Interpersonal Therapy (IPT) for depression
, and
Thinking Healthy
.
WHO has also developed self-help tools that can be used by individuals (for example the online
Step-by-Step programme
)."
Diabetes,https://www.who.int/health-topics/diabetes,"Diabetes is a chronic, metabolic disease characterized by elevated levels of blood glucose (or blood sugar), which leads over time to serious damage to the heart, blood vessels, eyes, kidneys and nerves. The most common is type 2 diabetes, usually in adults, which occurs when the body becomes resistant to insulin or doesn't make enough insulin. In the past 3 decades the prevalence of type 2 diabetes has risen dramatically in countries of all income levels. Type 1 diabetes, once known as juvenile diabetes or insulin-dependent diabetes, is a chronic condition in which the pancreas produces little or no insulin by itself. For people living with diabetes, access to affordable treatment, including insulin, is critical to their survival. There is a globally agreed target to halt the rise in diabetes and obesity by 2025.
About 830 million people worldwide have diabetes, the majority living in low-and middle-income countries. More than half of people living with diabetes are not receiving treatment. Both the number of people with diabetes and the number of people with untreated diabetes have been steadily increasing over the past decades.","Symptoms of type 1 diabetes include the need to urinate often, thirst, constant hunger, weight loss, vision changes and fatigue. These symptoms may occur suddenly. Symptoms for type 2 diabetes are generally similar to those of type 1 diabetes but are often less marked. As a result, the disease may be diagnosed several years after onset, after complications have already arisen. For this reason, it is important to be aware of risk factors.","Type 1 diabetes cannot currently be prevented. Effective approaches are available to prevent type 2 diabetes and to prevent the complications and premature death that can result from all types of diabetes. These include policies and practices across whole populations and within specific settings (school, home, workplace) that contribute to good health for everyone, regardless of whether they have diabetes, such as exercising regularly, eating healthily, avoiding smoking, and controlling blood pressure and lipids.
The starting point for living well with diabetes is an early diagnosis – the longer a person lives with undiagnosed and untreated diabetes, the worse their health outcomes are likely to be. Easy access to basic diagnostics, such as blood glucose testing, should therefore be available in primary health care settings. Patients will need periodic specialist assessment or treatment for complications.
A series of cost-effective interventions can improve patient outcomes, regardless of what type of diabetes they may have. These interventions include blood glucose control through a combination of diet, physical activity and, if necessary, medication; control of blood pressure and lipids to reduce cardiovascular risk and other complications; and regular screening for damage to the eyes, kidneys and feet to facilitate early treatment."
Diagnostics,https://www.who.int/health-topics/diagnostics,"Diagnostics are the most important tools that empower the health workforce in the identification of diseases or health conditions. They allow the initiation of treatments in order to avoid further complications and costly treatments for patients.
Diagnostic services are vital for the prevention, screening, diagnosis, case management, monitoring and treatment or surveillance of communicable, noncommunicable, neglected tropical and rare diseases, injuries and disabilities. Therefore, equitable access to safe, effective and quality assured diagnostics requires a comprehensive health-systems approach that addresses all stages of the access value chain.
The term diagnostics includes medical devices, techniques and procedures used for in vitro and in vivo determination of physiological status or presence and characteristics of a disease. Examples of in vitro diagnostics include laboratory tests (such as blood or urine tests); in vivo diagnostics include imaging tests (such as chest radiography, mammography or pelvic ultrasound) and other type of tests such as thermometer, electrocardiogram, pulse oximeters, endoscopes or blood pressure measurement devices. The simplest ones can be self-used, such as pregnancy tests, while others require important infrastructure and a specialized health workforce, like CT scanners.","Diagnostics are important to ensure quality, comprehensive and integrated primary health care and health services everywhere and for everyone. Every medical decision depends on a proper diagnosis, and while diagnostics results influence approximately 70% of healthcare decisions, only 3–5% of healthcare budgets go to diagnostic services. Thus, greater availability and improved access to diagnostics contribute towards health systems strengthening and universal health coverage.
Diagnostics contribute to the identification, detection and characterization of infectious and noncommunicable diseases. They also contribute to the monitoring of the burden of diseases as they can be used to collect data for informing public health interventions.
Diagnostics are fundamental for identification of pathogens and successful outbreak containment and control strategies. They are the first line of defence against emerging pathogens and the possibility of the re-emergence of eradicated diseases.
Diagnostics can be used in clinical studies to develop guidance for clinical care of patients and to monitor the efficacy and effectiveness of medical countermeasures such as treatments or vaccines.","WHO works with Member States, collaborating centres, partners and expert groups to develop and revise guidelines and tools, including norms and standards of all types of diagnostics (in vitro and in vivo).
WHO selects priority medical devices required for multiple diseases and health conditions. WHO promotes the Essential in vitro diagnostic list and the Priority medical devices list to assist Member States in developing their own national lists, and to support their access and availability.
WHO supports Member States in establishing mechanisms to assess national needs for health technologies, in particular medical devices used to screen, diagnose and monitor diseases and health conditions to assure their availability and use, particularly in low-resource settings.
The Organization also support the strengthening of national laboratory systems to deliver timely, safe, and reliable diagnostic test results. This includes plans and frameworks for the provision of laboratory based diagnostic services, laboratory workforce and network development, and optimization of laboratory operations.
The Organization assists Member States in addressing access barriers, strengthening regulatory capabilities, and promoting evidence-based decision-making and rational use of health technologies including diagnostics. Furthermore, the Organization leads efforts in innovation and increasing regional capacity in the research and development of priority health products."
Diarrhoea,https://www.who.int/health-topics/diarrhoea,"Diarrhoeal disease is the second leading cause of death in children under five years old, and was responsible for the deaths of 370,000  children in 2019. The most severe threat posed by diarrhoea is dehydration. During an episode of diarrhoea, water and electrolytes including sodium, chloride, potassium and bicarbonate are lost through liquid stools, vomit, sweat, urine and breathing. A person with diarrhoea becomes dehydrated when these losses are not replaced. In addition, diarrhoea is a major cause of malnutrition, making the person more susceptible to future bouts of diarrhoea and to other diseases.
There are three clinical types of diarrhoea, each with its specific treatments:
Acute watery diarrhoea, which may last several hours or days, and includes      cholera.
Acute bloody diarrhoea, also called dysentery.
Persistent diarrhoea, lasting 14 days or longer.
In the past, for most children, severe dehydration and fluid loss were the main causes of dying from diarrhoea. Now, other causes such as septic bacterial infections are likely to account for an increasing proportion of all diarrhoea-associated deaths.
Exclusive breastfeeding is protective and prevents diarrhoea from occurring in young children. Breastfeeding also reduces the severity of diarrhoea.
Innovative activities and demand creation are important for achieving behaviour change and sustaining long-term preventive practices to combat preventable morbidity and mortality from diarrhoeal diseases.","Diarrhoea is the passage of 3 or more loose or liquid stools per day, or more frequently than is normal for the individual. It is usually a symptom of gastrointestinal infection, which can be caused by a variety of bacterial, viral and parasitic organisms. Infection is spread through contaminated food or drinking-water, or from person to person as a result of poor hygiene.","Key measures to prevent diarrhoea include the following:
access to safe drinking-water.
use of improved sanitation.
hand washing with soap.
exclusive breastfeeding for the first      six months of life.
good personal and food hygiene.
health education about how      infections spread.
rotavirus vaccination.
Key measures to treat diarrhoea include the following:
Rehydration with
oral rehydration salts (ORS)
solution: ORS, particularly the low osmolarity formula, are a proven      life-saving commodity for the treatment of children with diarrhoea.
Rehydration may require intravenous fluids in case of severe dehydration or shock.
Zinc supplements
reduce      the duration of a diarrhoea episode by 25% and are associated with a 30%      reduction in stool volume.
Nutrient-rich foods:
the      vicious circle of malnutrition and diarrhoea can be broken by
continuing to give nutrient-rich foods
– including breast milk – during an episode, and by giving a nutritious      diet – including exclusive breastfeeding for the first six months of life      – to children when they are well.
Consulting a health professional
, in      particular for management of persistent diarrhoea, or when there is blood      in the stool, or if there are signs of dehydration.
Adequate nutrition
is key to improving natural defenses, starting with exclusive breastfeeding for the first 6 months of life."
Digital health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/digital-health,"Digital technologies are now integral to daily life, and the world’s population has never been more interconnected. Innovation, particularly in the digital sphere, is happening at unprecedented scale. Even so, its application to improve the health of populations remains largely untapped, and there is immense scope for use of digital health solutions.
WHO is harnessing the power of digital technologies and health innovation to accelerate global attainment of health and well-being.","WHO has three key objectives to promote the adoption and scale-up of digital health and innovation:
1. Translating latest data, research, and evidence into action: this means promoting standards for interoperability and data sharing and supporting implementation of digital solutions that contribute to informed decision making.
2. Enhancing knowledge through scientific communities of practice: enabled by new technologies and no longer limited by the need for physical meetings or hard copy peer review journals, WHO brings together top expert voices around topics
    of clinical and public health significance.
3. Systematically assessing and linking country needs with supply of innovations: all too often in global health, products are developed with the attitude of “if you build it, they will use it.” This approach has failed time
    and again. WHO takes a proactive, systematic approach to identify, promote, co-develop, and scale innovations that are based on country needs.","The WHO Global Strategy on Digital Health, adopted in 2020 by the World Health Assembly, presents a roadmap to link the latest developments in innovation and digital health, and put these tools to action in order to improve health outcomes.
Part of WHO’s strategic vision is for digital health to be supportive of equitable and universal access to quality health services. Digital health can help make health systems more efficient and sustainable, enabling them to deliver good quality, affordable and equitable care.
These high ideals are challenging to attain, especially for low- and middle-income countries. The purpose of WHO’s Global Strategy on Digital Health is to support countries in strengthening their health systems through the application of digital health technologies and achieve the vision of health for all. The strategy is designed to be fit for purpose and for use by all Member States, including those with limited access to digital technologies, goods and services."
Diphtheria,https://www.who.int/health-topics/diphtheria,"Diphtheria is a serious infection caused by strains of the bacteria called
Corynebacterium diphtheriae
which makes a toxin. The toxin attaches itself most commonly to tissues in the respiratory system and causes disease by killing healthy tissue.
Typical symptoms of the infection include a sore throat, fever, swollen neck glands and weakness. Within 2–3 days from infection, the dead tissue forms a thick, grey coating that can cover tissues in the nose, tonsils and throat, making it hard to breathe and swallow. More rarely, the toxin gets into the blood stream and causes damage to the heart, kidneys and nerves.
Diphtheria bacteria spread from person to person, usually through respiratory droplets, like from coughing or sneezing. People can also get sick from touching infected open sores or ulcers. Those at increased risk of getting sick include household contacts, those exposed to secretions from the patient and those with frequent and close contact with the infected person.","Diphtheria is a vaccine-preventable disease and is included in all countries' essential immunization programme. Diphtheria vaccine is a bacterial toxoid, i.e. a toxin whose toxicity has been inactivated. Currently available diphtheria vaccines are very effective in preventing this disease.
WHO recommends a 3-dose primary vaccination series with diphtheria- containing vaccine, followed by 3 booster doses. The primary series should begin as early as 6 weeks of age with subsequent doses given with a minimum interval of 4 weeks between doses. The 3 booster doses should preferably be given during the second year of life (12–23 months), at 4–7 years and at 9–15 years of age. Ideally, there should be at least 4 years between booster doses to achieve long term protection.
The vaccine can be given in combination with other vaccines such as tetanus, pertussis, hepatitis B,
Hemophilus influenzae
b and polio.
People who get a diphtheria vaccine may experience mild side effects. Serious side effects are rare.","Treatment for diphtheria includes antibiotics to get rid of the bacteria. For serious illnesses, diphtheria antitoxin is used to stop the bacterial toxin from causing damage to the respiratory system and other parts of the body. Anyone who has had diphtheria should also receive the vaccine after the acute phase of the illness is over.
Close contacts of a person with diphtheria may also be treated with antibiotics.  This prevents further spread of the bacteria. The specific antibiotics used will depend on local known antibiotic resistance patterns.
The risk of complications or death decrease considerably if appropriate treatment is provided early in the course of illness. For this reason, if diphtheria is suspected, testing to confirm the disease should be done promptly, and treatment should be started as soon as possible."
Disability,https://www.who.int/health-topics/disability,"Disability is part of being human. An estimated 1.3 billion people – about 16% of the global population – currently experience significant disability. This number is increasing due in part to population ageing and an increase in the prevalence of noncommunicable diseases.
Disability results from the interaction between individuals with a health condition, such as cerebral palsy, Down syndrome and depression, with personal and environmental factors including negative attitudes, inaccessible transportation and public buildings, and limited social support.
A person’s environment has a huge effect on the experience and extent of disability. Inaccessible environments create barriers that often hinder the full and effective participation of persons with disabilities in society on an equal basis with others. Progress on improving social participation can be made by addressing these barriers and facilitating persons with disabilities in their day to day lives.
For more information, see the
International Classification of Functioning, Disability and Health (ICF)
.","An estimated 1.3 billion people – or 1 in 6 people worldwide – experience significant disability.
Persons with disabilities die earlier, have poorer health, and experience more limitations in everyday functioning than the rest of the population due to health inequities.
These health inequities arise from unfair conditions that affect persons
    with disabilities disproportionally, including stigma, discrimination, poverty, exclusion from education and employment, and barriers faced in the health system itself.
Compared to persons without disabilities, some persons with disabilities:
die up to 20 years earlier;
have more than a double risk of developing comorbid conditions such as depression, asthma, diabetes, stroke, obesity or poor oral health;
find inaccessible health facilities up to 6 times more hindering; and,
are up to 15 times more limited by inaccessible and unaffordable transportation.
It is a state obligation, through the health sector in coordination with other sectors, to address existing health inequities so that persons with disabilities can enjoy their inherent right to the highest attainable standard of health. Disability inclusion is critical to achieving the Sustainable Development Goals and global health priorities of universal health coverage, protection in health emergencies and healthier populations.
Acting to achieve health equity for persons with disabilities is acting to achieve Health for All.","WHO works to fully integrate and promote disability inclusion in the health sector. It works to ensure persons with disabilities:
have equitable access to effective health services;
are included in health emergencies preparedness and responses; and
can access cross-sectorial public health interventions to achieve the highest      attainable standard of health.
As requested in the World Assembly Resolution 74.8, WHO will launch the Global Report on Health Equity for Persons with Disabilities on 2 December 2022, which provides Member States and development partners with updated evidence, analysis and recommendations on disability inclusion in the health sector. Also requested in the resolution, WHO is developing technical guidance to support Member States to take action to realize the highest attainable standard of health for persons with disabilities.  This guidance will be in the form of a national strategic planning toolkit, the Disability Inclusion in the Health Sector Guide for Action.  It will provide practical guidance on how to develop a comprehensive plan to advance health equity for persons with disabilities through integration into health systems governance and planning.
WHO strives to be an inclusive organization, providing an enabling environment in which persons with disabilities fully and effectively participate on an equal basis with others, and that disability is systematically integrated in all work of the Organization, as it advances its mission to promote health, keep the world safe and serve the most vulnerable. In December 2020, WHO has launched its
policy on disability
and an action plan for its implementation. These documents serve as the agenda for implementing the
United Nations Disability Inclusion Strategy
across WHO, which will ensure disability inclusion is consistently and systematically integrated into all aspects of WHO’s operational and programmatic work."
Dracunculiasis (Guinea-worm disease),https://www.who.int/health-topics/dracunculiasis,"Guinea-worm disease is caused by the parasitic worm
Dracunculus
medinensis
or Guinea-worm. This worm is the largest of the tissue parasite affecting humans. The adult female, which carries about 3 million embryos, can measure
    600 to 800 mm in length and 2 mm in diameter. When a person drinks contaminated water from ponds or shallow open wells, the cyclops is dissolved by the gastric acid of the stomach and the larvae are released and migrate through the intestinal wall.
After 100 days, the male and female meet and mate. The male becomes encapsulated and dies in the tissues while the female moves down the muscle planes. After about one year of the infection, the female worm emerges, usually from the feet, releasing thousands
    of larvae and thus repeating the life cycle.","Guinea-worm disease is rarely fatal. Frequently, however, the patient remains sick for several months, mainly because:
The emergence of the worm, sometimes several, is accompanied by painful oedema, intense generalised pruritus, blistering and an ulceration of the area from which the worm emerges;
The migration and emergence of the worms occur in sensitive parts of the body, sometimes the articular spaces can lead to permanent disability;
Ulcers caused by the emergence of the worm invariably develop secondary bacterial infections which exacerbate inflammation and pain resulting in temporary disability; and
Accidental rupture of the worm in the tissue spaces can result in serious allergic reactions.
The epidemiology of the disease is determined largely by the use of open stagnant water sources such as ponds and sometimes shallow or step wells. Human-made ponds are the main source of transmission.
Guinea-worm disease is seasonal, occurring with two broad patterns found in endemic areas of Africa, depending on climatic factors. In the Sahelian zone, transmission generally occurs in the rainy season (May to August). In the humid savanna and forest zone, the peak occurs in the dry season (September to January).","No drug is available to prevent or heal this parasitic disease. Dracunculiasis is, however, relatively easy to eliminate and eventually eradicate.
Guinea-worm disease is a vulnerable disease: humans alone are responsible for maintaining its fragile transmission cycle. It is therefore possible to permanently curtail transmission by applying the following measures:
Effective surveillance to detect all cases within 24 hours of worm emergence and containment of all cases;
Ensuring access to safe drinking water and converting unsafe sources to safe ones;
The construction of copings around well heads or the installation of boreholes with handpumps. This would prevent not only dracunculiasis but also diarrhoeal diseases;
Regular and systematic filtering of drinking water derived from ponds and shallow unprotected wells or from surface water. Finely meshed cloth or, better still, a filter made from a 0.15 mm nylon mesh, is all that is needed to filter out the cyclops
            from the drinking water;
Treatment of unsafe water sources with temephos to kill the cyclops;
Health education and social mobilization to encourage affected communities to adopt healthy drinking water behaviour.
If these measures are implemented by village communities, the goal of eradicating guinea-worm disease will be achieved."
Drought,https://www.who.int/health-topics/drought,"Drought is a prolonged dry period in the natural climate cycle that can occur anywhere in the world. It is a slow-onset disaster characterized by the lack of precipitation, resulting in a water shortage. Drought can have a serious impact on health, agriculture, economies, energy and the environment.
An estimated 55 million people globally are affected by droughts every year, and they are the most serious hazard to livestock and crops in nearly every part of the world. Drought threatens people’s livelihoods, increases the risk of disease and death, and fuels mass migration. Water scarcity impacts 40% of the world’s population, and as many as 700 million people are at-risk of being displaced as a result of drought by 2030.
Rising temperatures caused by climate change are making already dry regions drier and wet regions wetter. In dry regions, this means that when temperatures rise, water evaporates more quickly, and thus increases the risk of drought or prolongs periods of drought. Between 80-90% of all documented disasters from natural hazards during the past 10 years have resulted from floods, droughts, tropical cyclones, heat waves and severe storms.","When drought causes water and food shortages there can be many impacts on the health of the affected population, which may increase the risk of disease and death. Drought may have acute and  chronic health effects, including:
malnutrition due to the decreased availability of food, including micronutrient deficiency, such as iron-deficiency anaemia;
increased risk of infectious diseases, such as cholera, diarrhoea, and pneumonia, due to acute malnutrition, lack of water and sanitation, and displacement;
psycho-social stress and mental health disorders;
disruption of local health services due to a lack of water supplies, loss of buying power, migration and/or health workers being forced to leave local areas.
Severe drought can also affect air quality by making wildfires and dust storms more likely, increasing health risk in people already impacted by lung diseases, like asthma or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), or with heart disease.","As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with Member States and partners to respond to drought-related disasters. This includes calling for and coordinating emergency funding to support health actions and assembling mobile heath
        teams and outreach. WHO also works to ensure appropriate food supplementation is available to the affected areas, as well as support for child, maternal and mental health services.
Drought can be a catalyst for outbreaks of other diseases due to reduced water for drinking, cooking and sanitation, and strains on food resources. WHO works to provide epidemic surveillance, early warning and response programs and preventative immunization
        efforts to mitigate the effects of disease in drought-stricken areas.
Food production is particularly at risk from drought, the implications of which can last long after the drought itself is over. Droughts can also cause large numbers
    of people to become refugees in neighbouring areas or countries, which stretches the resources of the host area. WHO works to reduce the impacts of these effects through coordination with aid agencies and governments."
Drowning,https://www.who.int/health-topics/drowning,"Drowning is the process of experiencing respiratory impairment from immersion in liquid. Outcomes are classified as death, morbidity and no morbidity.
Drowning is a leading killer. The Global status report on drowning prevention shows that over 300 000 people lost their lives to drowning in 2021, Drowning disproportionately impacts children and young people. Children aged under 5 years account for nearly a quarter of all drowning deaths, and more than half of deaths occur among people aged under 30 years.
Over 90% of drowning deaths occur in low- and middle-income countries. Drowning prevention interventions range from community-based solutions, such as day care for children and barriers controlling access to water, to effective national policies and legislation around water safety, including setting and enforcing boating, shipping and ferry regulations.
While significant progress has been made in reducing drowning deaths, much more needs to be done. Everyone should have safe access to water and be able to enjoy water safely.","There are many actions to prevent drowning. Installing barriers (e.g. covering wells, using doorway barriers and playpens, fencing swimming pools etc.) to control access to water hazards, or removing water hazards entirely greatly reduces water hazard exposure and risk.
Community-based, supervised child care for pre-school children can reduce drowning risk and has other proven health benefits. Teaching school-age children basic swimming, water safety and safe rescue skills is another approach. But these efforts must be undertaken with an emphasis on safety, and an overall risk management that includes a safety-tested curricula, a safe training area, screening and student selection, and student-instructor ratios established for safety.
Effective policies and legislation are also important for drowning prevention. Setting and enforcing safe boating, shipping and ferry regulations is an important part of improving safety on the water and preventing drowning. Building resilience to flooding and managing flood risks through better disaster preparedness planning, land use planning, and early warning systems can prevent drowning during flood disasters.
Developing a national water safety strategy can raise awareness of safety around water, build consensus around solutions, provide strategic direction and a framework to guide multisectoral action and allow for monitoring and evaluation of efforts.","WHO produces a range of technical
resources to guide and inform drowning prevention efforts around the world.
These include the
Global status report on
drowning prevention
, which
details the scale of global drowning
fatalities and progress made in advancing strategies and actions to reduce
drowning,
Practical
guidelines on the provision of day-care, basic swimming and water safety
skills, and safe rescue and resuscitation training
, and the
first
investment case on drowning prevention
, which highlights the financial
return of two crucial measures: teaching school-aged children swimming and
water safety skills and providing safe spaces with adult supervision for
pre-school children.
At the regional level, WHO
organizes training programmes and convenes workshops to bring together
representatives of governments, NGOs and UN agencies working on drowning
prevention. At the country level, WHO works with Ministries of Health to
prevent drowning through the use of barriers controlling access to water and
the establishment of day care centres for pre-school children. In addition, WHO
has funded research in low-income countries exploring priority questions
related to drowning prevention."
Drugs (psychoactive),https://www.who.int/health-topics/drugs-psychoactive,"Psychoactive drugs are substances that, when taken in or administered into one's system, affect mental processes, e.g. perception, consciousness, cognition or mood and emotions. Psychoactive drugs belong to a broader category of psychoactive substances
        that include also alcohol and nicotine.  “Psychoactive” does not necessarily imply dependence-producing, and in common parlance, the term is often left unstated, as in “drug use”, “substance use” or “substance
        abuse”.
Production, distribution, sale or non-medical use of many psychoactive drugs is either controlled or prohibited outside legally sanctioned channels by law. Psychoactive drugs have different degrees of restriction of availability, depending on their
    risks to health and therapeutic usefulness, and classified according to a hierarchy of schedules at both national and international levels. At the international level, there are international drug conventions concerned with the control of production
    and distribution of psychoactive drugs: the 1961 Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs, amended by a 1972 Protocol; the 1971 Convention on Psychotropic Substances; the 1988 Convention Against Illicit Traffic in Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances.","The use of psychoactive drugs without medical supervision is associated with significant health risks and can lead to the development of drug use disorders. Drug use disorders, particularly when untreated, increase morbidity and mortality risks for individuals, can trigger substantial suffering and lead to impairment in personal, family, social, educational, occupational or other important areas of functioning. Drug use disorders are associated with significant costs to society due to lost productivity, premature mortality, increased health care expenditure, and costs related to criminal justice, social welfare, and other social consequences.
About 296 million people aged 15-64 had used psychoactive drugs in 2021 and about 39.5 million people are estimated to be affected by drug use disorders (harmful pattern of drug use or drug dependence). It is estimated that about 0.6 million death annually are attributable to drug use with about 420 000 male and 160 000 female deaths. More than 36 million years of healthy life loss (DALY) were attributable to drug use in 2019. It is estimated that worldwide there are almost 14.8 million people who inject drugs, of whom 15.2% live with HIV and 38.8% - with hepatitis C.","Since its creation, WHO has played an important role within the UN system in addressing the world drug problem. WHO activities to counter the world drug problem can be presented under the following main dimensions:
prevention of drug use and reduction of vulnerability and risks;
treatment and care of people with drug use disorders;
prevention and management of the harms associated with drug use;
access to controlled medicines; and
monitoring and evaluation.
Target 3.5 of UN Sustainable Development Goal 3 sets out a commitment by governments to strengthen the prevention and treatment of substance abuse. Several other targets are also of particular relevance to drug policy-related health issues, especially target 3.3, referring to ending the AIDS epidemic and combating viral hepatitis; target 3.4, on preventing and treating noncommunicable diseases and promoting mental health; target 3.8, on achieving universal health coverage; and target 3.b, with its reference to providing access to affordable essential medicines.
In April 2016, the thirtieth Special Session of the UN General Assembly (UNGASS) reviewed the progress in the implementation of the 2009 Political Declaration and Plan of Action on International Cooperation Towards an Integrated and Balanced Strategy to Counter the World Drug Problem and assessed the achievements and challenges. In resolution S-30/1, the General Assembly adopted the outcome document of the special session on the world drug problem entitled “Our joint commitment to effectively addressing and countering the world drug problem”. The UNGASS marked a shift in the overall drug policy discourse to highlight the public health and human rights dimensions of the world drug problem and to achieve a better balance between supply reduction and public health measures."
Earthquakes,https://www.who.int/health-topics/earthquakes,"Earthquakes can strike suddenly and without warning. An earthquake is a violent and abrupt shaking of the ground, caused by movement between tectonic plates along a fault line in the earth’s crust. Earthquakes can result in the ground shaking, soil liquefaction, landslides, fissures, avalanches, fires and tsunamis. The extent of destruction and harm caused by an earthquake depends on:
magnitude
intensity and duration
the local geology
the time of day that it occurs
building and industrial plant design and materials
the risk-management measures put in place.
Between 1998-2017, earthquakes caused nearly 750 000 deaths globally, more than half of all deaths related to natural disasters. More than 125 million people were affected by earthquakes during this time period, meaning they were injured, made homeless, displaced or evacuated during the emergency phase of the disaster.","Health threats due to earthquakes can vary according the magnitude of the earthquake, the nature of the built environment (such as poor housing or urban slums), and the secondary effects of the earthquake, like tsunamis or landslides. Earthquakes can have immediate and long-term impacts on health.
Immediate health impacts include:
trauma-related deaths and injuries from building collapse;
trauma-related deaths and injuries from the secondary effects of the earthquake, like drowning from tsunamis or burns from fires.
Medium-term health impacts include:
secondary infection of untreated wounds;
increased morbidity and risk of complications related to pregnancy and childbirth due to interrupted obstetric and neonatal services;
potential risk of communicable diseases, particularly in areas affected by overcrowding;
increased morbidity and risk of complications of chronic diseases due to interruption of treatment;
increased psychosocial needs;
potential environmental contamination by chemical/radiological agents following destruction of industrial infrastructure.
Earthquakes can also damage health facilities and transportation, which can disrupt service delivery and access to care. Health workers may not be able to reach health facilities that are still functional and medical supplies may be lost.","As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with partners to mitigate, prepare and respond to earthquakes worldwide. This includes:
strengthening health emergency risk management systems
limiting the risk of exposure to earthquakes by improving the quality of the built environment, with better land-use control, including regulating building
ensuring that health facilities are resilient to hazards, and that they are able to remain functional and able to respond to increased and changed health needs after earthquakes, with staff trained appropriately
mobilizing medical response teams, including establishing temporary health structures and field hospitals, as well as emergency medical kits
investing in community preparedness, as local resident are often      the first responders."
Ebola virus disease,https://www.who.int/health-topics/ebola,"Ebola virus disease (EVD), formerly known as Ebola haemorrhagic fever, is a severe, often fatal illness affecting humans and other primates.
The virus is transmitted to people from wild animals (such as fruit bats, porcupines and non-human primates) and then spreads in the human population through direct contact with the blood, secretions, organs or other bodily fluids of infected people, and with surfaces and materials (e.g. bedding, clothing) contaminated with these fluids.
The average EVD case fatality rate is around 50%. Case fatality rates have varied from 25% to 90% in past outbreaks.
The first EVD outbreaks occurred in remote villages in Central Africa, near tropical rainforests. The 2014–2016 outbreak in West Africa was the largest and most complex Ebola outbreak since the virus was first discovered in 1976. There were more cases and deaths in this outbreak than all others combined. It also spread between countries, starting in Guinea then moving across land borders to Sierra Leone and Liberia.
It is thought that fruit bats of the Pteropodidae family are natural Ebola virus hosts.","The incubation period, that is, the time interval from infection with the virus to onset of symptoms, is from 2 to 21 days. A person infected with Ebola cannot spread the disease until they develop symptoms.
Symptoms of EVD can be sudden and include: fever, fatigue, muscle, pain, headache, and sore throat. This is followed by vomiting, diarrhea, rash, symptoms of impaired kidney and liver function, and in some cases internal and external bleeding (e.g. oozing from the gums, blood in the stools). Laboratory findings include low white blood cell and platelet counts and elevated liver enzymes.
It can be difficult to clinically distinguish EVD from other infectious diseases such as malaria, typhoid fever and meningitis. A range of diagnostic tests have been developed to confirm the presence of the virus.","Supportive care - rehydration with oral or intravenous fluids - and treatment of specific symptoms improves survival. A range of potential treatments including blood products, immune therapies and drug therapies are currently being evaluated.
In the 2018-2020 Ebola outbreak in DRC, the  first-ever multi-drug randomized control trial was conducted to evaluate the effectiveness and safety of drugs used in the treatment of Ebola patients under an ethical framework developed in consultation with experts in the field and the DRC.
Two monoclonal antibodies (Inmazeb and Ebanga) were approved for the treatment of Zaire ebolavirus (Ebolavirus) infection in adults and children by the US Food and Drug Administration in late 2020.
The Ervebo vaccine has been shown to be effective in protecting people from the species Zaire ebolavirus, and is recommended by the Strategic Advisory Group of Experts on Immunization as part of a broader set of Ebola outbreak response tools. In December 2020, the vaccine was approved by the US Food and Drug Administration and prequalified by WHO for use in individuals 18 years of age and older (except for pregnant and breastfeeding women) for protection against Ebola virus disease caused by Zaïre Ebola virus.
In May 2020, the European Medicines Agency recommended granting marketing authorization for a 2-component vaccine called Zabdeno-and-Mvabea for individuals 1 year and older.
The vaccine is delivered in 2 doses: Zabdeno is administered first and Mvabea is given approximately 8 weeks later as a second dose. This prophylactic 2-dose regimen is therefore not suitable for an outbreak response where immediate protection is necessary."
Echinococcosis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/echinococcosis,"Echinococcosis is a parasitic disease that occurs in two main forms in humans: cystic echinococcosis (also known as hydatidosis) and alveolar echinococcosis, caused by the tapeworms
Echinococcus granulosus
and
Echinococcus multilocularis
, respectively.
Dogs, foxes and other carnivores harbour the adult worms in their intestine and evacuate the parasite eggs in their faeces. If the eggs are ingested by humans, they develop into larvae in several organs, mainly the liver and lungs.
Both cystic and alveolar echinococcosis are characterized by asymptomatic incubation periods that can last many years until the parasite larvae evolve and trigger clinical signs.
Both diseases can cause serious morbidity and death.","Cystic echinococcosis is characterized
by an asymptomatic incubation period that can last many years until the
parasite cysts evolve and trigger clinical signs, depending on the location and
size of the cysts and the pressure exerted on the surrounding tissues. In cystic
echinococcosis, the larval stages of the parasite develop as one or more cysts
mainly in the liver and lungs, and less frequently in the bones, kidneys,
spleen, muscles, central nervous system and eyes. Abdominal pain, nausea and
vomiting commonly occur when cysts invade the liver. If the lung is affected,
clinical signs include chronic cough, chest pain and shortness of breath.
Alveolar echinococcosis is
characterized by an asymptomatic incubation period of 5–15 years and the slow
development of a primary tumour-like lesion which is usually located in the
liver. Lesions may also involve other organs such as the spleen, lungs and
brain following dissemination of the parasite via the blood and lymphatic
system. Clinical signs include weight loss, abdominal pain, general malaise and
signs of hepatic failure. If left untreated, alveolar echinococcosis is
progressive and fatal.","Both cystic echinococcosis and alveolar echinococcosis can be expensive and complicated to treat, sometimes requiring extensive surgery and/or prolonged drug therapy. The treatment used should be decided based on results from ultrasound images of the cyst. Treatments can include percutaneous treatment of the hydatid cysts with the PAIR (Puncture, Aspiration, Injection, Re-aspiration) technique, surgery, anti-infective drug treatments or simply watching and waiting.
Human cystic echinococcosis is diagnosed with imaging tools such as ultrasound or computed tomography, and its laboratory confirmation relies on serological tests.
Diagnosis of alveolar echinococcosis is based on clinical findings and epidemiological data, imaging techniques, histopathology and/or nucleic acid detection, and serology. Early diagnosis and radical (tumour-like) surgery followed by anti-infective prophylaxis remain the key elements. If the lesion is confined, radical surgery offers cure. Unfortunately, in many patients the disease is diagnosed at an advanced stage, and palliative surgery, if carried out without or with incomplete anti-parasitic treatment, frequently results in relapses."
Electromagnetic fields,https://www.who.int/health-topics/electromagnetic-fields,"Electromagnetic fields (EMF) of all frequencies represent one of the most common and fastest growing environmental influences, about which anxiety and speculation are spreading. All populations are now exposed to varying degrees of EMF, and the levels will continue to increase as technology advances. Electromagnetic radiation has been around since the birth of the universe; light is its most familiar form. Electric and magnetic fields are part of the spectrum of electromagnetic radiation which extends from static electric and magnetic fields, through radiofrequency and infrared radiation, to X-rays.","As part of its charter to protect public health and in response to public concern over health effects of EMF exposure, the WHO established the
International EMF Project
in 1996 to assess the scientific evidence of possible health effects of EMF in the frequency range from 0 to 300 GHz. The EMF Project encourages focused research to fill important gaps in knowledge and to facilitate the development of internationally acceptable standards limiting EMF exposure.
Key objectives of the Project are to:
provide a coordinated international response to concerns about possible health effects of exposure to EMF,
assess the scientific literature and make a status report on health effects,
identify gaps in knowledge needing further research to make better health risk assessments,
encourage a focused research programme in conjunction with funding agencies,
incorporate the research results into WHO's Environmental Health Criteria monographs where formal health risk assessments will be made on exposure to EMF,
facilitate the development of internationally acceptable standards for EMF exposure,
provide information on the management of EMF protection programmes for national and other authorities, including monographs on EMF risk perception, communication and management, and
provide advice to national authorities, other institutions, the general public and workers, about any hazards resulting from EMF exposure and any needed mitigation measures.",N/A
Emergency and critical care,https://www.who.int/health-topics/emergency-care,"All around the world, acutely ill and injured people seek care every day. First contact health workers manage children and adults with medical, surgical and obstetric emergencies, including injuries, sepsis, heart attacks and strokes, asthma and acute complications of pregnancy.
Many proven health interventions are time dependent. Emergency care is an integrated platform for delivering accessible, quality and time-sensitive health care services for acute illness and injury across the life course. Integrated emergency care services facilitate timely recognition, treatment management and, when needed, continued treatment of the acutely ill at the appropriate level of the health system.
Critical care is an ongoing, intensive treatment provided to patients with life-threatening illnesses or injuries that require close, constant monitoring and support. Care is typically delivered in critical care units (e.g. intensive care units or high dependency units). Critically ill patients often need advanced medical equipment and therapies, intravenous medications to support heart function or blood pressure, and continuous monitoring of vital signs.
Over half of deaths and over a third of disability in low- and middle-income countries could be addressed by the implementation of effective emergency and critical care. Prioritizing an integrated approach to early recognition, resuscitation, treatment and prevention of complications from acute conditions reduces the morbidity and mortality from a wide range of diseases across the life course.","The recent pandemic has revealed pervasive gaps in the provision of emergency and critical care and reinforced the need for an integrated approach to these services. Emergency and critical care are pivotal service delivery platforms of health systems, and have an essential role in saving lives, reducing disabilities, and preventing complications.
Especially when there are logistical or financial barriers to healthcare access, people may present for care only when symptomatic with acute illness or injury. Emergency care is powerfully aligned with the primary health care agenda as it provides first contact clinical care for those who are acutely ill or injured. Pre-hospital and facility-based emergency care is a high impact and cost-effective form of secondary prevention. Ongoing critical care ensures adequate monitoring, reassessment and continuing comprehensive treatment to maximize patient outcomes.
Emergency and critical care play an important role in public health. Disease surveillance at facilities delivering emergency and critical care is essential to guide primary prevention and outbreak response. Building capacity for emergency and critical care is the vital foundation for the health systems ability to surge during larger scale health emergencies such as conflict, natural disaster or outbreaks of epidemic disease.","The Seventy-sixth World Health Assembly called on WHO to prioritize integrated emergency, critical and operative care for universal health coverage (UHC) and protection from health emergencies (WHA 76.2).
WHO is dedicated to assisting countries to strengthen their emergency and critical care systems to ensure quality everyday clinical care and robust responses during times of crisis. Through collaborative efforts and partnerships, WHO advocates for the integration of emergency and critical care into national healthcare agendas, emphasizing the importance of building national capacities to enhance clinical service readiness, preparedness and resilience. This includes working closely with partner agencies within the UN system to ensure that emergency and critical care are appropriately represented in UHC packages and planning and disaster readiness and response.
WHO’s work plan on emergency and critical care encompasses various facets, including advocacy, policy and planning, assessment at system level and health facility level, clinical learning programmes, clinical process tools and improvement of clinical care. WHO's Clinical Services and System Unit is dedicated to strengthening health systems to deliver emergency and critical care, particularly in first contact locations, and to supporting the development of quality, timely emergency and critical care accessible to all."
Energy and health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/energy-and-health,"Energy and health are inextricably linked. Access to clean, sustainable and affordable energy, outlined in the seventh Sustainable Development Goal (SDG 7), plays a crucial role in advancing health (SDG 3). Energy is also critical for achieving almost all other global goals that include eradication of poverty (SDG 1), opportunities for quality education (SDG 4), achievement of gender equality (SDG 5), access to clean water (SDG 6), jobs security and economic growth (SDG 8) and combat of climate change (SDG 13).
The links between energy and health are particularly evident in homes and health-care facilities. Access to clean and sustainable energy in homes is essential to protect people’s health from household air pollution due to the use of polluting stoves and fuels such as coal and biomass. Access to clean and reliable energy in health-care facilities is important to ensure the delivery of essential health care services for disease prevention and treatment.","Globally, 2.4 billion people lack access to clean fuels and technologies for cooking. Household air pollution, emitted from the use of polluting stoves and fuels, is a cause of some 3.2 million deaths annually. Women and children in particular are at greater health and livelihood risks since they are often tasked with cooking and collecting fuelwood. Health burdens are even greater when the use of polluting energy for other purposes (e.g., space heating, lighting) are included.
Recent statistics show population growth currently outpaces increases in energy access in some regions, especially in sub-Saharan Africa. It remains the only region in which the number of people without access to clean fuels and technologies is rising. Only about 1 in 5 people in sub-Saharan Africa (17%) has access to clean cooking. Overall, more people without access to clean fuels and technologies reside in sub-Saharan Africa than in any other region, with around 83% of the population (about 900 million people) in the region lacking access to clean cooking.
Access to energy also plays a critical role in the functionality of health-care facilities and the quality, accessibility and reliability of health services delivered to all.
Yet, an estimated 1 billion people globally are served by health facilities without electricity. Around 25% of health-care facilities in 11 sub-Saharan African countries are estimated to have no access to electricity. While most large hospitals have access, rates drop dramatically for rural and remote clinics.","Unless rapid action is taken, the world will fall short of the universal access target for clean cooking, leaving more than one fifth (24%) of the population still lacking access in 2030, making them vulnerable to health and other consequences. Scaling up the adoption to clean cooking solutions is needed through awareness raising, policies, financing, innovative delivery models and technology development.
Furthermore, electricity is necessary for the operation of critically needed medical devices such as vaccine refrigerators and surgical emergency, laboratory and diagnostic equipment as well as for the operation of basic amenities such as lighting, clean water supply, cooling, ventilation, space heating and communications.
Electricity is critical to health improvement and health protection and in many cases, it can make the difference between life and death. Through integrated approaches to health and energy challenges, WHO works towards accelerating access to clean cooking and electricity for health-care facilities. By working closely with the energy sector, the health sector can make critical steps in achieving health targets for non-communicable diseases (NCDs) and pneumonia prevention, vaccine coverage, digital health as well as improve emergency preparedness and response."
Environmental health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/environmental-health,"Healthier environments could prevent almost one quarter of the global burden of disease. The COVID-19 pandemic is a further reminder of the delicate relationship between people and our planet.
Clean air, stable climate, adequate water, sanitation and hygiene, safe use of chemicals, protection from radiation, healthy and safe workplaces, sound agricultural practices, health-supportive cities and built environments, and a preserved nature are all prerequisites for good health.","13.7 million of deaths per year in 2016, amounting to 24% of the global deaths, are due to modifiable environmental risks. This means that almost 1 in 4 of total global deaths are linked to environment conditions.
Disease agents and exposure pathways are numerous and unhealthy environmental conditions are common, with the result that most disease and injury categories are being impacted. Noncommunicable diseases, including ischaemic heart disease, chronic respiratory diseases and cancers are the most frequent disease outcomes caused.  Injuries, respiratory infections and stroke follow closely.","Our activities to advance the global agenda for building healthier environments for healthier populations include:
providing leadership on guiding important transitions such as in energy and transport, and stimulating good governance in health and environment;
ensuring knowledge generation and dissemination for evidence-based norms and efficient solutions, steering research and monitoring change in risks to health and implementation of solutions;
supporting capacity building and mechanisms for scaling up action in countries, and
building capacity for emergency preparedness and response in case of environment-related incidents, and provide related guidance on environmental health services and occupational health and safety."
Epilepsy,https://www.who.int/health-topics/epilepsy,"Epilepsy is the most
common chronic brain disease and affects people of all ages. More than 50
million people worldwide have epilepsy; nearly 80% of them live in low- and
middle-income countries.
An estimated 70% of people
with epilepsy could be seizure free if properly diagnosed and treated. However,
about three quarters of people with epilepsy in low-income countries do not get
the treatment they need, and this rises to 90% in some countries. In many such
countries, many health professionals do not have the training to recognize,
diagnose and treat epilepsy. In most resource-poor countries, antiseizure medicines
are not available.
People with epilepsy and
their families frequently suffer from stigma and discrimination. In many parts
of the world the true nature of epilepsy has also long been distorted by myths,
fear and mistaken notions about the disorder.
WHO is working with
ministries of health and partners to improve access to treatment for epilepsy.","Epilepsy is not contagious and is characterized by seizures, which occur because of temporary excessive electric activity in the brain. During seizures, people may lose consciousness or awareness, control of bowel or bladder function, they may not be able to hear or see properly, and their movements may become disturbed. The loss of movement control and sensation can cause injuries from falls.
A diagnosis of epilepsy is made by a health professional if there is medical history of at least two seizures. Often this is further confirmed by electroencephalography (EEG), a painless technological method to record and study the electrical activity of the brain.
Treatment for epilepsy can be very effective. With antiseizure medicines, up to 70% of people living with epilepsy could become seizure free. After 2 years of taking medicines without any seizures, a health professional may advise stopping the medicines. Where medicines are not helpful in relieving the condition, some types of surgery can be beneficial. Since people with epilepsy have higher occurrence of psychological conditions such as anxiety and depression, psychosocial help is also useful.","Previous WHO collaborative
programmes on epilepsy have shown that integrating epilepsy care in primary
health care can significantly reduce the epilepsy treatment gap. Based on the
evidence-based methods of the WHO Mental Health Gap Action Programme (mhGAP),
WHO supports the training of primary care, non-specialist health care providers
to diagnose, treat and follow up people with epilepsy. The WHO Programme on
Reducing the Epilepsy Treatment Gap combined several innovative strategies to
support access and care to services for people with epilepsy, thereby reducing
the epilepsy treatment gap. The Programme was implemented in four countries –
Ghana, Mozambique, Myanmar and Viet Nam.
WHO published
Improving the
lives of people with epilepsy: a technical brief
, which sets out the actions required to deliver an integrated
approach to epilepsy care and treatment. This better meets the multifaceted
needs of people with epilepsy."
"Eye care, vision impairment and blindness",https://www.who.int/health-topics/blindness-and-vision-loss,"Eye conditions are remarkably common. Those who live long enough will experience at least one eye condition during their lifetime.
Globally, at least
1 billion people
have a near or distance vision impairment that could have been prevented or has yet to be addressed. In the absence of timely detection, reduced or absent eyesight can have long-term personal and economic effects. Vision impairment affects people of all ages, with the majority being over the age of 50. Young children with early onset severe vision impairment can experience lower levels of educational achievement, and in adults it often affects quality of life through lower productivity, decreased workforce participation and high rates of depression.
Vision impairment and blindness impact the life of people everywhere. In low- and middle-income settings the burden of vision impairment can be even greater due to fewer opportunities to access the most essential eye care services.
Cataracts and uncorrected refractive errors are estimated to be the leading causes of vision impairment; however, other causes for vision impairment cannot be ignored. Age-related macular degeneration, glaucoma, long standing systemic conditions like diabetes causing diabetic retinopathy, infectious diseases of the eye and trauma to the eye are all equally important causes for vision impairment that need to be addressed.","Eye conditions that can be targeted effectively with preventive strategies include congenital and acquired eye conditions, myopia, ocular trauma, and ocular infections and inflammations.  A good example of this is the practice of preventative lifestyle changes among children, including a combination of increased time spent outdoors and decreased near-work activities. This may delay the onset and slow the progression of myopia, which reduces the risk of high myopia and its complications later in life.
Importantly, the prevention and management of systemic diseases, such as diabetes and hypertension, can also be effective in reducing the risk of ocular diseases. In addition, interventions to prevent vitamin A deficiency, measles and rubella, through vitamin A supplementation and immunization, are highly effective in reducing the risk of corneal opacities that can occur secondary to these conditions.
Another example is the prevention of workplace ocular injuries through promoting the use of protective eye equipment (e.g., masks, protective goggles, visors etc.) during high-risk activities and industries (e.g., certain sports, agricultural activities, construction workers, welders etc.).","Although effective interventions exist to address the two leading causes of vision impairment, namely optical correction for refractive errors and surgery for cataract, there remains a large unmet need for care. Spectacles are the most common intervention used worldwide to compensate for refractive error, as well as contact lenses and refractive surgeries. Spectacles and cataract surgery are both highly cost-effective interventions that can substantially improve a person’s quality of life.
Treatment and care for many eye conditions, such as glaucoma, diabetic retinopathy, pterygium, amblyopia, strabismus and retinopathy of prematurity require long-term monitoring to control the progression of the condition. Treatment is also required for commonly presenting acute eye conditions that do not typically cause vision impairment but affect people’s lives with pain and discomfort (dry eye, conjunctivitis and blepharitis, etc.). To prevent further complications, the management of these eye conditions is often directed at treating the cause or alleviating the symptoms.
Vision impairment that cannot be corrected or reversed requires rehabilitation measures, for which there are several available. For those who live with blindness, braille reading, counselling and home skills training, mobility training with white canes and digital assistive technologies can ensure free, independent and safe mobility."
Female genital mutilation,https://www.who.int/health-topics/female-genital-mutilation,"Female genital mutilation (FGM) is a traditional harmful practice that involves the partial or total removal of external female genitalia or other injury to female genital organs for non-medical reasons.
It is estimated that more than 200 million girls and women alive today have undergone female genital mutilation in the countries where the practice is concentrated. In addition, every year an estimated 3 million girls are at risk of undergoing female genital mutilation, the majority of whom are cut before they turn 15 years old.
FGM has no health benefits. It can lead to immediate health risks, as well as long-term complications to women’s physical, mental and sexual health and well-being.
The practice is recognized internationally as a violation of human rights of girls and women and as an extreme form of gender discrimination, reflecting deep-rooted inequality between the sexes. As it is practiced on young girls without consent, it is a violation of the rights of children. FGM also violates a person's rights to health, security and physical integrity, the right to be free from torture and cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment, and the right to life when the procedure results in death.
As part of the Sustainable Development Goals, the global community has set a target to abandon the practice of female genital mutilation by the year 2030.","While the exact number of girls and women worldwide who have undergone
female genital mutilation remains unknown, at least 200 million girls and women
alive today have been subjected to the practice, according to data from the 30
countries where population level data exist. The practice is mainly
concentrated in western, eastern, and north-eastern regions of Africa, as well
as in some countries in the Middle East and Asia.
With growing migration, there has been an increase in the number of girls
and women in Europe, Australia and North America who have either undergone
female genital mutilation or who may be at risk of being subjected to the
practice. FGM is therefore a global concern.
While there has been an overall decline in the prevalence of FGM over the
last three decades, not all countries have made progress and the pace of
decline has been uneven. Current progress is insufficient to keep up with
increasing population growth. If trends continue, the number of girls and women
undergoing FGM will rise significantly in the next 15 years.","WHO is strongly opposed to health professionals performing FGM and urges all health workers to uphold the medical code of ethics to “do no harm”. Medicalization of FGM normalizes and condones the practice and hinders long term efforts for abandoning this grave violation of the human rights of women and girls.
WHO recognizes the important role that health care personnel play in supporting and improving the health and well-being of girls and women living with FGM. Moreover, WHO acknowledges the unique position that midwives and nurses may have to influence and change attitudes towards FGM amongst their patients because of their close contact with practicing communities and since they provide the majority of health care in primary health care settings. WHO has developed a training package to help empower health providers by strengthening their knowledge about the practice, so that they in turn can act as influential agents for change within clinical settings as well in their communities and families.
WHO uses a public health approach to FGM and works to ensure that girls and women living with FGM receive quality prevention and care services, by developing evidence-based guidance and resources for training and policy; supporting countries to adapt and implement them; generating evidence on causes, consequences, and costs of FGM and on what works to end the practice; and developing advocacy tools to support efforts to prevent FGM"
Financial protection,https://www.who.int/health-topics/financial-protection,"Financial protection is at the core of universal health coverage (UHC) and is one of the final coverage goals of health financing policies. It is achieved when direct payments made to obtain health services do not expose people to financial hardship and do not threaten living standards. The key to protecting people is to ensure prepayment and pooling of resources for health rather than relying on people paying for health services out-of-pocket (OOP) at the time of use.
Catastrophic out-of-pocket health spending, defined as exceeding 10% of a household budget, continues to rise. More than one billion people, about 14% of the global population, experienced such large out-of-pocket payments relative to their budgets. But even small expenditures in absolute terms can be devastating for low-income families; approximately 1.3 billion individuals were pushed or further pushed into poverty by such payments, including 300 million people who were already living in extreme poverty. For more information, please see the reports
here
and visit the
UHC fact sheet.","In-depth, context-specific analysis and evaluations of health financing policies are needed to understand the drivers of trends.
Financial protection is undermined by heavy reliance on out-of-pocket (OOP) health spending in all countries at all income levels. OOP health spending undermines efforts to eradicate poverty, which can be avoided by minimizing OOP health spending for people living close to poverty, and eliminating such payments for people living in poverty.
Financial protection is not guaranteed by participation in a health coverage scheme. There are different ways of financing health systems to ensure a population is financially protected, however, evidence shows that more significant prepaid, pooled, compulsory payments are needed.
Public health funding must increase further and be used more efficiently and equitably.  Different revenue sources must be pooled or their utilization better coordinated.  The size of compulsory prepaid funds must be sufficiently large; prepaid funds must be redistributed; and coverage for medicines must beextended.
OOP spending on health must be limited to low, fixed, and capped co-payments, and removed completely for the poor and most vulnerable. Removing financial barriers to care reduces forgone care, thereby improving service coverage and financial protection.",N/A
Floods,https://www.who.int/health-topics/floods,"Floods are the most frequent type of natural disaster and occur when an overflow of water submerges land that is usually dry. Floods are often caused by heavy rainfall, rapid snowmelt or a storm surge from a tropical cyclone or tsunami in coastal areas.
Floods can cause widespread devastation, resulting in loss of life and damages to personal property and critical public health infrastructure. Between 1998-2017, floods affected more than 2 billion people worldwide. People who live in floodplains or non-resistant buildings, or lack warning systems and awareness of flooding hazard, are most vulnerable to floods.
There are 3 common types of floods:
Flash floods are caused by rapid and excessive rainfall that raises water heights quickly, and rivers, streams, channels or roads may be overtaken.
River floods are caused when consistent rain or snow melt forces a river to exceed capacity.
Coastal floods are caused by storm surges associated with tropical cyclones and tsunami.
Between 80-90% of all documented disasters from natural hazards during the past 10 years have resulted from floods, droughts, tropical cyclones, heat waves and severe storms. Floods are also increasing in frequency and intensity, and the frequency and intensity of extreme precipitation is expected to continue to increase due to climate change.","Drowning accounts for 75% of deaths in flood disasters. Flood disasters are becoming more frequent and this trend is expected to continue. Drowning risks increase with floods particularly in low- and middle-income countries where people live in flood prone areas and the ability to warn, evacuate, or protect communities from floods is weak or only just developing.
Deaths also result from physical trauma, heart attacks, electrocution, carbon monoxide poisoning or fire associated with flooding. Often, only immediate traumatic deaths from flooding are recorded.
Floods can also have medium- and long-term health impacts, including:
water- and vector-borne diseases, such as cholera, typhoid or malaria
injuries, such as lacerations or punctures from evacuations and disaster cleanup
chemical hazards
mental health effects associated with emergency situations
disrupted health systems, facilities and services, leaving communities without access to health care
damaged basic infrastructure, such as food and water supplies, and safe shelter.","The magnitude of the physical and human costs from floods can be reduced if adequate emergency prevention, preparedness, response and recovery measures are implemented in a sustainable and timely manner.
WHO works with Member States to build resilient and proactive health systems that can anticipate the needs and challenges during emergencies so that they are more likely to reduce risks and respond effectively when needed.
As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with partners to respond to:
ensure appropriate food supplementation
restore primary care services, like immunization, child and maternal health, and mental health
assemble mobile health teams and outreach
conduct epidemic surveillance, early warning and response
call for emergency funding to support health action."
Food fortification,https://www.who.int/health-topics/food-fortification,"Fortification is the practice of deliberately increasing the content of one or more micronutrients (i.e., vitamins and minerals) in a food or condiment to improve the nutritional quality of the food supply and provide a public health benefit with minimal risk to health. As well as increasing the nutritional content of staple foods, the addition of micronutrients can help to restore the micronutrient content lost during processing.
Fortification is an evidence-informed intervention that contributes to the prevention, reduction and control of micronutrient deficiencies. It can be used to correct a demonstrated micronutrient deficiency in the general population (mass or large-scale fortification) or in specific population groups (targeted fortification) such as children, pregnant women and the beneficiaries of social protection programmes. When the vitamins and minerals are not added to the foods during the processing but just before consumption at home or at schools or child‐care facilities, it is called point-of-use fortification.
In addition to the micronutrient deficiencies, policies and implementation programmes for fortification need to consider an alignment with policies for the reduction of diet-related noncommunicable diseases. Such is the case of salt iodization, which builds on sodium consumption and, as result, needs to consider strategies for sodium intake reduction.","The World Health Organization recommends large scale food fortification as a powerful evidence-informed and cost-effective intervention to fight vitamin and mineral deficiencies, including iodine deficiency disorders, anaemia and iron deficiency, among
    others.
Recommendations in all settings include:
universal salt iodization
fortification of maize flour, corn meal, wheat flour and rice with vitamins and minerals.
For children living in different settings:
micronutrient powders containing iron for point-of-use fortification of foods for infants and young children 6–23 months old or children 2–12 years.
Mandatory food fortification occurs when governments legally oblige food producers to fortify particular foods or categories of foods with specified micronutrients, providing high certainty over time that they will contain a predetermined amount. Voluntary
    fortification occurs when a food manufacturer freely chooses to fortify particular foods in response to permission given in food law as a means to increase their brand value.
Globally, mandatory regulations are most often applied to the fortification of food with micronutrients such as iodine, iron, vitamin A and folic acid. Of these, the iodization of salt is the most widely implemented globally.","WHO has been working systematically in food fortification for decades and collaborates with different networks for fortification at regional, country and community levels.
WHO, the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations and the Codex Alimentarius Commission developed the general principles for the addition of essential nutrients to foods with the intention to provide guidance and protect health, while supporting implementation among Member States.
WHO has organized and convened guideline development group meetings, technical consultations and working groups and has created implementation and monitoring tools in collaboration with country offices and external partners to help Member States to adapt and adopt WHO guidelines and technical documents on food fortification.
WHO also monitors and reports progress of several nutrition targets that are affected by fortification such as the reduction of anaemia in women and the reduction of stunting in children under 5 years of age."
Food safety,https://www.who.int/health-topics/food-safety,"Access to enough safe and nutritious food is key to sustaining life and promoting good health. Unsafe food containing harmful bacteria, viruses, parasites or chemical substances can cause more than 200 different diseases, ranging from diarrhoea to cancers.
    Around the world, an estimated 600 million – almost 1 in 10 people – fall ill after eating contaminated food each year, resulting in 420 000 deaths and the loss of 33 million healthy life years (DALYs).
Food safety, nutrition and food security are closely linked. Unsafe food creates a vicious cycle of disease and malnutrition, particularly affecting infants, young children, elderly and the sick. In addition to contributing to food and nutrition security,
    a safe food supply also supports national economies, trade and tourism, stimulating sustainable development. The globalization of food trade, a growing world population, climate change and rapidly changing food systems have an impact on the safety
    of food. WHO aims to enhance the capacity to prevent, detect and respond to public health threats associated with unsafe food at the global and country levels.
Learn about Nutrition and Food Safety and COVID-19","Foodborne diseases impede socioeconomic development by straining health care systems and harming national economies, tourism and trade. The burden of foodborne diseases to public health and to economies has often been underestimated due to underreporting
    and difficulty to establish causal relationships between food contamination and resulting illness or death. Children under 5 years of age carry 40% of the foodborne disease burden, with 125 000 deaths every year.
The consumption and production of safe food have immediate and long-term benefits for people, the planet and the economy. Safe food is essential to human health and well-being, only food that is safe can be traded. Safe food allows for the uptake of nutrients
    and promotes long-term human development. When food is not safe, humans cannot develop, and the Sustainable Development Goals cannot be achieved.
The 2019 World Bank report on the economic burden of the foodborne diseases indicated that US$ 110 billion is lost each year in productivity and medical expenses resulting from unsafe food in low- and middle-income countries. Unsafe or contaminated food
    leads to trade rejections, economic losses and food loss and waste, while safe food production improves economic opportunities by enabling market access and productivity.","WHO calls for the transformation of food systems to make food safe, healthy and sustainably produced for all the world population.
WHO provides scientific advice and research to help develop international standards for food safety through the Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO)/WHO Codex Alimentarius.
WHO provides global leadership in facilitating investment and coordinated evidence-based action across multiple sectors. This supports Member States in building strong, sustainable and resilient national food control systems with a balance of responsibilities between the different stakeholders, including consumers. It does so through the implementation of WHO Global Strategy for Food Safety (2022–2030); monitoring the global burden of foodborne diseases and supporting countries in burden estimates; supporting stronger national food control systems by comprehensive assessments through the FAO/WHO food control system assessment tool; and helping implement adequate infrastructure to respond to food safety emergencies through the International Food Safety Authorities Network (INFOSAN).
WHO promotes safe food handling through the
WHO Five keys to safer food
and advocates for priorities and policies that move food safety forward globally, by convening with partners and the public through World Food Safety Day and global Food Safety Community of Practice."
Foodborne diseases,https://www.who.int/health-topics/foodborne-diseases,"Over 200 diseases are caused by eating food contaminated with bacteria, viruses, parasites or chemical substances such as heavy metals. This growing public health problem causes considerable socioeconomic impact though strains on health-care systems lost productivity, and harming tourism and trade. These diseases contribute
significantly to the global burden of disease and mortality.
Foodborne
diseases are caused by contamination of food and occur at any stage of the food production, delivery and consumption chain. They can result from several forms of environmental contamination including pollution in water, soil or air, as well as unsafe food storage and processing.
Foodborne
diseases encompass a wide range of illnesses from diarrhoea to cancers.
Most present as gastrointestinal issues, though they can also produce neurological, gynaecological and immunological symptoms. Diseases
causing diarrhoea are a major problem in all countries of the world,
though the burden is carried disproportionately by low- and
middle-income countries and by children under 5 years of age","Every year, nearly one in 10
people around the world fall ill after eating contaminated food, leading to over 420 000 deaths. Children are disproportionately affected, with
125 000 deaths every year in people under 5 years of age. The majority of these cases are caused by diarrhoeal diseases. Other serious consequences of foodborne diseases include kidney and liver failure,
brain and neural disorders, reactive arthritis, cancer, and death.
Foodborne
diseases are closely linked to poverty in low- and middle-income
countries but are a growing public health issue around the world.
Increasing international trade and longer, more complex food chains increase the risk of food contamination and the transport of infected food products across national borders. Growing cities, climate change,
migration and growing international travel compound these issues and expose people to new hazards.","WHO works to assist Member States in building capacity to prevent,
detect and manage foodborne risks. Foodborne diseases are reflected in several
targets of Sustainable Developmental Goal 3 and are a priority area within the
Organization’s work. Activities include research and independent scientific
assessments of food-related hazards, foodborne disease awareness programs, and
helping to promote food safety through national health-care programs. The
WHO Five Keys to Safer
Food manual provides straightforward tips and guidelines on
how to produce, process, handle and consume food to limit spreading and
contracting foodborne illnesses.
In collaboration with the UN Food and Agriculture
Organization, WHO created the Codex Alimentarius, a nongovernmental interagency
organization tasked with creating food standards, guidelines, and codes of
practice that contributes to the safety, quality, and fairness of the
international food trade. The two agencies also developed the International
Food Safety Authorities Network (INFOSAN) to rapidly share information during
food safety emergencies."
Foodborne trematode infections,https://www.who.int/health-topics/foodborne-trematode-infections,"Foodborne trematodes are a group of diseases that include the parasites
Clonorchis, Opisthorchis, Fasciola
and
Paragonimus
. These parasitic flukes have a complex life cycle involving diverse definitive hosts and one or two intermediate hosts. Foodborne trematodes cause infection in humans via the consumption of contaminated food (raw fish, crustaceans or vegetables). Infection can result in severe liver and lung disease and together these diseases are estimated to cause 2 million life years lost to disability and death worldwide every year.","The public health burden due to foodborne trematodiases is predominantly due to morbidity rather than mortality with early and light infections often going unnoticed. Chronic infections are associated with severe morbidity with symptoms reflecting the organ in which the adult worms are located in.
Clonorchis
and
Opisthorchis
species have adult flukes that lodge in the smaller bile ducts of the liver, resulting in inflammation and fibrosis of surrounding tissues. Acute or early infection may result in non-specific gastrointestinal symptoms. Chronic infection can result in cholangiocarcinoma, a fatal bile duct cancer. Both
C. sinensis
and
O. viverrini
are classified as carcinogens.
Fasciola
adult worms lodge in larger bile ducts and gall bladder resulting in inflammation, fibrosis, blockage, colic pain and jaundice. Chronic infection can result in liver cirrhosis.
The final location of
Paragonimus
species is in the lung tissue, resulting in a chronic cough, blood-stained sputum, chest pain, dyspnoea (shortness of breath) and fever. These symptoms can be confounded with tuberculosis. Adult worms may also infect extra-pulmonary locations such as the brain and can result in symptoms of headaches, mental confusion, convulsions and cerebral haemorrhage.","Treatment of foodborne trematodiases is important to prevent progression of clinical disease and reduce associated morbidity. Treatment can be offered through preventive chemotherapy or individual case management.
Preventive chemotherapy involves a population-based approach where everyone in a given region or area is given medicines, irrespective of their infection status. This is recommended in areas where large numbers of people are infected. Praziquantel is recommended for treatment of clonorchiasis and opisthorchiasis while triclabendazole is recommended for fascioliasis. Both praziquantel and triclabendazole can be used for treatment of paragonimiasis.
Individual case-management involves the treatment of people with confirmed or suspected infection. This approach is more appropriate where cases are less clustered and where health facilities are available.
Treatment should be complemented by interventions that reduce transmission such as education on safe food practices, improved sanitation and veterinary public health measures."
Gender and health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/gender,"Gender refers to the characteristics of women, men, girls and boys that are socially constructed.  This includes norms, behaviours and roles associated with being a woman, man, girl or boy, as well as relationships with each other. As a social construct, gender varies from society to society and can change over time.
Gender is hierarchical and produces inequalities that intersect with other social and economic inequalities.  Gender-based discrimination intersects with other factors of discrimination, such as ethnicity, socioeconomic status, disability, age, geographic location, gender identity and sexual orientation, among others. This is referred to as intersectionality.
Gender interacts with but is different from sex, which refers to the different biological and physiological characteristics of females, males and intersex persons, such as chromosomes, hormones and reproductive organs. Gender and sex are related to but different from gender identity. Gender identity refers to a person’s deeply felt, internal and individual experience of gender, which may or may not correspond to the person’s physiology or designated sex at birth.
Gender influences people’s experience of and access to healthcare. The way that health services are organized and provided can either limit or enable a person’s access to healthcare information, support and services, and the outcome of those encounters. Health services should be affordable, accessible and acceptable to all, and they should be provided with quality, equity and dignity.
Gender inequality and discrimination faced by women and girls puts their health and well-being at risk.  Women and girls often face greater barriers than men and boys to accessing health information and services. These barriers include restrictions on mobility; lack of access to decision-making power; lower literacy rates; discriminatory attitudes of communities and healthcare providers; and lack of training and awareness amongst healthcare providers and health systems of the specific health needs and challenges of women and girls.
Consequently, women and girls face greater risks of unintended pregnancies, sexually transmitted infections including HIV, cervical cancer, malnutrition, lower vision, respiratory infections, malnutrition and elder abuse, amongst others. Women and girls also face unacceptably high levels of violence rooted in gender inequality and are at grave risk of harmful practices such as female genital mutilation, and child, early and forced marriage. WHO figures show that about 1 in 3 women worldwide have experienced either physical and/or sexual intimate partner violence or non-partner sexual violence in their lifetime.
Harmful gender norms – especially those related to rigid notions of masculinity – can also affect boys and men’s health and wellbeing negatively. For example, specific notions of masculinity may encourage boys and men to smoke, take sexual and other health risks, misuse alcohol and not seek help or health care. Such gender norms also contribute to boys and men perpetrating violence – as well as being subjected to violence themselves. They can also have grave implications for their mental health.
Rigid gender norms also negatively affect people with diverse gender identities, who often face violence, stigma and discrimination as a result, including in healthcare settings. Consequently, they are at higher risk of HIV and mental health problems, including suicide.","The work of WHO is aligned with and supports the advancement of the Sustainable Development Goals, particularly SDG 3:
Ensure healthy lives and promote well-being for all at all ages
, and SDG 5:
Achieve gender equality and empower all women and girls
. The Organization is committed to non-discrimination and to leaving no-one behind. It seeks to ensure that every person, regardless of gender or sex, can live a healthy life.
Gender inequality hinders progress to fulfill everyone’s right to health. Efforts in support of Universal Health Coverage (UHC) must focus on reaching those most often left behind, such as marginalized, stigmatized and geographically isolated people of all sexes and gender identities, with a special focus on those in situations of increased vulnerability, including poor people, persons with disabilities and racialized and indigenous peoples. Addressing discrimination against women and girls is critical to achieving UHC.
WHO develops norms, standards and guidelines on gender-responsive health service provision and delivery, and commissions research on issues focusing on gender equality, human rights and health equity. WHO also supports country-level action to strengthen health sector response to gender-based violence, as well as to address gender equality in health workforce development and gender-related barriers to health services.",N/A
Genomics,https://www.who.int/health-topics/genomics,"Genomics is the study of the complete set of genes (the genome) of organisms, of the way genes work, interact with each other and with the environment.
Genomics incorporates elements of genetics, but is concerned with the characterization of all genes of an organism, rather than individual genes. The field is multidisciplinary, and uses a combination of laboratory and bioinformatic techniques to investigate genomes’ structure, function, how they have evolved and how they can be edited.
Landmark achievements in the early 2000s, culminating with the publication of the first reference human genome, have transformed scientific discovery of diseases and launched a powerful era in genetic medicine. Recent breakthroughs include:
advances in the field of pharmacogenomics, where genomic information is used to study individual responses to drugs and enable the development of targeted therapies;
the publication of the first human 'pangenome', representing the genetic diversity of the species; and
the development of genome editing approaches, including by CRISPR/Cas9 technology.
Collectively, these innovations have reshaped the understanding of the genetic basis of complex diseases, of genotype–phenotype relationships, the way health information is generated and how knowledge is translated in novel medicine and public health practice.","Genomics is evolving rapidly, and its potential impact for the future of human health cannot yet be known. Human genomics knowledge and technologies provide new ways to prevent and manage many diseases, and opportunities to achieve global public health goals.
Genomic knowledge of other organisms contributes to the understanding of human health and diseases, the interconnectedness across species, and is thus a vital component of the One Health approach.
Some applications of genomics:
medical applications in risk assessment, diagnosis, treatment selection, disease monitoring and drug development;
applications of pathogen genomics in the identification of etiological agents, surveillance of infections and investigation of their transmission within communities;
animal and plant genomics applications to catalogue genetic biodiversity, identify phenotypic and functional genetic traits, and select and engineer specific traits.","Compared to high-income countries, low- and middle-income countries are often disproportionately disadvantaged in the advancement of, and access to, genomics technologies and their applications.
WHO is implementing a programme of activities to promote equitable and fair access to genomics technologies for the benefit of people worldwide. Following recommended actions identified by the WHO Science Council in its report ‘
Accelerating access to genomics for global health: promotion, implementation, collaboration, and ethical, legal, and social issues: a report of the WHO Science Council’
(2022), the programme of work is articulated across four themes:
●
Promotion:
Advocacy is needed to persuade governments, commercial and non-commercial organizations, academic institutions, and others, of the medical, scientific, and economic benefits of genomic technologies and to promote affordable access to genomic technologies globally.
●
Implementation
: Overcoming obstacles to implementation will require local planning, financing, training of essential personnel, and the affordable provision of instruments, materials, and computational infrastructure.
●
Collaboration
: Government ministries, funding agencies, healthcare and scientific organizations in academia and industry should collaborate to establish plans on how to use genomics, build and expand technical capacity, if appropriate through regional programmes.
●
Ethical, legal and social issues
: Effective oversight – coupled with national and international rules and standards – is key to promoting ethical, legal, equitable use and responsible sharing of information obtained with genomic methods."
Global health ethics,https://www.who.int/health-topics/ethics-and-health,"Ethical questions related to health, health care, and public health cover topics as diverse as moral issues around reproduction, state obligations in the provision of health care services, and appropriate measures to control infectious disease. Scholars and health care professionals have debated ethical questions related to health and health care since the earliest days of medicine. Recent formal efforts to articulate international standards of ethics applicable to health and health care can
        be traced to the Nuremberg trials of 1947, during which the horrors of Nazi medical experiments came to light.
The principles that emerged from those trials, known as the Nuremberg Code, are broadly applicable to many types of health-related research involving
human participants, including clinical trials. The growing breadth and complexity of contemporary health challenges have produced a range of difficult questions that cannot always be adequately addressed by relying exclusively on existing policies,
guidelines or codes of conduct. Debates over access to new and expensive pharmaceuticals and medical technologies, as well as increasing awareness of the gross health disparities that exist both within and between countries, have called attention to the
need for an ethics of health policy and practice.","Research ethics govern the standards of conduct for scientific researchers. It is important to adhere to ethical principles in order to protect the dignity, rights and welfare of research participants.
The WHO Manual (Section XV.2) defines research with human subjects as 'any social science, biomedical, behavioural, or epidemiological activity that entails systematic collection or analysis of data with the intent to generate new knowledge, in which human beings:
are exposed to manipulation, intervention, observation, or other interaction with investigators either directly or through alteration of their environment; or
become individually identifiable through investigator's collection, preparation, or use of biological material or medical or other records.","Immunization
raises a host of challenging ethical questions that researchers, governments, funders, pharmaceutical companies, and communities must confront.
TB
: Ethical issues include questions about the equitable distribution of resources, protection of vulnerable groups, respect for patient choice of treatment options and solidarity between communities during outbreaks.
Zika
has raised many specific ethical issues, in particular regarding pregnancy. At the same time, it has highlighted ethical issues that arise in
vector-borne diseases
more generally.
The
HIV
epidemic has raised many ethical challenges for public health officials, researchers and clinicians, reaching from macro-level policy to micro-level clinical decisions."
Health accounts,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-accounts,"The system of health accounts is an international accounting framework for systematically tracking health spending. Time trends of overall health spending and its components guide future policies and investments to make health systems more responsive to people’s needs. They are essential for improving the performance of health systems while enhancing transparency and accountability. Health expenditure data also provide insights for assessing the adequacy of health resources, evaluating the efficiency, effectiveness, and equity of resource allocations, benchmarking against peers, and monitoring the progress towards the key goals of universal health coverage and health security. Accordingly, the demand for timely, accurate, and comprehensive data on health expenditures has been increasing at both the country and global levels.
“A System of Health Accounts 2011” (SHA 2011) establishes an integrated and comprehensive methodology for tracking health expenditure through a set of uniform accounts comparable across countries. The framework, which focuses on final consumption, tracks resource flows through the health system: from its sources (funding sources, financial arrangements), patterns of provision (providers and factors of provision), and through to its use (health care functions, diseases/programs).","WHO works closely with partners to establish and institutionalize harmonized, integrated mechanisms for the routine and timely collection and publication of health expenditure data, as well as using health accounts information in policymaking. At a technical level. WHO has developed methodologies, practical guidance, and IT tools, and provides direct technical support. At an institutional level, it involves efforts to help countries build their capacity to undertake such functions.
Data collection on countries’ health expenditure, based on SHA 2011, is the foundation of the Global Health Expenditure Database (GHED) (
https://apps.who.int/nha/database
). GHED is a global public good: being an open-access platform that hosts internationally comparable data on annual health spending for more than 190 countries from 2000 onwards, as well as data visualization for easy comparisons across countries and over time. GHED also contains key methodology and guidance documents for health expenditure tracking. WHO works with the countries to update the GHED annually. To accompany the annual data release, WHO also publishes an annual global health expenditure report that provides an overview of the trends in global health expenditure, the thematic profile of spending, as well as special topics.",N/A
Health budget,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-budget,"Raising domestic public funds is essential for universal health coverage (UHC). No country has made significant progress toward UHC without increasing reliance on public revenues. Therefore, domestic tax systems that are essential to support country’s fiscal space expansion are central to the UHC agenda.
While the level of revenues matter, the allocation and use of these revenues are two crucial elements in supporting effective progress toward UHC. Public Financial Management (PFM) systems are key enabling factors to support appropriate formulation, execution and accounting of government expenditure.
In health, countries face challenges at all stages of the PFM cycle. Key questions include:
How to align budget allocations with sector needs?
How to ensure effective disbursement?
How to make the budget system more accountable and transparent?
As part of the
Montreux Collaborative Agenda on Fiscal Space, PFM and Health Financing
, WHO is supporting countries and partners in fostering dialogue between health and finance authorities, with the aim to strengthen domestic PFM systems and make budget practices more effective toward UHC.","Generally, the key features of a well-functioning budgeting system typically include:
Multi-year planning and budgeting
Policy or output-oriented allocation
Realistic and credible estimates of costs
Open and transparent consultation processes.
In health, proactive engagement of health ministries in the budgeting process can facilitate alignment of budget allocations with sector priorities, as laid out in national health strategies and plans. The development of multi-year plans and budgets is likely to improve predictability in the sector’s resources. If the health budget is formulated according to sector goals or outputs and the execution rules align with this logic, it will make budgets more responsive to sector needs than if the formulation follows an input-based approach. A quality performance framework of budgets will also facilitate financial and operational accountability in health.",N/A
Health economics,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-economics,"This area of work in WHO covers both technical and allocative efficiency: Costing and budget impact, global price tags and investment cases, cost-effectiveness analysis and health technology assessment, benefit package design and priority setting and resource allocation.  The following tools facilitate the above mentioned work: WHO-CHOICE and the One Health Tool for costing and cost-effectiveness analysis, Accesmod for geographic modelling and EPIC for estimating economic consequences of disease and injury.","The following are the key areas of our work:
Health technology assessment and Benefit Package Design -
One of the key objectives for policymakers is to use existing and additional resources efficiently. This calls for prioritizing between and amongst interventions. There are several initiatives related to health technology assessment (HTA) and health benefit package design. These are:
A survey on HTA and health benefit packages.
The WHO-CHOICE (Choosing interventions that are Cost-Effective) project, with the Generalized Cost-Effectiveness Analysis methodology.
The UHC Compendium.
The OneHealth Tool, used to help countries to examine the costs and feasibility of their strategic plans, as well as to evaluate the plan’s impact.
Costing and Technical Efficiency -
The work on costing and technical efficiency explores questions around resource use in the health sector. Strategies for improving health and expanding access to health care services need to be examined from a resource perspective in order to ensure that they are feasible, efficient, affordable and sustainable.
Health and the economy –
While measurements of morbidity and mortality are key considerations for estimating the burden of disease in populations, they provide an incomplete picture of the adverse impact of ill health on human welfare. In particular, the economic consequences of poor health can be substantial. Analysis of the economic impact of ill-health addresses a number of policy questions concerning the consequences of disease or injury. Some of these questions relate to the microeconomic level of households, firms or government – such as the impact of ill-health on a household’s income or a firm’s profits – while others relate to the macroeconomic level, including the aggregate impact of a disease on a country’s current and future gross domestic product (GDP). WHO proposes a defined conceptual framework within which the economic impact of diseases and injuries can be considered and appropriately estimated.","AccessMod
– This is a toolbox that has been
developed by WHO in order to assist countries to examine the geographic aspects
of their health system. It specifically addresses the first three layers of a
well-known framework developed by Tanahashi (1978) to evaluate health service
coverage (the specific three layers being: the target population, availability
coverage and accessibility coverage).
EPIC – It
is a model to estimate the burden of ill-health (or, conversely
the contribution of improving health) on economic performance, through the
direct and indirect impacts that health has on two key production factors: the
labour force and physical capital. EPIC estimates how changes in health status
affect the size of the effective labour force and the accumulation of physical
capital and ultimately national income. EPIC may be used to conduct investment
case in health.
One Health Tool
- The OneHealth Tool is a software tool designed to inform
national strategic health planning in low- and middle-income countries. While
many costing tools take a narrow disease-specific approach, the OneHealth Tool
attempts to link strategic objectives and targets of disease control and
prevention programmes to the required investments in health systems. The tool
provides planners with a single framework for scenario analysis, costing,
health impact analysis, budgeting, and financing of strategies for all major
diseases and health system components. It is thus primarily intended to inform
sector wide national strategic health plans and policies.
UHC Compendium -
The UHC Compendium is a database of health services and intersectoral interventions designed to assist countries in making progress towards Universal Health Coverage (UHC). It provides a strategic way to organize and present information and creates a framework to think about health services and health interventions. The database for the Compendium spans the full spectrum of promotive, preventive, resuscitative, curative, rehabilitative, and palliative services, as well as a full complement of intersectoral interventions. The Compendium will provide rapid one-stop access to supporting evidence, associated human and material resource inputs, and feedback on cost impact as interventions are selected."
Health equity,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-equity,"Equity is the absence of unfair, avoidable or remediable differences among groups of people, whether those groups are defined socially, economically, demographically, or geographically or by other dimensions of inequality (e.g. sex, gender, ethnicity,
    disability, or sexual orientation). Health is a fundamental human right.
Health equity is achieved when everyone can attain their full potential for health and well-being.
Health and health equity are determined by the conditions in which people are born, grow, live, work, play and age, as well as biological determinants.  Structural determinants (political, legal, and economic) with social norms and institutional
    processes shape the distribution of power and resources
determined by the conditions in which people are born, grow, live, work, play and
age.
People’s living conditions are often made worse by discrimination, stereotyping, and prejudice based on sex, gender, age, race, ethnicity, or disability, among other factors. Discriminatory practices are often embedded in institutional and systems
    processes, leading to groups being under-represented in decision-making at all levels or underserved.
Progressively realizing the right to health means systematically identifying and eliminating inequities resulting from differences in health and in overall living conditions.","Knowledge, monitoring, and analysis make up the backbone of actions needed to achieve equity.
Monitoring health inequality
must be central to a country’s health information system. This begins with the collection, analysis and reporting of data disaggregated by age, sex, education, income, disability and other factors. Qualitative data is also essential to understand the how and why of inequities. Data must also be linked with information on other determinants such as education to better understand cause-and-effect relationships i.e. how these other determinants contribute to health inequities. Part of inequality monitoring includes addressing gaps created by gender and other biases in how data has been previously collected, analysed and reported.
Equity, gender and rights-based assessment
approaches
and
tools
(including participatory approaches) should be used to systematically collect, collate, and analyze the evidence on health inequalities. This includes the health equity impacts of action by health
and
other sectors, for example reviewing specific aspects of the health system (e.g. Primary Health Care (PHC)/financing/health workforce) or of specific programmes (e.g. adolescent health/neglected tropical diseases/urban health). The findings need to be used to design responses for improved equity and ongoing monitoring of health inequalities.","To improve health equity, evidence-informed action is needed:
(1)  by the health sector to ensure high-quality and effective services are available, accessible and acceptable to everyone, everywhere when they need them;
(2)  by health and or other sectors to act on the wider structural determinants of health to tackle the inequitable distribution of power and resources, and to improve daily living conditions; and
(3) the health sector needs to take the lead in monitoring health inequities through monitoring health outcomes and health service delivery – as well as working with other sectors to monitor people’s living conditions.
Key examples include:
redesigning health systems for equity e.g. pooling financial resources to enhance redistributive capacity and to progressively cover one billion additional people by 2023;
prioritising the Primary Health Care approach e.g. investment of 1% of GDP in PHC;
tackling structural determinants such as sexism, racism, ageism, classism and ablism;
addressing harmful gender norms and gender inequalities in health policies/services/programmes and having more women in leadership positions and decision-making processes;
protecting and increasing investment in health and other social sectors (through Universal Health Coverage (UHC), education and broader social protection) e.g. ensuring policies for decent work and employment conditions for all;
ensuring equitable services and infrastructure in both urban and rural areas to ensure everyone can lead healthy lives; and
continuing to monitor health inequalities and the impact of action."
Health financing,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-financing,"Health financing is a core function of health systems that can enable progress towards universal health coverage by improving effective service coverage and financial protection. Today, millions of people do not access services due to the cost. Many others receive poor quality of services even when they pay out-of-pocket. Carefully designed and implemented health financing policies can help to address these issues. For example, contracting and payment arrangements can incentivize care coordination and improved quality of care; sufficient and timely disbursement of funds to providers can help to ensure adequate staffing and medicines to treat patients.
WHO’s approach to health financing focuses on core functions:
revenue raising (sources of funds, including government budgets, compulsory or voluntary prepaid insurance schemes, direct out-of-pocket payments by users, and external aid)
pooling of funds (the accumulation of prepaid funds on behalf of some or all of the population)
purchasing of services (the payment or allocation of resources to health service providers)
In addition, all countries have policies on which services the population is entitled to, even if not explicitly stated by government; by extension those services not covered, are usually paid for by patients (sometimes called co-payments).","Health financing reforms cannot simply be imported from one country to another given the unique context of each country and its starting point in terms of health financing arrangements; the underlying causes of performance problems differ in each country and it is these causes which the reforms proposed in a health financing strategy must address.
However, there are lessons from international experience that allow a number of guiding principles for reforms which support progress towards UHC, to be specified. These do not constitute a “how-to” guide, but rather a set of “signposts” that can be used to check whether reform strategies (and more importantly, reform implementation) create an appropriate incentive environment and hence are pointing and moving in the right direction in terms of objectives and goals.
The guiding principles can be summarized as:
moving towards predominant reliance on public funding sources
reducing fragmentation in how funds are pooled or mitigating the consequences
moving towards more strategic purchasing of health services, linking provider payments to data on their performance, and to the health needs of the populations they serve
aligning coverage policies (benefits and copayments) explicitly with policy objectives.","Experience demonstrates that real progress is possible in countries at all income levels. Each country’s pathway will differ depending on the local context, however the above lessons are essential for equitable and effective progress.
Country experience should be looked at through the lens of the health financing functions, rather than labels, and can provide valuable lessons. Labels such as “social health insurance,” “community insurance,” or “tax-funded systems” have little meaning by themselves and hide the complex choices and options available to countries as they raise, pool, and use funds to ensure the availability and use of quality services.
Health system financing is an essential component of UHC but progress toward UHC also requires coordinated actions across the pillars of the health system with particular attention to strengthening human resources for health."
Health impact assessment,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-impact-assessment,"Health impact assessment (HIA) is a practical approach used to systematically judge the potential health effects of a policy, strategy, plan, programme or project on a population, particularly on vulnerable or disadvantaged groups.
HIA can help to identify the distribution of those effects within the population, generate evidence for proper action to avoid and mitigate sometimes unintended health risks, and promote health opportunities. Recommendations are produced for decision-makers and stakeholders, and a framework for monitoring and evaluating changes in health is offered as part of performance management and sustainable development.
The approach can be applied in diverse economic sectors and uses quantitative, qualitative and participatory techniques. Examples of how HIA has been used include clean energy options, master plans, planning for green spaces, transportation and urban growth projects, zoning for walkability, air pollution and noise reduction interventions, climate change mitigation and adaptation policies. HIA provides a way to engage with members of the public affected by a particular proposal. It also helps decision-makers and Member States make choices about alternatives and improvements to prevent disease or injury and to actively promote health. It is based on the four interlinked values of democracy (promoting stakeholder participation), equity (considering the impact on the whole population), sustainable development and the ethical use of evidence.","HIA is a consolidated approach to estimate and anticipate the consequences
of policies, plans, programmes and projects. It is a key resource for achieving
foresight in societal decision-making, systematically deployed worldwide. Economic
sectors such as transport, agriculture, energy, waste and housing have profound
impacts on health. For instance, transport is a major factor in traffic
injuries, air pollution and noise, and healthy transport policies can help
reduce these risks, as well as promoting walking and cycling. In agriculture,
fertilizers and pesticides may boost crop yields, but wise use is important to
protect farm workers and consumers from excessive chemical exposure. Health
impact assessment can be a valuable tool for helping to develop policy and
assisting decision-makers in these and other areas.","WHO is responding by building the capacity, providing tools and initiatives in health impact assessment to dynamically improve health and well-being across sectors.
WHO supports the health sector to effectively engage in urban health, working across sectors to help cities to produce contextual, meaningful and actionable information on the health, economic and climate impacts of urban environments. WHO supports decision-makers to equip themselves to accept, reject or amend policy alternatives, in the knowledge that they have the best available health evidence before them.
Health risk assessment techniques have been applied in the air pollution field for many years. Tools for HIA include
AirQ+,
with the goal to quantify the health burden and impact of air pollution;
CLIMAQ-H
, a software assessing the outcomes of climate-driven policies and support decision-making; and
HEAT for walking and cycling
,
a web-based tool used to estimate the health and economic impacts of increased walking and cycling. All tools are downloadable for free.
Other relevant information is available from
WHO-EURO
."
Health Laws,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-laws,"Law for Universal Health Coverage (UHC)
For all aspects of health, there are binding rules that govern the rights and responsibilities of governments, health workers, companies, civil society and a country’s population. Together these rules make up the legal framework, or legal architecture for health. They take many forms including: statutory laws, regulatory and administrative laws, contracts, case law, and customary laws. Who is involved in making these rules, and the form they take, differs from country to country.
Health laws are used to formalize commitment to goals, such as the goal of universal health coverage, creating a drive for action.  To enable cooperation and achieve health goals, people use law to create different organizations (such as hospitals) and relationships (such as contracts for providing health services). In turn, organizations (whether health ministries, the private sector or civil society) have mandates, policies and strategies based on legal rules that guide their work.
There are also many rules that structure what health organizations and individuals should do, and what they may not do. This interaction between different health laws results in health system functions being carried out and health products and services being delivered.","Governments use health laws for:
Establishing important health policy goals (including universal health coverage);
Implementing health policy;
Enabling the effective operation of key health system functions and regulating inputs (service provision, health workforce, medical products and technologies, financing, health information and governance);
Creating the health systems architecture, establishing health organizations and networks, establishing mandates, duties and accountabilities;
Managing and responding to risks to personal health and a country’s health security;
Applying international health agreements and development goals at country level;
Build strong foundations for good governance to enable meaningful participation by all types of individuals and health stakeholders, protect rights and define responsibilities, and
Establish predictable, appropriate and fair rules for facilitating the operation of health markets and setting norms for responsible health behavior.","How does law create UHC?
By providing legal recognition of access rights to essential health services, essential medicines and vaccines and by removing legal access barriers to universal access including discrimination.
UHC can be defined as “the existence of a legal mandate for universal access to health services and evidence that the vast majority of the population has meaningful access to these services”. All countries that have achieved UHC have legislated to formalize the commitment UHC.
By ensuring financial protection. UHC financing reforms aimed at providing financial protection, rely on legal mechanisms.
Revenue raising, pooling, purchasing, and the definition of a countries benefit package all rely on law.
By assuring health care quality.
Six health care quality objectives are critical to efforts towards UHC: safety, equity, efficacy, patient centeredness, efficiency, timeliness, all rely on law for their achievement. Legal tools for UHC quality include: standard setting, licensing of health workers and products, accreditation of health services and facilities, clinical protocols, reporting systems, establishing monitoring and accountability mechanisms and processes, compliance monitoring, auditing and the use of sanctions."
Health promoting schools,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-promoting-schools,"A health promoting school is one that constantly strengthens its capacity as a healthy setting for living, learning and working.
A health promoting
school:
Fosters health and learning with all the measures at its disposal.
Engages health and education officials, teachers, teachers' unions, students, parents, health providers and community leaders in efforts to make the school a healthy place.
Strives to provide a healthy environment, school health education, and school health services along with school/community projects and outreach, health promotion programmes for staff, nutrition and food safety programmes, opportunities for physical education and recreation, and programmes for counselling, social support and mental health promotion.
Implements policies and practices that respect an individual's wellbeing and dignity, provide multiple opportunities for success, and acknowledge good efforts and intentions as well as personal achievements.
Strives to improve the health of school personnel, families and community members as well as pupils; and works with community leaders to help them understand how the community contributes to, or undermines, health and education.","Health promoting schools
focus on:
Caring for oneself and others.
Making healthy decisions and taking control over life's circumstances.
Creating conditions that are conducive to health (through policies, services, physical/social conditions).
Building capacities for peace, shelter, education, food, income, a stable ecosystem, equity, social justice, sustainable development.
Preventing leading causes of death, disease and disability: helminths, tobacco use, HIV/AIDS/STDs, sedentary lifestyle, drugs and alcohol, violence and injuries, unhealthy nutrition.
Influencing health-related behaviours: knowledge, beliefs, skills, attitudes, values, support.
An effective school health programme can be one of the most cost effective investments a nation can make to simultaneously improve education and health. WHO promotes school health programmes as a strategic means to prevent important health risks among youth and to engage the education sector in efforts to change the educational, social, economic and political conditions that affect risk.","WHO's Global School Health Initiative, launched in 1995, seeks to mobilize and strengthen health promotion and education activities at the local, national, regional and global levels. The Initiative is designed to improve the health of students, school personnel, families and other members of the community through schools.
The goal of WHO's Global School Health Initiative is to increase the number of schools that can truly be called ""Health-Promoting Schools"". Although definitions will vary, depending on need and circumstance, a Health-Promoting School can be characterized as a school constantly strengthening its capacity as a healthy setting for living, learning and working.
The general direction of WHO's Global School Health Initiative is guided by the Ottawa Charter for Health Promotion (1986); the Jakarta Declaration of the Fourth International Conference on Health Promotion (1997); and the WHO's Expert Committee Recommendation on Comprehensive School Health Education and Promotion (1995)."
Health promotion,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-promotion,"“Health promotion is the process of enabling people to increase control over, and to improve their health.” Health Promotion Glossary, 1998
A brief history of Health Promotion
The first International Conference on Health Promotion was held in Ottawa in 1986, and was primarily a response to growing expectations for a new public health movement around the world. It launched a series of actions among international organizations, national governments and local communities to achieve the goal of ""Health For All"" by the year 2000 and beyond. The basic strategies for health promotion identified in the Ottawa Charter were: advocate (to boost the factors which encourage health), enable (allowing all people to achieve health equity) and mediate (through collaboration across all sectors).
Since then, the WHO Global Health Promotion Conferences have established and developed the global principles and action areas for health promotion. Most recently, the 9th global conference (Shanghai 2016), titled ‘Promoting health in the Sustainable Development Goals: Health for all and all for health’, highlighted the critical links between promoting health and the 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development. Whilst calling for bold political interventions to accelerate country action on the SDGs, the Shanghai Declaration provides a framework through which governments can utilize the transformational potential of health promotion.","Promoting Healthier Populations
The Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs) provides a bold and ambitious agenda for the future. WHO is committed to helping the world meet the SDGs by championing health across all the goals. WHO’s core mission is to promote health, alongside keeping the world safe and serving the vulnerable. Beyond fighting disease, we will work to ensure healthy lives and promote well-being for all at all ages, leaving no-one behind.
Our target is 1 billion more people enjoying better health and well-being by 2023.","Good Governance
Strengthen governance and policies to make healthy choices accessible and affordable to all, and create sustainable systems that make whole-of-society collaboration real. This approach is based on the rationale that health is determined by multiple factors outside the direct control of the health sector (e.g. education, income, and individual living conditions) and that decisions made in other sectors can affect the health of individuals and shape patterns of disease distribution and mortality.
Health Literacy
Improving health literacy in populations provides the foundation on which citizens are enabled to play an active role in improving their own health, engage successfully with community action for health, and push governments to meet their responsibilities in addressing health and health equity.
Healthy Settings
The settings approach has roots in the WHO Health for All strategy and, more specifically, the Ottawa Charter for Health Promotion. Healthy Settings key principles include community participation, partnership, empowerment and equity. The Healthy Cities programme is the best-known example of a successful Healthy Settings programme.
Social mobilization
Bringing together all societal and personal influences to raise awareness of and demand for health care, assist in the delivery of resources and services, and cultivate sustainable individual and community involvement."
Health security,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-security,"Global public health security is defined as the activities required, both proactive and reactive, to minimize the danger and impact of acute public health events that endanger people’s health across geographical regions and international boundaries.
Population growth, rapid urbanization, environmental degradation, and the misuse of antimicrobials are disrupting the equilibrium of the microbial world. New diseases, like COVID-19, are emerging at unprecedented rates disrupting people’s health
        and causing social and economic impacts. Billions of passengers travel on airplanes each year, increasing the opportunities for the rapid international spread of infectious agents and their vectors.
Dependence on chemicals has increased, as has awareness of the potential hazards for health and the environment, like climate change and air pollution. As the globalization of food production increases, so does the risk of tainted ingredients and
        risk of foodborne diseases. As the world’s population becomes more mobile and increases its economic interdependence, these global health threat increase and traditional defences at national borders cannot protect against the invasion of
        a disease or vector.
Pandemics, health emergencies and weak health systems not only cost lives but pose some of the greatest risks to the global economy and security faced today.","WHO’s mission is to help all countries fulfil their duty of safety and care to their citizens, especially to the poorest and most vulnerable. This is the goal of global public health security: to demonstrate how collective international public health
    action can build a safer future for humanity.
WHO Member States face increasing numbers of emergencies with health consequences from all hazards, including infectious disease outbreaks, conflicts, natural disasters, chemical or radio-nuclear spills and food contamination. Many emergencies can be
    complex, with more than one cause, and can have significant public health, social, economic and political impacts. WHO has specific responsibilities and accountabilities for emergency operations under the International Health Regulations (IHR) (2005)
    and within the global humanitarian system as the Interagency Standing Committee (IASC) Global Health Cluster Lead Agency.
WHO's health security interface works with involving international organizations, civil defense, military doctors, law enforcement and armed forces. The Secretariat advocates for the role of public health in the security sector, increase WHO preparedness
    and response to deliberate events and provides awareness about health security internationally.",N/A
Health system governance,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-systems-governance,"Health systems governance refers to the processes, structures and institutions that are in place to oversee and manage a country's healthcare system. It manages the relationships between different actors and stakeholders involved in healthcare, including government agencies, healthcare providers, patients and their families, people and communities, civil society organizations and private sector entities.
Health systems governance means ensuring strategic policy frameworks exist and are combined with effective oversight, coalition-building, provision of appropriate regulations and incentives, attention to system design, and accountability.
Effective health systems governance is essential for ensuring that healthcare services are accessible, equitable, efficient, affordable and of high quality for all. This requires efficient and equitable allocation of healthcare resources, the presence of policies and regulations guiding healthcare delivery, and mechanisms for monitoring, evaluating and reviewing the healthcare system’s performance.
Moreover, health systems governance plays a crucial role in promoting equity and social justice in healthcare. It strives to ensure that the healthcare system is responsive to the needs of all members of society, regardless of their socioeconomic status, ethnicity, culture, gender or other factors.","In the context of the Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) agenda, WHO is committed to supporting countries to exercise effective health systems governance, with a specific focus on strengthening the capacity of governments to formulate and implement strategies that will lead to the realization of UHC by 2030.
In line with the Thirteenth General Programme of Work 2019–2023, WHO works collaboratively across its three organizational levels, adopting a horizontal approach to pursue the following key objectives:
call upon countries to strengthen the governance of their health systems for UHC
provide guidance on ways to enhance health systems governance
support regions and countries in strengthening their health systems governance as needed.
WHO’s work on the health systems governance not only supports countries in advancing the UHC agenda but has an impact on reaching the targets beyond SDG 3. Improvements in health systems governance will support achieving results in both health and non-health-related SDGs, such as ending poverty (SDG 1), achieving gender equality (SDG 5), reducing inequalities (SDG 10), building effective, accountable and inclusive institutions (SDG 16), etc.","For WHO, health systems governance involves not only the development of policy tools, techniques and methods but also what policy looks like in practice, including its goals and intentions. Based on this approach, WHO’s work on health systems governance aims to assist Member States in:
developing strategic policy frameworks that articulate the country’s policy vision (e.g. through national health policies, strategies and plans);
operationalizing these policy frameworks through relevant policy instruments, including legal instruments (e.g. laws and regulations);
building coalitions and partnerships with all relevant stakeholders, such as civil society and the private sector, to provide guidance in the development, implementation and review of health policy and programmes;
shaping the system design and establishing the overall architecture of the health system, tailoring powers and duties to fit the unique context of the country; and
providing accountability and oversight mechanisms to ensure effective policy implementation and impact, as well as addressing market failures."
Health taxes,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-taxes,"Health taxes are levied on products that have a negative public health impact, for example tobacco, alcohol and sugar-sweetened beverages (SSBs). These taxes are considered win-win-win policies because they save lives and prevent disease while advancing health equity and mobilising revenue for the general budget. They can also be used for specific priorities such as financing universal health coverage (UHC) or highly cost-effective yet underutilised population health measures.
The aim of health tax policy is to reduce the consumption of products deemed risk factors for noncommunicable diseases by making them less affordable through higher prices. This is achieved with regular tax increases large enough to result in real price increases greater than economic growth.
Excise taxes are the most effective tax measure for promoting health because they change the price a harmful product relative to other goods and can be easily increased over time.
Consumption is reduced best with taxes based on the quantity (known as specific taxes) of an unhealthy product (such as packs of cigarettes) or its unhealthy ingredient (such as pure alcohol or sugar) rather than taxes based on the product’s value.","Raising health taxes is a SMART policy because it:
S
aves lives
Tobacco, alcohol and sugar-sweetened beverages taxes are all effective and cost-effective ways of reducing consumption, preventing diseases and injuries and saving lives.
M
obilises revenue
Health taxes can be a revenue booster over the short and medium term. Importantly, health taxation is also more inclusive and pro-growth than alternative sources of revenue.
A
ddresses health inequities
In lower- and middle-income countries, lower socioeconomic status is associated with higher risk of noncommunicable diseases and higher rates of tobacco use and alcohol consumption. Accordingly, the net impact of health taxes is progressive once one fully accounts for the distribution of health benefits, income losses averted and reductions in catastrophic healthcare costs.
R
educes burdens on health systems
An ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure: health taxes are also a high-return investment in averted healthcare expenditure and increased workforce participation.
T
argets noncommunicable disease risk factors for the achievement of Sustainable Development Goals.
By targeting noncommunicable disease risk factors with health taxes, countries can progress their achievement of Sustainable Development Goal 3.4, which calls for a one-third reduction of premature mortality from noncommunicable diseases by 2030.","Countries are increasingly interested in using health taxes to achieve their health, revenue and equity objectives but require assistance with framing, designing, implementing and administering these measures. WHO’s response leverages its unique methodological expertise, technical capacity and country-level relationships established over more than a decade of work on tobacco taxation.
WHO divides its response into three interconnected areas of work.
Technical assistance
to help governments seeking to adopt, reform or evaluate health tax measures. This tailored assistance helps Member States address challenges raised by providing, for example, tax system diagnostics, country-specific modelling for the impact of health tax reforms and independent evaluations of industry arguments.
Capacity building
engages regulators and policymakers on an ongoing basis in their framing and prioritisation of health taxes including the development of plans for progressing, implementing and evaluating health tax policies.
Global goods
build on the latest evidence base to support country level work by defining best practices, guiding policy development, detailing technical requirements and providing data to support and benchmark policy progress."
Health technology assessment,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-technology-assessment,"New interventions and technologies are constantly being developed and refined but their impacts on health, and implications for health systems, are not always clear. Health technology assessment (HTA) is a systematic and multidisciplinary evaluation of the properties of health technologies and interventions covering both their direct and indirect consequences. It is a multidisciplinary process that aims to determine the value of a health technology and to inform guidance on how these technologies can be used in health systems around the world. HTA is a transparent and accountable process that can be used by decision makers and other stakeholders to support the decision-making process in health care at the policy level by providing evidence about given technologies It has been described as a bridge that connects the world of research to that of policy making.","As health technology assessment is a multidisciplinary approach that is applicable to all levels of a health system, WHO’s use of HTA is broad and integrated into several programs. For example, the HTA team conducts a global survey of HTA processes in WHO Member States and prepares guidance for its implementation in health systems. HTA is also used in broader evidence-informed health-related decision making, and in fair pricing guidelines for the procurement of health products.
This work is conducted through both WHO’s global partnerships and programmes and through the WHO regional offices. The regional offices support the development of HTA capacity in their Member States though advocacy and raising awareness of the use of HTA in policy development, guidance for best practices and the coordination and collaboration between Member States and established partners.","WHO’s efforts to broaden the use of HTA has resulted in more tools and resources being available for HTA globally. For example, the WHO-CHOICE tools have been used to show efficiencies in procurement in different regions of the world, and HTA methods have been applied to find cost-effective interventions to reduce road-traffic accidents in sub-Saharan Africa and South-East Asia. At the country level, WHO-CHOICE information was used in Ethiopia to determine the affordability and financial efficacy of universal health coverage.
Understanding the importance of HTA in support of universal health coverage, resolution WHA67.23 was approved during the 67th World Health Assembly. The resolution recognizes the importance of evidence-based policy development and decision-making in health systems, and HTA’s role in sustainable and effective health systems. It also calls for the promotion of HTA within national frameworks, such as those for health system research, health professional education and the establishment of universal health coverage."
Health workforce,https://www.who.int/health-topics/health-workforce,"Health systems can only function with health workers; improving health service coverage and realizing the right to the enjoyment of the highest attainable standard of health is dependent on their availability, accessibility, acceptability and quality.
WHO estimates a projected shortfall of 10 million health workers by 2030, mostly in low- and lower-middle income countries.
However, countries at all levels of socioeconomic development face, to varying degrees, difficulties in the education, employment, deployment, retention, and performance of their workforce.
The chronic under-investment in education and
    training of health workers in some countries and the mismatch between education and employment strategies in relation to health systems and population needs are contributing to continuous shortages. These are compounded by difficulties in deploying
    health workers to rural, remote and underserved areas. Moreover, the increasing international migration of health workers may exacerbate health workforce shortfalls, particularly in low- and lower-middle income countries. Human resources for health
    information systems are often weak to take stock of selected health workers from the public sector.
In some countries, challenges in universal access to health workers may also result from the lack of capacity by the public sector to absorb the supply of health workers due to budgetary constraints. As a result, some countries face the paradox of health
    worker unemployment co-existing with major unmet health needs.
The High-Level Commission on Health Employment and Economic Growth identified six pathways by which investments in the health and social workforce can spur inclusive economic growth. The health workforce has a vital role in building the resilience
    of communities and health systems to respond to disasters caused by natural or artificial hazards, as well as related environmental, technological and biological hazards and risks. Sixty-seven per cent (67%) of the health and social workforce are women and investing in the
    health workforce is an opportunity to create decent employment opportunities, in particular for women and youth.","The Global Strategy on Human Resources for Health: Workforce 2030 is the key guiding document with principles and objectives presented below:
Guiding principles
Promote the right to the enjoyment of the highest attainable standard of health.
Provide integrated, people-centred health services devoid of stigma and discrimination.
Foster empowered and engaged communities.
Uphold the personal, employment and professional rights of all health workers, including safe and decent working environments and freedom from all kinds of discrimination, coercion and violence.
Eliminate gender-based violence, discrimination and harassment.
Promote international collaboration and solidarity in alignment with national priorities.
Ensure ethical recruitment practices in conformity with the provisions of the WHO Global Code of Practice on the International Recruitment of Health Personnel.
Mobilize and sustain political and financial commitment and foster inclusiveness and collaboration across sectors and constituencies.
Promote innovation and the use of evidence.","Working for Health Programme
The Working for Health Programme is a joint partnership between the World Health Organization (WHO), International Labour Organization (ILO) and the Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) to expand and transform the health and social workforce to drive inclusive economic growth and achieve the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs).
Working for Health contributes to universal health coverage and to SDG 3, 4, 5 and 8 (health, education, gender equality, decent work and economic growth) through the
Five-Year Action Plan on Health Employment and Inclusive Economic Growth 2017-2021
.  In 2020, Working for Health supported thirty-two countries and two regional economic areas namely, the Southern African Development Community and the West African Economic and Monetary Union. The Working for Health Programme supports strengthening health workforce data globally through the
International Platform on Health Worker Mobility
Platform on Health Worker Mobility and Inter-Agency Data Exchange (IADEx).
The Global Health Workforce Network
The WHO led/coordinated network
Global Health Workforce Network
was established in 2016, following a request by Member States and building on a proposal by the Board of the Global Health Workforce Alliance. The Network operates within WHO as a global mechanism for stakeholder consultation, dialogue and coordination on comprehensive and coherent health workforce policies in support of the implementation of the Global Strategy on Human Resources for Health and the recommendations of the Commission.
Key national and local partners
ministries of health, education, labour, finance, national planning, gender, youth
professional associations and trade unions
regulatory authorities
private providers
civil society.
Key international partners
International Labour Organization (ILO), The Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD), The World Bank, The United Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF), The European Union
    (EU), International NGOs."
Healthy diet,https://www.who.int/health-topics/healthy-diet,"A healthy diet is a foundation for health, well-being, optimal growth and development.
It protects against all forms of malnutrition. Unhealthy diet is one of the
leading risks for the global burden of disease, mainly for noncommunicable
diseases such as cardiovascular diseases, diabetes, and cancer.
Evidence shows the health benefits of a diet high in whole grains, vegetables,
fruit, legumes and nuts, and low in salt, free sugars and fats, particularly
saturated and trans fats. A healthy diet starts early in life with adequate breastfeeding.
The benefits of a healthy diet are reflected in higher educational outcomes,
productivity and lifelong health.
A healthy diet is also more environmentally sustainable, as it is associated
to lower greenhouse gas emissions, lower use freshwater and land mass.
However, healthy diets can be inaccessible, particularly in low- and
middle-income countries, and also in places and situations with high rates of
food insecurity. Around the world, an estimated 3 billion people cannot access safe,
nutritious and sufficient food. In addition, the proliferation of highly
processed food, supported by aggressive marketing, rapid unplanned urbanization
and changing lifestyles have contributed to more people eating unhealthy diets
high in energy, free sugars, salt, saturated fats and trans fats.","What constitutes a healthy diet may differ depending on individual needs, locally available foods, dietary customs, cultural norms and other considerations. However, the basic principles of healthy diets remain the same for everyone. The nature of access to food requires broader solutions at the societal level to promote safe and healthy food options.
WHO recommends
to meet the needs of energy, protein, vitamins and minerals through a varied diet, largely plant based, and balancing energy intake with expenditure;
obtaining the largest amount of energy from carbohydrates, mainly through legumes and wholegrain cereals;
reducing total fats to less than 30% of total energy intake, shifting fat intake away from saturated and trans fat to unsaturated fats, and eliminating industrial trans fats from the diet;
reducing free sugars to less than 10% (ideally 5%) of total energy intake;
limiting sodium intake to less than 2 grams per day (equivalent to 5 grams of salt); and
consuming at least 400 grams of vegetables and fruit per day in adults and children above 10, and 250–350 grams per day in younger children.","WHO continuously updates the
guidance
on what constitutes a healthy diet to prevent all forms of malnutrition and promote well-being in different population groups across the life course and on how different nutrients and foods contribute to it.
WHO develops evidence-informed guidance on improving the food environment, such as school food and nutrition policies, public food procurement policies, nutrition labelling policies, policies to restricting marketing foods and beverages to children, and fiscal policies (i.e., taxation and subsidies). WHO engages with food manufacturers on improving the nutrition profile of their products.
WHO supports Member States in adopting and implementing policies by providing tools such as systems to characterize the nutrient profiles of foods, benchmarks for sodium content in food, manuals on how to implement fiscal policies and marketing restriction policies.
WHO regularly monitors the adoption and implementation of food environment policies and their impact on population dietary intake and health."
Heatwaves,https://www.who.int/health-topics/heatwaves,"Heatwaves, or heat and hot weather that can last for several days, can have a significant impact on society, including a rise in heat-related deaths. Heatwaves are among the most dangerous of natural hazards, but rarely receive adequate attention because their death tolls and destruction are not always immediately obvious. A
study
found that from 2000–2019 approximately 489 000 heat-related deaths occurred each year, including more than 70 000 who died during the 2003 heatwave in Europe.
Population exposure to heat is increasing due to climate change. Globally, extreme temperature events are observed to be increasing in their frequency, duration, and magnitude. Between 2000 and 2016, the number of people exposed to heatwaves increased by around 125 million.
While the effects of heat may be exacerbated in cities, due to the urban heat island (UHI) effect, the livelihoods and well-being of non-urban communities can also be severely disrupted during and after periods of unusually hot weather.
Heatwaves can burden health and emergency services and also increase strain on water, energy and transportation resulting in power shortages or even blackouts. Food and livelihood security may also be strained if people lose their crops or livestock due to extreme heat.","The health impact of a heatwave depends on the intensity and duration of the temperature, the acclimatization and adaptation of the population, and the infrastructure and preparedness.
Exposure to heat causes severe symptoms, such as heat exhaustion and heat stroke – a condition which causes faintness, as well as dry, warm skin, due to the inability of the body to control high temperatures. Other symptoms include swelling in the lower limbs, heat rash on the neck, cramps, headache, irritability, lethargy and weakness. Heat can cause severe dehydration, acute cerebrovascular accidents and contribute to thrombogenesis (blood clots).
People with chronic diseases that take daily medications have a greater risk of complications and death during a heatwave, as do older people and children.
Reactions to heat depends on each person’s ability to adapt and serious effects can appear suddenly. This is why it is important to pay attention to the alerts and recommendations of local authorities.","The magnitude of human costs from heatwaves can be reduced if adequate emergency prevention, preparedness, response and recovery measures are implemented in a sustainable and timely manner.
WHO works with the health sector to strengthen governance, preparedness and response to heatwaves, by developing contingency plans that map the risks, vulnerable populations, available capacities and resources. These plans also include early warning systems and ensure vulnerable populations, such as those in health facilities, nursing homes and schools have adequate provision of cooling equipment.
As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with partners to respond to:
ensure appropriate food supplementation;
restore primary care services, like immunization, child and maternal health, and mental health;
assemble mobile health teams and outreach;
conduct epidemic surveillance, early warning and response;
call for emergency funding to support health action."
Hepatitis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/hepatitis,"Hepatitis is an inflammation of the liver that is caused by a
variety of infectious viruses  and noninfectious
agents leading to a range of health problems, some of which can be fatal. There
are five main strains of the hepatitis virus, referred to as types A, B, C, D
and E. While they all cause liver disease, they differ in important ways
including modes of transmission, severity of the illness, geographical
distribution and prevention methods. In particular, types B and C lead to
chronic disease in hundreds of millions of people and together are the most
common cause of liver cirrhosis, liver cancer and viral hepatitis-related
deaths. An estimated 354 million people worldwide live with hepatitis B or C,
and for most, testing and treatment remain beyond reach.
Some types of hepatitis are preventable through vaccination. A
WHO study found that an estimated 4.5 million premature deaths could be prevented
in low- and middle-income countries by 2030 through vaccination, diagnostic
tests, medicines and education campaigns. WHO’s global hepatitis strategy,
endorsed by all WHO Member States, aims to reduce new hepatitis infections by
90% and deaths by 65% between 2016 and 2030.","Many people with hepatitis A, B, C, D or E exhibit only mild symptoms or no symptoms at all. Each form of the virus, however, can cause more severe symptoms. Symptoms of hepatitis A, B and C may include fever, malaise, loss of appetite, diarrhoea, nausea, abdominal discomfort, dark-coloured urine and jaundice (a yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes). In some cases, the virus can also cause a chronic liver infection that can later develop into cirrhosis (a scarring of the liver) or liver cancer. These patients are at risk of death.
Hepatitis D (HDV) is only found in people already infected with hepatitis B (HBV); however, the dual infection of HBV and HDV can cause a more serious infection and poorer health outcomes, including accelerated progression to cirrhosis. Development of chronic hepatitis D is rare.
Hepatitis E (HEV) begins with mild fever, reduced appetite, nausea and vomiting lasting for a few days. Some persons may also have abdominal pain, itching (without skin lesions), skin rash or joint pain. They may also exhibit jaundice, with dark urine and pale stools, and a slightly enlarged, tender liver (hepatomegaly), or occasionally acute liver failure.","Safe and effective vaccines are available to prevent hepatitis B virus (HBV). This vaccine also prevents the development of hepatitis D virus (HDV) and given at birth strongly reduces transmission risk from mother to child. Chronic hepatitis B infection can be treated with antiviral agents. Treatment can slow the progression of cirrhosis, reduce incidence of liver cancer and improve long term survival. Only a proportion of people with chronic hepatitis B infection will require treatment. A vaccine also exists to prevent infections of hepatitis E (HEV), although it is not currently widely available. There are no specific treatments for HBV and HEV and hospitalization is not usually required. It is advised to avoid unnecessary medications due to the negative effect on liver function caused by these infections.
Hepatitis C (HCV) can cause both acute and chronic infection. Some people recover on their own, while others develop a life-threatening infection or further complications, including cirrhosis or cancer. There is no vaccine for hepatitis C. Antiviral medicines can cure more than 95% of persons with hepatitis C infection, thereby reducing the risk of death from cirrhosis and liver cancer, but access to diagnosis and treatment remains low.
Hepatitis A virus (HAV) is most common is low- and middle-income countries due to reduced access to clean and reliable water sources and the increased risk of contaminated food. A safe and effective vaccine is available to prevent hepatitis A. Most HAV infections are mild, with the majority of people recovering fully and developing immunity to further infection. However, these infections can also rarely be severe and life threatening due to the risk of liver failure."
HIV,https://www.who.int/health-topics/hiv-aids,"Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) is an infection that attacks the body’s immune system, specifically the white blood cells called CD4 cells. HIV destroys these CD4 cells, weakening a person’s immunity against opportunistic infections, such
    as tuberculosis and fungal infections, severe bacterial infections and some cancers.
WHO recommends that every person who may be at risk of HIV should access testing.
People at increased risk of acquiring HIV
should seek comprehensive and effective HIV prevention, testing and treatment services.
HIV infection can be diagnosed
using simple and affordable rapid diagnostic tests, as well as self-tests. It is important that
HIV testing services
follow the 5Cs: consent, confidentiality, counselling, correct results and connection with treatment and
    other services.
People diagnosed with HIV should be offered and linked to
antiretroviral treatment (ART)
as
 soon as possible following diagnosis and
periodically monitored
using clinical and laboratory parameters, including the test to measure virus in the blood (viral load). If ART is taken consistently, this treatment also
prevents HIV transmission
to others.
At diagnosis or soon after starting ART, a CD4 cell count should be checked to assess a person’s immune status. The CD4 cell count is a blood test used to assess progression of HIV disease, including risk for developing
opportunistic infections
and guides the use of preventive treatment. The normal range of CD4 count is from 500 to 1500 cells/mm3
    of blood, and it progressively decreases over time in persons who are not receiving or not responding well to ART. If the person’s CD4 cell count falls below 200, their immunity is severely compromised, leaving them susceptible to infections
    and death. Someone with a CD4 count below 200 is described as having an
advanced HIV disease (AHD)
.
HIV viral load measures the amount of virus in the blood. This test is used to monitor the level of viral replication and effectiveness of ART. The treatment goal is to reduce the viral load in the blood to undetectable levels (less than 50 copies/ml),
    and the persistent presence of detectable viral load (greater than 1000 copies/ml) in people living with HIV on ART is an indicator of inadequate treatment response and the need to change or adjust the treatment regimen.
WHO’s 2022–2030
global health sector strategy on HIV
aims
 to reduce HIV infections from 1.5 million in 2020 to 335 000 by 2030, and deaths from 680 000 in 2020 to under 240 000 in 2030.","Many people do not feel symptoms of HIV in the first few months after infection and may not know that they are infected. Others may experience influenza-like symptoms, including fever, headache, rash and sore throat. However, these first few months are when the virus is most infectious.
As the disease progresses, symptoms will be expanded and more pronounced. These can include swollen lymph nodes, weight loss, fever, diarrhoea and cough. HIV weakens the body’s ability to fight other infections, and without treatment people will become more susceptible to
other severe illnesses
such as
tuberculosis
, cryptococcal meningitis, bacterial infections and some cancers including lymphomas and Kaposi’s sarcoma.
Diagnosis of HIV
uses rapid tests that provide same-day results and can  be done at home, although a laboratory test is required to confirm the infection. This early identification greatly improves treatment options and reduces the risk of transmission to other people including sexual or drug-sharing partners.","HIV is fully preventable. Effective
antiretroviral treatment (ART)
prevents
HIV transmission from mother to child
during pregnancy, delivery and breastfeeding. Someone who is on antiretroviral therapy and virally suppressed will not pass HIV to their sexual partners.
Condoms prevent HIV and other sexually transmitted infections, and prophylaxis use antiretroviral medicines to prevent HIV.
Male circumcision
is recommended in high-burden countries in eastern and southern Africa. Harm reduction (needle syringe programmes and opioid substitution therapy) prevents HIV and other blood-borne infections for
people who inject drugs
.
HIV is treated with antiretroviral therapy consisting of one or more medicines. ART does not cure HIV but reduces its replication in the blood, thereby reducing the viral load to an undetectable level.
ART enables people living with HIV to lead healthy, productive lives. It also works as an effective prevention,
reducing the risk of onward transmission by 96%
.
ART should be taken every day throughout the person’s life. People can continue with
safe and effective ART
if they adhere to their treatment. In cases when ART becomes ineffective -
HIV drug resistance
- due to reasons such as lost contact with health care providers and drug stockouts, people will need to switch to other medicines to protect their health."
Hospitals,https://www.who.int/health-topics/hospitals,"Hospitals complement and amplify the effectiveness of many other parts of the health system, providing continuous availability of services for acute and complex conditions. They concentrate scarce resources within well-planned referral networks to respond efficiently to population health needs. They are an essential element of
Universal Health Coverage (UHC)
and will be critical to meeting the Sustainable Development Goals (SDG).
Hospitals are also an essential part of
health system
development. Currently, external pressures, health systems shortcomings and hospital sector deficiencies are driving a new vision for hospitals in many parts of the world. In this vision, they have a key role to play to support other healthcare providers and for community outreach and home-based services and are essential in a well-functioning referral network.
Hospitals matter to people and often mark central points in their lives. They also matter to health systems by being instrumental for care coordination and integration. They often provide a setting for education of doctors, nurses and other health-care professionals and are a critical base for clinical research.","Hospitals should reflect the needs and values of the communities in and around them, while also being resilient and able to maintain and scale up services in emergency situations. Effective hospitals are designed for their users, with attention to the needs of special populations, such as children and the elderly. A well-designed hospital environment maximizes the effectiveness of clinical care delivery and enhances the well-being of patients and hospital staff.
Adequate and reliable infrastructure, technologies and supplies form the backbone of the hospital. Key infrastructure (such as well-planned spaces, water and energy, telecommunications) must support daily functioning, and be designed with redundancy to ensure continued safe and effective operation, even during a disaster or crisis. Appropriate and good quality medical and ICT technologies and supplies should be available for specialized
health workforce
to meet the population needs.
Hospital functions and organization vary according to health-care delivery organizations and each hospital’s unique position in the system. Good management structures ensure coordination among staff, services, infrastructure and supply chains to deliver high-quality care. Clinical registries and structured data audits facilitate rapid identification of high-yield areas for improvement. Regular monitoring of service quality with targeted intervention to address gaps drives ongoing improvement.","Hospitals are reservoirs of critical resources and knowledge. They can be classified according to the interventions they provide, the roles they play in the health system and the health and educational services they offer to the communities in and around them. They are often the focal point for health care in a community and lead by example for sustainable development, the strengthening of health systems and in building healthy communities. Effective hospitals seek new ways to support care outside their walls to ensure people can be cared for closer to their home, within their community and at a sustainable cost.
Decision-makers at the national and sub-national level create conditions to drive, enable and sustain the paradigm shift in what hospitals do and how they perform. As system architects, they need to maintain oversight of all ongoing health and health system reforms and ensure policies and incentives are coherent and aligned. Major structural reforms outside the health sector, such as decentralization, civil service, privatization and trade, greatly impact the hospital sector and need to be taken into consideration at the macro level when assessing possibilities for hospital sector transformations."
Human African trypanosomiasis (sleeping sickness),https://www.who.int/health-topics/human-african-trypanosomiasis,"Human African trypanosomiasis (HAT), or sleeping sickness, is caused by trypanosome parasites that are transmitted by tsetse flies. HAT is found only in sub-Saharan Africa. Two subspecies of
Trypanosoma brucei
cause disease:
T. b. gambiense
in West and Central Africa, and
T. b. rhodesiense
in East Africa.
This life-threatening disease mostly affects poor rural populations, causing significant harm. Travellers to endemic regions may also be at risk of infection.
HAT transmission requires the interaction of humans, tsetse flies and parasite reservoirs (humans, and domestic and wild animals). The animal reservoir is very important in
T. b. rhodesiense
and less so in
T. b. gambiense
, although it could explain the long-term endemicity in some foci despite control interventions.
Transmission can be interrupted by depleting the parasite reservoirs through detection and treatment of infected people and/or domestic animals and by reducing the tsetse fly population and human–tsetse contact.
In 1995, about 25 000 cases were detected, 300 000 undetected cases were estimated and 60 million people were estimated to be at risk of HAT infection. In 2001, WHO launched an initiative to reinforce control and surveillance, and HAT decreased markedly in the ensuing years. Since 2019, fewer than 1000 cases are reported yearly. This reduction does not reflect a lack of control efforts as in general active and passive screening has been maintained at similar levels (around 2.5 million people screened per year).","After infection, trypanosomes multiply in the blood and lymph (first-stage, haemolymphatic) and, following a variable incubation period (from days to months), unspecific symptoms and signs such as headache, fever, weakness, joint pain, and lymphadenopathy appear. Over time, the parasites cross the blood–brain barrier to invade the central nervous system (second-stage, meningoencephalitic), causing various neurological disturbances including sleep disorders (excessive daytime sleepiness, nocturnal insomnia), deep sensory disturbances, abnormal movements, tremor, ataxia, walking difficulties, speech difficulties, psychiatric disorders, seizures, coma and ultimately death. Most signs and symptoms are common to both stages, and sleep disorders in particular can appear already during the first stage.
Rhodesiense HAT is typically acute, progressing to second-stage within a few weeks, and to death within 6 months. Gambiense HAT progresses slowly over around 3 years (highly variable).
An inoculation chancre (dermal reaction of 3–4 cm at the tsetse bite site) may appear 2–3 days after infection with rhodesiense HAT in up to 25% of local patients, but more frequently in patients from non-endemic regions. It is rare with gambiense HAT.
Sleeping sickness is diagnosed in several steps: after a clinical suspicion, serological tests (card agglutination trypanosomiasis test or HAT rapid diagnostic tests) can reinforce the suspicion, which should be confirmed by parasitological findings (in chancre exudate, lymphatic juice, blood and cerebrospinal fluid). Unfortunately, the usual serological tests are only applicable to
T. b. gambiense.
Stage is determined by the number of white blood cells and the presence of trypanosomes in cerebrospinal fluid examination.","All confirmed HAT cases require treatment. Available treatment can cure most patients, completely eliminating trypanosomes from the body. Treatment of cases suspected by serology depends on specific conditions set by national protocols, which usually
    set specific conditions defining a higher suspicion index.
The current treatment options include six medicines, all of which are donated by the manufacturers; WHO ensures their worldwide distribution free of charge.
Treatment choices are based on the causative trypanosome and the disease stage. The medicines for treatment of second-stage must cross the blood–brain barrier and tend to be more toxic and complex to administer than first-stage medicines.
In 2019, WHO issued
interim guidelines for treatment of gambiense HAT
. For treatment
    of rhodesiense HAT,
the former guidelines
remain valid.
Gambiense HAT
can be treated with oral fexinidazole in first-stage and also non-severe second-stage, with some limitations of age and body weight and following some important specific rules to ensure efficacy. In first-stage, intramuscular
    pentamidine can be also used, and in second stage nifurtimox–eflornithine combination therapy (NECT).
Rhodesiense HAT
must be treated without delay, because it can provoke multi-organ failure and progress to second stage within a few weeks. In first-stage, the treatment is intravenous suramin, with pentamidine as an alternative. In second-stage,
    the only treatment is intravenous melarsoprol."
Human genome editing,https://www.who.int/health-topics/human-genome-editing,"Genome editing is a method for making specific changes to the DNA of a cell or organism. It can be used to add, remove or alter DNA in the genome. Human genome editing technologies can be used on somatic cells (non-heritable), germline cells (not for reproduction) and germline cells (for reproduction).
Application of somatic human genome editing has already been undertaken, including in vivo editing, to address HIV and sickle-cell disease, for example. Although somatic human genome editing is well established and acceptable for treatments in some scientifically advanced countries with regulations in place, challenges remain. These include the need to develop inclusive genome editing innovations that take note of the diversity of the human population and human experience. Other challenges are associated with rogue clinics, medical travel, as well as the reporting of illegal, unregistered, unethical or unsafe research and other activities including the offer of unproven so-called therapeutic interventions.
Heritable human genome editing refers to editing of nuclear DNA in a way that may be heritable across generations. Heritable human genome editing is the subject of intense debate over its possible consequences for offspring and for society in general. They may pose greater safety and ethical issues than somatic human genome editing.","The recent application of tools, such as CRISPR-Cas9, to edit the human genome with the intention to treating or preventing disease and the gaps in our scientific understanding raise ethical issues that have highlighted the need for robust oversight in this area. Current, potential and speculative human genome editing research will go beyond national borders, as will possible societal effects. This applies equally to somatic, germline and heritable human genome editing, although the latter is generally considered to be of greater ethical concern. Therefore, governance for this technology is needed at national and transnational levels. Some of the necessary governance structures and processes already exist. These may need to be reinforced or amended; where such structures and processes are lacking, gaps need to be filled.
Application of heritable human genome editing is likely to be a much more limited activity in the coming years. To help ensure heritable human genome editing does not proceed prematurely to clinical trials, the WHO Expert Advisory Committee recommended, and the WHO Director-General subsequently made, a policy statement in July 2019 clarifying that “it would be irresponsible at this time for anyone to proceed with clinical applications of human germline genome editing.”","In December 2018, WHO established a global, multi-disciplinary Expert Advisory Committee to examine the scientific, ethical, social and legal challenges associated with human genome editing (somatic, that is, non-heritable; germline, involving in vitro
    studies on early embryos, gametes or their precursors; and heritable, where embryos subject to genome editing are used to establish pregnancies and create individuals who could pass on the edit to their offspring).
The Committee was tasked to advise and make recommendations on appropriate institutional, national, regional and global governance mechanisms for human genome editing. During its work, the Committee reviewed the current literature on human genome editing
    research and its applications, considered existing proposals for governance and relevant ongoing initiatives, and gathered information on a range of topics relating to the different uses of this technology. The Committee consulted widely and built
    on existing initiatives to develop a governance framework and recommendations on the governance and oversight of human genome editing.
In July 2021, the Committee published a governance framework for human genome editing and recommendations on human genome editing. Additional outputs of the Committee include a
global registry on human genome editing
,
a policy statement by the Director-General on germline human genome editing
and the
reports
of the Committee’s work."
Human rights,https://www.who.int/health-topics/human-rights,"Health is a fundamental right of every human being. Health as a human right is recognized in the WHO Constitution (1948), the Universal Declaration of Human Rights (1948) and many international and regional human rights treaties. All WHO Member States have ratified at least one treaty that recognizes the right to the highest attainable standard of physical and mental health.
This means that countries have legal obligations, while acknowledging that time and resources are required to fully achieve them. Some immediate obligations for countries include the guarantees of non-discrimination and equal treatment in health. The right to health includes entitlements, such as the right to control one’s health, informed consent, bodily integrity, and participation in health-related decision-making. It also includes freedoms, like freedom from torture, ill-treatment and harmful practices.
The right to health is closely related to and dependent on the realization of other human rights, including the rights to life, food, housing, work, education, privacy, access to information, freedom from torture and the freedoms of association, assembly and movement. It includes both nondiscriminatory access to quality, timely and appropriate health services and systems and to the underlying determinants of health.","A human rights-based approach (HRBA) aims to support sustainable development by addressing inequalities, discriminatory practices and unjust power relations that are often at the core of unequal outcomes. HRBA focuses on the groups of people who are most marginalized and discriminated against. The United Nations common understanding of a HRBA serves as a guiding framework. It has the following elements.
Goal:
All programmes, policies and technical assistance should further the realization of the right to health and other health-related human rights.
Process:
Human rights standards and principles – such as participation, accountability, equality and non-discrimination – are integrated into all stages of the health programming cycle, including assessment, priority setting, planning and design, implementation and monitoring and evaluation.
Outcome:
Institutions, processes and systems need to ensure that people are empowered to understand and claim their health-related rights. States are the primary duty bearers and must be supported to deliver on their human rights obligations. Non-State actors, like the private sector and non-governmental organizations, also have human rights obligations. Policy makers and parliamentarians must use their regulatory powers to ensure the respect, protection and fulfilment of health-related rights, health and safety standards and labour rights, among others.","WHO supports country efforts to integrate human rights into health systems, programmes and policies. To achieve this, WHO provides guidance on human rights in the context of health issues, such as HIV, maternal and child health, mental health and others. WHO also provides support to countries to strengthen national health systems to ensure that services are universally available, accessible, acceptable and of high quality. WHO's political leadership on the right to health focuses on supporting countries to review laws, policies and practices to ensure they support the right to health.
WHO's human rights work aligns with the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs). To meet the SDGs, WHO produces and disseminates tools and guidance to identify who is being left behind and why, as well as guidance on social participation to ensure accountability. WHO also supports countries to use international and regional human rights accountability mechanisms to advance health related rights."
Hypertension,https://www.who.int/health-topics/hypertension,"Hypertension, also known as high or raised blood pressure, is a condition in which the blood vessels have persistently raised pressure. Blood is carried from the heart to all parts of the body in the vessels. Each time the heart beats, it pumps blood into the vessels. Blood pressure is created by the force of blood pushing against the walls of blood vessels (arteries) as it is pumped by the heart. The higher the pressure, the harder the heart has to pump.
Hypertension is a serious medical condition and can increase the risk of heart, brain, kidney and other diseases. It is a major cause of premature death worldwide, with upwards of 1 in 4 men and 1 in 5 women – over a billion people ­– having the condition. The burden of hypertension is felt disproportionately in low- and middle-income countries, where two thirds of cases are found, largely due to increased risk factors in those populations in recent decades.","Many people with hypertension do not notice symptoms and may be unaware there is a problem. Symptoms can include early morning headaches, nosebleeds, irregular heart rhythms, vision changes, and buzzing in the ears. More severe forms may exhibit fatigue, nausea, vomiting, confusion, anxiety, chest pain, and muscle tremors. If left untreated, hypertension can cause persistent chest pain (also called angina), heart attacks, heart failure, and an irregular heartbeat, which can lead to a sudden death.
Hypertension can also cause strokes by blocking or bursting arteries that supply blood and oxygen to the brain, as well as kidney damage, which can lead to kidney failure. High blood pressure causes damage to the heart by hardening arteries and decreasing the flood of blood and oxygen to the heart.
Detecting hypertension is done with a quick and painless test of blood pressure. This can be done at home, but a health professional can help assess any risks or associated conditions.","Reducing modifiable risk factors is the best way to prevent hypertension and associated diseases of the heart, brain, kidney and other organs. These factors include unhealthy diets (excessive salt consumption, a diet high in saturated fat and trans fats, low intake of fruits and vegetables), physical inactivity, consumption of tobacco and alcohol, and being overweight or obese. Additionally, prolonged exposure to air pollution increases the risk of hypertension in adults.
There are also non-modifiable risk factors, including a family history of hypertension, age over 65 years and co-existing diseases such as diabetes or kidney disease. Avoiding dietary and behavioural risk factors is doubly important for those with unmodifiable or hereditary risk factors.
Hypertension can be managed by reducing and managing mental stress, regularly checking blood pressure and consulting with health professionals, treating high blood pressure and managing other medical conditions. Cessation of tobacco use and the harmful use of alcohol, as well as improvements in diet and exercise, can help reduce symptoms and risk factors from hypertension."
In vitro diagnostics,https://www.who.int/health-topics/in-vitro-diagnostics,"In vitro diagnostics (IVDs) are tests that can detect disease, conditions and infections. In vitro simply means ‘in glass’, meaning these tests are typically conducted in test tubes and similar equipment, as opposed to in vivo tests, which are conducted in the body itself. In vitro tests may be done in laboratories, health care facilities or even in the home. The tests themselves can be performed on a variety of instruments ranging from small, handheld tests to complex laboratory instruments. They allow doctors to diagnose patients effectively and work to provide appropriate treatments.
Diagnosis is a driver of patient, financial and health systems impact, and a critical enabler of universal health coverage, but it is also the weakest link in the care cascade. This is especially true in primary healthcare settings in low- and middle-income countries. These countries often lack an integrated network of laboratories used for such diagnosis; however, broad set of IVDs is available for testing patients in the primary care setting where laboratories are not available.","Over 40 000 products are available today for in vitro diagnostic testing, covering a wide range of conditions. These include traditional laboratory-based tests, with samples being sent to a central laboratory for analysis, and point-of-care tests, which can be performed near, or at, the point of patient care. Point-of-care testing can help optimize treatment decision-making, avoid referrals, improve the efficiency of care and decrease costs, especially in resource-constrained settings where laboratory infrastructure is weak.
Diagnostic tests are increasingly important around the world as a first defence against the spread of many diseases. The fight against tuberculosis, for example, replies on modern diagnostics as a prerequisite for the early, rapid and accurate detection of the disease and changes in drug resistance used in its treatment.
In vitro diagnostics are also the first line of defence against the possibility of the re-emergence of eradicated diseases. Smallpox, for example, is unlikely to reappear; however, WHO maintains a network of partnerships around the world dedicated to the rapid diagnosis and containment of any potential cases.","Access to good quality, affordable, and appropriate health products is indispensable to advance universal health coverage, address health emergencies, and promote healthier populations – the three strategic priorities of the World Health Organization (WHO) Thirteenth General Programme of Work 2019–2023.
To ensure the quality of diagnosis for priority diseases, the WHO prequalification team evaluates the safety and performance of a number of diagnostic tests according to international standards. Tests found to meet the required criteria are listed on a public web site and eligible for procurement by UN and international procurement agencies. Countries may also use the prequalification list to purchase diagnostics.
The WHO procurement service for in vitro diagnostics was established in 1990 to facilitate Member States' access to high quality HIV test kits at a reasonable cost. Over the years, the service has expanded to include diagnostics for HIV/AIDS, malaria, hepatitis B and hepatitis C, as well as basic laboratory consumables and equipment.
The WHO also develops and updates the WHO Model List of Essential in vitro Diagnostics (EDL), a list of recommended in vitro diagnostic tests (IVDs) for  point of care in the community and for laboratory,  that should be available in every country. The EDL provides guidance based on the latest evidence, to countries for creating or updating their national lists of essential IVDs."
Infant nutrition,https://www.who.int/health-topics/infant-nutrition,"Proper infant nutrition is fundamental to a child’s continued health, from birth through adulthood. Correct feeding in the first three years of life is particularly important due to its role in lowering morbidity and mortality, reducing the risk of chronic disease throughout their life span, and promoting regular mental and physical development.
Although every infant and child has the right to good nutrition under the Convention on the Rights of the Child, in many countries less than a fourth of infants have access to the required dietary diversity and feeding frequency. Inappropriate feeding practices contribute up to a third of all cases of child malnutrition. This is compounded by the proliferation of processed foods like infant formula and products rich in salt, free sugars and trans fats. This causes an increase in poor diets, obesity and a marked reduction in the number of mothers breastfeeding their babies. Breastfeeding has been shown to be of critical importance to a child’s development, including increased IQ, school performance and higher income in adult life.
WHO continues to work with Member States and partners to promote proper infant and child nutrition, including breastfeeding information campaigns and efforts to prevent malnutrition at the local, national, and international levels.
Learn about Nutrition and Food Safety and COVID-19","Malnutrition affects over 2 billion people worldwide, and the burden is felt disproportionately by people in low- and middle-income countries. Infants and children are particularly vulnerable, with most deaths due to malnutrition occurring in children under 5 years of age.
It is estimated that more than 144 million children under 5 are stunted (meaning too short for their age) and 47 million are wasted (too thin for their height). A further 38.3 million are overweight or obese. Undernutrition, which can occur alone or concurrently with obesity in what is called the double burden of malnutrition, is associated with 2.7 million child deaths each year, or 45% of all deaths in children.
Malnutrition in the early years of life can have long-lasting impacts on physical and mental development, which in turn affect a person’s educational performance and later employment opportunities. The extent of this issue is such that it has a sizable effect on economic markers in some countries and is considered a major global health problem.","Reducing global malnutrition begins with a proper diet during pregnancy and correct breastfeeding of infants. WHO recommends breastfeeding babies exclusively for 6 months, with safe and complementary foods being added slowly until age two or beyond. This means babies should receive only breastmilk from the mother or wet nurse with no other liquids or solids, including water unless required (such as oral rehydration solutions or vitamin and mineral supplements).
With proper breastfeeding, it is estimated that over 820 000 children’s lives could be saved each year, with marked improvements in other development markers throughout the child’s life. Currently, only about 40% of infants are exclusively breastfed.
WHO works to implement the initiatives outlined in the
United Nations Decade of Action on Nutrition 2016–2025
in collaboration with Member States and partners. The goals of the campaign include improving the nutritional status of the population in all areas, particularly in early life, by preventing and treating malnutrition among pregnant women and young children."
Infection prevention and control,https://www.who.int/health-topics/infection-prevention-and-control,"Infection prevention and control (IPC) is a practical, evidence-based approach preventing patients and health workers from being harmed by avoidable infections. Effective IPC requires constant action at all levels of the health system, including policymakers, facility managers, health workers and those who access health services. IPC is unique in the field of patient safety and quality of care, as it is universally relevant to every health worker and patient, at every health care interaction. Defective IPC causes harm and can kill. Without effective IPC it is impossible to achieve quality health care delivery.
Infection prevention and control effects all aspects of health care, including hand hygiene, surgical site infections, injection safety, antimicrobial resistance and how hospitals operate during and outside of emergencies. Programmes to support IPC are particularly important in low- and middle-income countries, where health care delivery and medical hygiene standards may be negatively affected by secondary infections.","Much of the work done on infection prevention and control (IPC) is hidden, as by its nature it prevents issues rather than treating them after the fact. However, health care-associated infections (HAIs) are an ongoing problem that no health authority can afford to ignore. To help in this fight, WHO has created a number of programmes and campaigns that set standards for evidence-based recommendations and operating procedures and promote behaviours to limit avoidable infections.
The first WHO Global Patient Challenge laid the foundations for the IPC Global Unit, which works to support country capacity-building for IPC action. Through this programme, WHO provides technical assistance for developing local IPC policies and guidelines, performs in-country assessments, convenes meetings focused on guideline development and provides ongoing support for health care providers.
WHO also makes a global annual call to action for health workers though the SAVE LIVES: Clean Your Hands campaign held each May. This campaign seeks to educate health workers and patients on the importance of effective hand washing, the need for which has become more acute with the COVID-19 pandemic.",N/A
Infertility,https://www.who.int/health-topics/infertility,"Infertility is a global health issue affecting millions of people of reproductive age
    worldwide. Available data suggests that globally one in six people experience infertility in their lifetime. Infertility is a disease of the male or female
    reproductive system defined by the failure to achieve a pregnancy after 12 months or
    more of regular unprotected sexual intercourse. Primary infertility is the inability to
    have any pregnancy, while secondary infertility is the inability to have a pregnancy
    after previously successful conception. WHO’s International Classification of Diseases
    provides more information on the many primary and secondary causes of infertility in
    both women and men.
Infertility may occur due to male factors, female factors, a combination of male and
    female factors or may be unexplained. For both women and men, however,
    lifestyle factors such as smoking, excessive alcohol intake and obesity
    have been associated with higher chances of infertility.","Every human being has a right to the enjoyment of the highest attainable standard of physical and mental health. Individuals and couples have the right to decide the number, timing and spacing of their children. Addressing infertility is therefore an
important part of realizing the right of individuals and couples to found a family.
A wide variety of people globally may require infertility management and fertility care services. Disparities in access to fertility care services adversely affect the poor, unmarried, uneducated, unemployed
and other underserved and marginalised populations.
Infertility has significant negative impacts on the lives of infertile couples. Women in particular are at greater risk of violence, divorce, social stigma, emotional stress, depression, anxiety
and low self-esteem. In some settings, fear of infertility can deter women and men from using contraception if they feel socially pressured to prove their fertility at an early age because of a high social value of childbearing. Infertility can also
have negative economic impact when households incur catastrophic out-of-pocket expenditure to access treatment.","Availability, access, and quality of interventions to address infertility remain a
challenge in most countries. Prevention, diagnosis and treatment of infertility are often not prioritized in national policies and are rarely covered through public health
financing. A lack of necessary equipment and trained personnel, together with the high
costs of treatment, are additional barriers preventing universal access to fertility care.
While assisted reproduction technology (ART) has been available for over three
decades, it is still largely unaffordable in many parts of the world.
The World Health Organization is committed to addressing infertility and is currently working on a programme on infertility research and fertility care. It is also developing guidelines on the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of male and female infertility, as part of global norms and standards.
WHO is engaging with countries to address infertility within an enabling legal and
policy environment and to support the generation of data on the burden of infertility.
WHO is working with relevant stakeholders including academic centres, ministries of
health, UN organizations, non-state actors and other partners to strengthen political
commitment, and health system capacity related to fertility care."
Influenza (avian and other zoonotic),https://www.who.int/health-topics/influenza-avian-and-other-zoonotic,"Animal influenza viruses are distinct from human seasonal influenza viruses and do not easily transmit between humans. However, zoonotic influenza viruses - animal influenza viruses that may occasionally infect humans through direct or indirect contact - can cause disease in humans ranging from a mild illness to death.
Birds are the natural hosts for
avian influenza viruses
. After an outbreak of A(H5N1) virus in 1997 in poultry in Hong Kong SAR, China, since 2003, this avian and other influenza viruses have spread from Asia to Europe and Africa. In 2013, human infections with the influenza A(H7N9) virus were reported in China.
Most
swine influenza viruses
do not cause disease in humans, but some countries have reported cases of human infection from certain swine influenza viruses. Close proximity to infected pigs or visiting locations where pigs are exhibited has been reported for most human cases, but some limited human-to-human transmission has occurred.
Just like birds and pigs, other animals such as horses and dogs, can be infected with their own influenza viruses (canine influenza viruses, equine influenza viruses, etc.).","Avian, swine and other zoonotic influenza infections in humans may cause disease ranging from mild upper respiratory infection (fever and cough) to rapid progression to severe pneumonia, acute respiratory distress syndrome, shock and even death.
Gastrointestinal symptoms such as nausea, vomiting and diarrhea has been reported more frequently in A(H5N1) infection. Conjunctivitis has also been reported in influenza A(H7).
Disease features such as the incubation period, severity of symptoms and clinical outcome varies by the virus causing infection but mainly manifests with respiratory symptoms.","Evidence suggests that some
antiviral drugs
, notably
neuraminidase inhibitor
(oseltamivir, zanamivir), can reduce the duration of viral replication and improve prospects of survival, however ongoing clinical studies are needed. Emergence of oseltamivir resistance has been reported."
Influenza seasonal,https://www.who.int/health-topics/influenza-seasonal,"Seasonal influenza is an acute respiratory infection caused by influenza viruses which circulate in all parts of the world. It represents a year-round disease burden. It causes illnesses that range in severity and sometimes lead to hospitalization and death.
Most people recover from fever and other symptoms within a week without requiring medical attention. However, influenza can cause severe illness or death, particularly among high risk groups including the very young, the elderly, pregnant women, health workers and those with serious medical conditions.
In temperate climates, seasonal epidemics occur mainly during winter, while in tropical regions, influenza may occur throughout the year, causing outbreaks more irregularly.","Seasonal influenza is characterized by a sudden onset of fever, cough (usually dry), headache, muscle and joint pain, severe malaise (feeling unwell), sore throat and a runny nose. The cough can be severe and can last two or more weeks.","For patients that are not in a high risk group, treatment focuses on relieving symptoms of influenza such as fever. Patients that are known to be in a group at high risk for developing severe or complicated illness should seek medical attention and should be treated with antiviral drug as soon as possible."
Infodemic,https://www.who.int/health-topics/infodemic,"An infodemic is too much information including false or misleading information in digital and physical environments during a disease outbreak. It causes confusion and risk-taking behaviours that can harm health. It also leads to mistrust
    in health authorities and undermines the public health response. An infodemic can intensify or lengthen outbreaks when people are unsure about what they need to do to protect their health and the health of people around them.
    With growing digitization – an expansion of social media and internet use – information can spread more rapidly. This can help to more quickly fill information voids but can also amplify harmful messages.
Infodemic management is the systematic use of risk- and evidence-based analysis and approaches to manage the infodemic and reduce its impact on health behaviours during health emergencies.
Infodemic management aims to enable good health practices through 4 types of activities:
Listening to community concerns and questions
Promoting understanding of risk and health expert advice
Building resilience to misinformation
Engaging and empowering communities to take positive action
Subscribe to the
Infodemic Management News Flash
to receive latest biweekly updates from the team.","Member States have recognized the importance and need of an infodemic response through recent
resolutions
,
coming together in solidarity
and responding to calls for actions. Therefore, WHO is building partnerships across all societies to respond to the COVID-19 infodemic and is developing country tools for infodemic management that can be used now and for future infodemics.
During the COVID-19 pandemic, WHO has worked with the UN family, tech sector, media, civil society and other amplifying communities to understand concerns, co-develop messages, extend the reach of health information, and to respond to the information needs of communities. WHO has also worked with academia to develop
a public health research agenda for infodemic management
, and with a diverse group of experts to develop a competency framework and
trainings in infodemic management
.
WHO is championing universal access to credible health information, and building resilience to misinformation for people worldwide. At the same time, more efforts are needed to better understand the scale of the infodemic, and impact of strategies used to manage it, in order to develop new toolkits for countries.
Through regional networks, such as the Africa Infodemic Response Alliance, WHO is fostering new approaches to meet changing needs for an evolving health emergency infodemic response. This is providing a foundation for further collaborations to also improve preparedness and early detection of emerging and resurgent health threats.","WHO is working with partners across society to strengthen the scientific discipline of infodemiology. The purpose is to build and deliver sustainable tools that health authorities and communities can use to prevent and overcome the harmful impacts caused by infodemics.
Through partnerships, WHO works to bolster digital capabilities and leverage social inoculation principles to foster higher digital and health literacy, build resilience to misinformation, and deliver innovative ways to reach communities with reliable health information. Here are a few of those innovations:
Developing a
public health research agenda
that provides guidance for where to invest in research to better understand, measure and respond to infodemics
Establishing
EARS
, an early AI-supported response and social listening tool to help health authorities quickly identify rising narratives and “information voids” that interfere with people getting the information they need to make good health choices
Running a weekly aggregate of publicly available social and news media, web analytics and online search data
to identify and understand online infodemic-related conversation patterns
Conducting visual network analyses to better understand the ecosystems where misinformation is able to thrive
Establishing a repository of ~200 active COVID-19 fact-checking groups
that verify COVID-19 related claims in more than 40 languages
Refining an AI-based infodemic observatory to assess the current status of misinformation and disinformation diffusion
To advance progress on infodemiology, WHO regularly convenes the global community for conferences to discuss and chart ways forward on infodemic management topics."
Intellectual property and trade,https://www.who.int/health-topics/intellectual-property,"Intellectual property refers to intellectual activity in the industrial, scientific, literary and artistic fields. In the context of health care, the concept relates to topics such as the use of generic medicines, specifically how companies can market and sell these products within specific geographic regions. Intellectual property rights and the laws that govern them are important both to the control of standards and access to medicines, but also as an incentive for the development of new pharmaceuticals and health care products.
There has been great debate in recent years about the issue of intellectual property protection relating to access to generic medicines. This is particularly the case in areas where drug development is needed to treat a disease endemic to the region, but where the market is not large enough to support the costs of research. The balance needed between access and profit are at the heart of these debates and continue through discussions of free trade and regulation.","Much of WHO’s work with intellectual property and trade relates to the World Trade Organization framework from 2001, known as the
Doha Declaration
and the
Agreement on Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights (TRIPS)
. In 2006, the WHO Commission on Intellectual Property Rights, Innovation and Public Health (CIPIH) submitted its report containing 60 recommendations
    aimed at fostering innovation and improving access to medicines.
Since the entry into force of the TRIPS Agreement, many resolutions of the World Health Assemblies have requested WHO to address the impact of trade agreements and intellectual property
protection on public health and access to medicines. WHO closely collaborates with other relevant international and regional organizations, such as the World Trade Organization and the World Intellectual Property Organization, to support Member States
on matters of intellectual property and trade policies, conduct training on the health impact of trade agreements, research innovation and intellectual property, and facilitate access to patent information.","Intellectual property rights to medicines and other medical products can be an incentive for the private sector to pursue innovation. However, this system is made more complicated for products intended for populations where the potential paying market is small or uncertain. Low- and middle-income countries, which account for more than 80% of the world’s population, are responsible for just 10% of global sales of many drugs due to the difficulty in affording or accessing necessary products. Poverty affects purchasing power, and the inability of poor people to pay reduces effective demand, which in turn affects the degree of interest of for-profit companies.
Member States, the pharmaceutical industry, charitable foundations and nongovernmental organizations have taken initiatives in recent years to develop new products against diseases affecting poor and middle-income countries and to increase access to existing health products and medical devices. International intellectual property agreements also contain flexibilities that could facilitate increased access to necessary pharmaceutical products. However, these initiatives are not sufficient to surmount the challenges of ensuring access and innovation for needed health products and medical devices. Much work is required to reverse the skewing of world drug markets towards the wealthiest nations."
International Health Regulations,https://www.who.int/health-topics/international-health-regulations,"While disease outbreaks and other acute public health risks are often unpredictable and require a range of responses, the International Health Regulations (2005) (IHR) provide an overarching legal framework that defines countries’ rights and obligations in handling  public health events and emergencies that have the potential to cross borders.
The IHR are an instrument of international law that is legally-binding on 196 countries, including the 194 WHO Member States. The IHR  grew out of the response to  deadly epidemics that once overran Europe. They create rights and obligations for countries, including the requirement to report public health events. The Regulations also  outline the criteria to determine whether or not a particular event constitutes a  “public health emergency of international concern”.
At the same time, the IHR require countries to designate a National IHR Focal Point for communications with WHO, to establish and maintain core capacities for surveillance and response, including at designated points of entry. Additional provisions address the areas of  international travel and transport such as the health documents required for international traffic.
Finally, the IHR introduce important safeguards to protect the rights of travellers and other persons in relation to the treatment of personal data, informed consent and non-discrimination in the application of health measures under the Regulations.","The responsibility for implementing the IHR rests upon all States Parties that are bound by the Regulations and on WHO. Governments  are responsible, including all of their sectors, ministries, levels, officials and personnel for implementing IHR at the national level.
WHO plays the coordinating role in IHR implementation and, together with its partners, helps countries to build capacities.
The IHR require that all countries have the ability to do the following:
Detect: Make sure surveillance systems can detect acute public health events  in timely matter
Assess and report: Use the decision instrument in Annex 2 of the IHR to assess public health event and report to WHO through their National IHR Focal Point those that may constitute a public health emergency of international concern
Respond: Respond to public health risks and emergencies
The goal of country implementation is to limit the spread of health risks to neighbouring countries and to prevent unwarranted travel and trade restrictions.","To support countries in strengthening and maintaining their capacities for ensuring rapid detection, verification and response to public health risks, WHO develops and provides tools, guidance and training.
WHO’s support focuses on the priority needs identified by the WHO Regional and Country Offices, in order to help each country meet its IHR commitment. This includes:
designating WHO IHR Contact Points at the headquarters or the regional level;
conducting global public health surveillance and assessment of significant public health events;
disseminating public health information to Member States;
offering technical assistance to Member States;
supporting Member States in their efforts to assess their existing national public health structures and capacities for surveillance and response, including at designated points of entry;
monitoring the implementation of IHR (2005) and updating guidelines; and
if required, determining whether or not a particular event constitutes a public health emergency of international concern (PHEIC), with advice from external experts.
If a PHEIC is declared, WHO develops and recommends the critical health measures for implementation by Member States during such an emergency."
Landslides,https://www.who.int/health-topics/landslides,"Landslides are more widespread than any other geological event, and can occur anywhere in the world. They occur when large masses of soil, rocks or debris move down a slope due to a natural phenomenon or human activity. Mudslides or debris flows are also a common type of fast-moving landslide.
Landslides can accompany heavy rains or follow droughts, earthquakes or volcanic eruptions. Areas most vulnerable to landslides include:
steep terrain, including areas at the bottom of canyons;
land previously burned by wildfires;
land that has been modified due to human activity, such as deforestation or construction;
channels along a stream or river;
any area were surface runoff is directed or land is heavily saturated.
Between 1998-2017, landslides affected an estimated 4.8 million people and cause more than 18 000 deaths. Climate change and rising temperatures are expected to trigger more landslides, especially in mountainous areas with snow and ice. As permafrost melts, rocky slopes can become more unstable resulting in a landslide.","Landslides can cause high mortality and injuries from rapidly flowing water and debris. The most common cause of death in a landslide is trauma or suffocation by entrapment.
Broken power, water, gas or sewage pipes can also result in injury or illness in the population affected, such as water-borne diseases, electrocution or lacerations from falling debris. People affected by landslides can also have short- and long-term mental health effects due to loss of family, property, livestock or crops.
Landslides can also greatly impact the health system and essential services, such as water, electricity or communication lines.","The magnitude of the physical and human costs from landslides can be reduced if adequate emergency prevention, preparedness, response and recovery measures are implemented in a sustainable and timely manner.
WHO works with Member States to build resilient and proactive health systems that can anticipate the needs and challenges during emergencies so that they are more likely to reduce risks and respond effectively when needed.
As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with partners to respond to:
ensure appropriate food supplementation;
restore primary care services, like immunization, child and maternal health, and mental health;
assemble mobile health teams and outreach;
conduct epidemic surveillance, early warning and response;
call for emergency funding to support health action."
Lassa fever,https://www.who.int/health-topics/lassa-fever,"Lassa fever is an acute viral haemorrhagic illness caused by Lassa virus, a member of the arenavirus family of viruses.
Humans usually become infected with Lassa virus through exposure to food or household items contaminated with urine or faeces of infected Mastomys rats. The disease is endemic in the rodent population in parts of West Africa.
Lassa fever is known to be endemic in Benin, Ghana, Guinea, Liberia, Mali, Sierra Leone, Togo and Nigeria, but probably exists in other West African countries as well.
Person-to-person infections and laboratory transmission can also occur, particularly in health care settings in the absence of adequate infection prevention and control measures.
Diagnosis and prompt treatment are essential. The overall case-fatality rate is 1%. Among patients who are hospitalized with severe clinical presentation of Lassa fever, case-fatality is estimated at around 15%. Early supportive care with rehydration
    and symptomatic treatment improves survival.
About 80% of people who become infected with Lassa virus have no symptoms. 1 in 5 infections result in severe disease, where the virus affects several organs such as the liver, spleen and kidneys.","The incubation period of Lassa fever ranges from 2–21 days. The onset, when it is symptomatic, is usually gradual, starting with fever, general weakness and malaise. After a few days, headache, sore throat, muscle pain, chest pain, nausea, vomiting,
    diarrhoea, cough, and abdominal pain may follow. In severe cases facial swelling, fluid in the lung cavity, bleeding from the mouth, nose, vagina or gastrointestinal tract and low blood pressure may develop.
Protein may be noted in the urine. Shock, seizures, tremor, disorientation and coma may be seen in the later stages. Deafness occurs in 25% of recovered patients. In half of these cases, hearing returns partially after 1–3 months. Transient hair
    loss and gait disturbance may occur during recovery.
Death usually occurs within 14 days in fatal cases. The disease is severe late in pregnancy, with maternal death and/or foetal loss in more than 80% of cases during the third trimester.
Because the symptoms of Lassa fever are so varied and non-specific, clinical diagnosis is often difficult, especially early in the course of the disease. Lassa fever is difficult to distinguish from other viral haemorrhagic fevers such as Ebola virus
    disease, malaria, shigellosis, typhoid fever and yellow fever.","There is currently no licensed vaccine for Lassa fever, but several potential vaccines are in development. Despite not being licensed as a treatment for Lassa fever the antiviral drug ribavirin has been used in several countries as a therapeutic agent.
    However, there is still a need for a safe treatment with proven efficacy, and a range of potential treatments including immune therapies and drug therapies are currently being evaluated. No evidence supports the role of ribavirin as a treatment for
    Lassa fever.
Prevention of Lassa fever relies on promoting good “community hygiene” to discourage rodents from entering homes. Effective measures include storing foodstuffs in rodent-proof containers, disposing of garbage far from the home, maintaining
    clean households and keeping cats. Because Mastomys rats are so abundant in endemic areas, it is not possible to eliminate them from the environment. Family members should always be careful to avoid contact with blood and body fluids while caring
    for sick persons.
Lassa fever is known to be endemic. Health-care workers seeing a patient suspected to have Lassa fever should immediately contact local and national experts for advice and to arrange for laboratory testing. Health care staff should apply standard infection
    prevention and control precautions."
Lead poisoning,https://www.who.int/health-topics/lead-poisoning,"Lead is a naturally occurring toxic metal found in the Earth’s crust. Its widespread use has resulted in extensive environmental contamination, human exposure and significant public health problems in many parts of the world.
Important sources of environmental contamination include mining, smelting, manufacturing and recycling activities, and, in some countries, the continued use of leaded paint and leaded aviation fuel. More than three quarters of global lead consumption is for the manufacture of lead-acid batteries for motor vehicles. Lead is, however, also used in many other products, for example pigments, paints, solder, stained glass, lead crystal glassware, ammunition, ceramic glazes, jewellery, toys and some cosmetics and traditional medicines. Drinking water delivered through lead pipes or pipes joined with lead solder may contain lead. Much of the lead in global commerce is now obtained from recycling.
Young children are particularly vulnerable to the toxic effects of lead and can suffer profound and permanent adverse health impacts, particularly on the development of the brain and nervous system. Lead also causes long-term harm in adults, including increased risk of high blood pressure and kidney damage. Exposure of pregnant women to high levels of lead can cause miscarriage, stillbirth, premature birth and low birth weight.","Lead is a well-recognized toxicant that has wide-ranging health impacts, affecting the neurological, cardiovascular, gastrointestinal and haematological systems. Young children are particularly vulnerable because they have higher exposures than adults and because lead affects the developing brain, potentially resulting in reduced intellectual ability. Lead in the body is distributed to the brain, liver, kidney and bones. It is stored in the teeth and bones, where it accumulates over time. Lead in bone is released into blood during pregnancy and becomes a source of exposure to the developing fetus.
Human exposure is usually assessed through the measurement of lead in blood. There is no known safe blood lead concentration; even blood lead concentrations as low as 5 µg/dL may be associated with decreased intelligence in children, behavioural difficulties and learning problems. As lead exposure increases, the range and severity of symptoms and effects also increase.
Encouragingly, the successful phasing out of leaded gasoline in most countries, together with other lead control measures, has resulted in a
significant decline in population-level blood lead concentrations. As of July 2021, leaded fuel for cars and lorries is no longer sold anywhere in the world. However, more needs to be done to phase out of lead paint: so far, only 43% of countries have introduced legally binding controls on lead paint.","Diagnosis of lead poisoning and treatment decisions are based on medical history, clinical examination and the results of investigations, including the blood lead concentration, biomarkers of effect such as a full blood count and, if relevant, medical imaging.
If the patient is clinically well, surgical removal is not necessary, but the blood lead concentration should be measured periodically to check for lead absorption. Treatment options should be reviewed if the patient becomes symptomatic or if the blood lead concentration starts rising.
The systematic reviews of evidence identified few good-quality studies of the effectiveness of the treatment interventions for lead exposure, and more evidence would increase the certainty of the recommendations.
Confirmation of exposure to lead should be followed by termination of that exposure, as without this measure lead will continue to exert its toxic effects.  When blood-lead levels are high and the patient has significant features of lead toxicity, chelation therapy to facilitate lead excretion may improve health outcomes. Gastrointestinal decontamination and nutritional supplementation may also play a role in treatment in specific circumstances."
Leishmaniasis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/leishmaniasis,"The leishmaniases are a group of diseases caused by protozoan parasites from more than 20
Leishmania
species. These parasites are transmitted to humans by the bite of an infected female phlebotomine sandfly, a tiny – 2–3 mm long – insect vector.
There are three main forms of the disease: cutaneous leishmaniasis (CL), visceral leishmaniasis (VL), also known as kala-azar, and mucocutaneous leishmaniasis (MCL). CL is the most common form, VL is the most severe form and MCL is the most disabling form of the disease.
Most people who become infected with the parasite do not develop any symptoms during their lifetime. Therefore, the term
leishmaniasis
refers to the condition of becoming sick due to a
Leishmania
infection, not to being infected with the parasite.
Today, more than 1 billion people live in areas endemic for leishmaniasis and are at risk of infection. An estimated 30 000 new cases of VL and more than 1 million new cases of CL occur annually.","CL usually produces ulcers on the exposed parts of the body, such as the face, arms and legs. There may be many lesions – sometimes up to 200 – which can cause serious disability. When the ulcers heal, they invariably leave permanent scars, which can lead to stigmatization, especially for women and girls.
VL is characterized by irregular bouts of fever, substantial weight loss, swelling of the spleen and liver and serious anaemia. If the disease is not treated, the fatality rate can be as high as 100% within 2 years.
MCL produces lesions that can partially or totally destroy the mucous membranes of the nose, mouth and throat cavities and surrounding tissues. This disabling form can also lead to social exclusion.
PKDL (post-kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis), a complication of VL, is mainly seen in East Africa and South-East Asia. It is characterized by a discoloured (hypopigmented) flat skin (macular) rash, combined with some slightly elevated (maculopapular) or elevated (nodular) rash, usually in patients who have recovered from VL. PKDL usually appears 6 months to 1 or more years after apparent cure of VL, but it may occur earlier or even concurrently with VL, especially in Sudan. PKDL heals spontaneously in most cases in Africa but rarely in patients in India.","Antileishmanial treatment depends on the causative species and the condition of the patient (e.g. pregnancy, immunosuppression).
Regardless of the causative
Leishmania
species, antileishmanial treatment cannot provide a sterile cure, and the parasite remains in the human body and can cause a relapse when there is immunosuppression.
Treatment is complex and should be administered by highly experienced health personnel. Most antileishmanial medicines are injectable."
Leprosy (Hansen disease),https://www.who.int/health-topics/leprosy,"Leprosy, also known as Hansen’s disease, is a chronic infectious disease caused by
Mycobacterium leprae
. The disease affects the skin, the peripheral nerves, mucosal surfaces of the upper respiratory tract and the eyes. Leprosy is known to occur at all ages ranging from early childhood to old age. Leprosy is curable and treatment during early stages can prevent disability.
Leprosy is transmitted via droplets, from the nose and mouth, during close and frequent contact with untreated cases.","Symptoms may occur within one year but can also take as long as 20 years or even more to occur.
The disease manifests commonly through skin lesion and peripheral nerve involvement. Leprosy is diagnosed by finding at least one of the following cardinal signs: (1) definite loss of sensation in a pale (hypopigmented) or reddish skin patch; (2) thickened or enlarged peripheral nerve, with loss of sensation and/or weakness of the muscles supplied by that nerve; (3) presence of acid-fast bacilli in a slit-skin smear.
Skin lesion has usually a different pigmentation than the surrounding normal skin (less pigmented, reddish or copper-coloured) and may have various aspects (flat, raised or nodules). Skin lesion can be single or multiple with a definite loss of sensation.
Leprosy is a highly variable disease, affecting different people in different ways, according to their immune response. Those at one end of the spectrum, with a high level of immunity, harbour a low number of bacilli and are referred to as patients with PB leprosy. Those with many bacilli in the body are referred to as patients with MB leprosy.
Paucibacillary (PB) case: a case of leprosy with 1 to 5 skin lesions, without demonstrated presence of bacilli in a skin smear.
Multibacillary (MB) case: a case of leprosy with more than five skin lesions; or with nerve involvement (pure neuritis, or any number of skin lesions and neuritis); or with the demonstrated presence of bacilli in a slit-skin smear, irrespective of the number of skin lesions.","Early diagnosis and complete treatment with multidrug therapy (MDT) remain the key strategies for reducing the disease burden of leprosy.
The 2018 Guidelines for the diagnosis, treatment and prevention of leprosy published by WHO, recommends the same 3-drug regimen with rifampicin, dapsone and clofazimine for all leprosy patients, with a duration of treatment of 6 months for PB leprosy and of 12 months for MB leprosy.
Recommended Treatment Regimens"
Lymphatic filariasis (Elephantiasis),https://www.who.int/health-topics/lymphatic-filariasis,"Lymphatic filariasis, commonly known as elephantiasis, is a painful and profoundly disfiguring disease. It is caused by infection with parasites classified as nematodes (roundworms) of the family Filariodidea that are transmitted through the bites of infected mosquitos. Mosquito-transmitted larvae are deposited on the skin from where they can enter the body. The larvae then migrate to the lymphatic vessels where they develop into adult worms, thus continuing a cycle of transmission.
In communities where filariasis is transmitted, all ages are affected. While the infection may be acquired during childhood its visible manifestations such as limbs oedema may occur later in life, causing temporary or permanent disability. In endemic countries, lymphatic filariasis has a major social and economic impact.
Lymphatic filariasis affects over 120 million people in 72 countries throughout the tropics and sub-tropics of Asia, Africa, the Western Pacific, and parts of the Caribbean and South America.","Whereas the disease was once thought to affect only adults, it now appears that most infections are acquired in childhood. Initial infection is followed by a long period of subclinical disease, which progresses in later life to clinically manifest disease.
    Lymphatic filariasis can cause of variety of clinical manifestations, that can be grouped in three categories: acute attacks, lymphoedema/elephantiasis and hydrocoele.
The adult filarial worms cause inflammation of the lymphatic system leading to lymphatic vessel damage, even in asymptomatic people, and lymphatic dysfunction, which predispose the lower limbs in particular to recurrent bacterial infection. These secondary
    infections provoke “acute attacks”, which are the commonest symptom of lymphatic filariasis and play an important role in the progression of lymphoedema. Acute attack is usually associated with local pain and swelling and with fever and
    chills.
Lymphoedema and its more advanced form, elephantiasis, occur primarily in the lower limbs and are commoner in women. In its most advanced form, elephantiasis may prevent people from carrying out their normal daily activities. Lymphatic filariasis may
    also evolve towards a genital disease (hydrocoele) that is characterized by a swelling of the scrotum and penis.
The vast majority of infected people are asymptomatic, but virtually all of them suffer from damages to the lymphatic system and the kidneys, and from an altered body's immune system.","People infected with filariasis who have microfilaraemia or a positive antigen test should receive antifilarial drug treatment to eliminate microfilariae. Unfortunately, the medicines available have limited effect on adult worms. Treatment also involves
    the
management of morbidity and disability prevention (MMDP)
that includes simple hygiene measures, such as basic skin care and exercise, to prevent acute attacks and progression of lymphoedema to elephantiasis. For management of hydrocoele, surgery may be appropriate. MMDP includes also psychological and socioeconomic
    support for people with disabling conditions to ensure that they have equal access to rehabilitation services and opportunities for health, education and income. Activities beyond medical care and rehabilitation include promoting positive attitudes
    towards people with disabilities, preventing the causes of disabilities, providing education and training, supporting local initiatives, and supporting micro- and macro-income-generating schemes.
Preventive chemotherapy is used at the community level to
eliminate microfilariae from the blood of infected individuals in order to interrupt transmission of infection by mosquitoes."
Malaria,https://www.who.int/health-topics/malaria,"Malaria is a life-threatening disease caused by parasites that are transmitted to people through the bites of infected female
Anopheles
mosquitoes. It is preventable and curable. There are 5 parasite species that cause malaria in humans, and 2 of these species –
Plasmodium falciparum
and
Plasmodium vivax
– pose the greatest threat.
In 2023, nearly half of the world's population was at risk of malaria. While sub-Saharan Africa carries a disproportionately high share of the global malaria burden, the WHO Regions of South-East Asia and Eastern Mediterranean, Western Pacific, and the Americas also report significant numbers of cases .
There were an estimated 263 million cases of malaria in 2023, and the estimated number of malaria deaths stood at 597 000. In 2023, the African Region was home to 94% and 95% of malaria cases and deaths, respectively.
Children under 5 years of age are most at risk of severe complications from malaria; in 2023, they accounted for nearly 76% of all malaria deaths in the WHO African Region.","Malaria is an acute febrile illness. In a non-immune individual, symptoms usually appear 10–15 days after the infective mosquito bite. The first symptoms – fever, headache and chills – may be mild and difficult to recognize as malaria. If not treated within 24 hours,
Plasmodium falciparum
malaria can progress to severe illness, and lead to death.
Children with severe malaria frequently develop one or more of the following symptoms: severe anaemia, respiratory distress in relation to metabolic acidosis, or cerebral malaria. In adults, multi-organ failure is also frequent. In malaria endemic areas, people may develop partial immunity, allowing asymptomatic infections to occur.
Some people are at considerably higher risk of contracting malaria and developing severe disease than others. These include infants, children under 5 years of age, pregnant women and patients with HIV and AIDS, as well as non-immune migrants, mobile populations and travellers. National malaria control programmes need to take special measures to protect people at higher risk of malaria infection, taking into consideration their specific circumstances.","Malaria is a preventable and treatable disease. Early diagnosis and treatment of malaria reduces disease and prevents deaths, and also contributes to reducing transmission. The best available treatment, particularly for
Plasmodium falciparum
malaria, is artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT). Antimalarial medicines can also be used to prevent malaria.
For travellers, malaria can be prevented through chemoprophylaxis, which suppresses the blood stage of malaria infections, thereby preventing malaria disease. Prior to their travel to malaria-endemic countries or regions, individuals should consult their national disease control centres, or other institutions offering travel advice, for information regarding the preventive measures that should be taken.
See also the WHO
International travel and health
WHO recommends protection for all people at risk of malaria with effective malaria vector control."
Malnutrition,https://www.who.int/health-topics/malnutrition,"Malnutrition refers to deficiencies or excesses in nutrient intake, imbalance of essential nutrients or impaired nutrient utilization. The double burden of malnutrition consists of both undernutrition and overweight and obesity, as well as diet-related noncommunicable diseases. Undernutrition manifests in four broad forms: wasting, stunting, underweight, and micronutrient deficiencies.
Wasting is defined as low weight-for-height. It often indicates recent and severe weight loss, although it can also persist for a long time. It usually occurs when a person has not had food of adequate quality and quantity and/or they have had frequent or prolonged illnesses. Wasting in children is associated with a higher risk of death if not treated properly. Stunting is defined as low height-for-age. It is the result of chronic or recurrent undernutrition, usually associated with poverty, poor maternal health and nutrition, frequent illness and/or inappropriate feeding and care in early life. Stunting prevents children from reaching their physical and cognitive potential. Underweight is defined as low weight-for-age. A child who is underweight may be stunted, wasted or both.
Micronutrient deficiencies are a lack of vitamins and minerals that are essential for body functions such as producing enzymes, hormones and other substances needed for growth and development.
Learn about Nutrition and Food Safety and COVID-19","In 2018, stunting affected an estimated 21.9% or 149 million children under the age of 5 years, while wasting affected 7.3% or 49 million children under the age of 5 years. Around 45% of deaths among children under the age of 5 years are linked to undernutrition. These mostly occur in low- and middle-income countries. At the same time, in these same countries, rates of childhood overweight and obesity are rising. Every country in the world is affected by one or more forms of malnutrition. Combating malnutrition in all its forms is one of the greatest global health challenges.
Women, infants, children and adolescents are at the highest risk of malnutrition. Optimizing nutrition early in life – including the 1000 days from conception to a child’s second birthday – ensures the best possible start in life, with long-term benefits.
Poverty amplifies the risk of, and risks from, malnutrition. People who are poor are more likely to be affected by different forms of malnutrition. Malnutrition increases health care costs, reduces productivity and slows economic growth, which can perpetuate a cycle of poverty and ill-health.","WHO works with Member States and partners towards the goal of ending all forms of malnutrition by 2030 as part of the Sustainable Development Goals. Meeting this goal is contingent on securing universal access to effective nutrition interventions and to healthy diets from sustainable and resilient food systems.
To this end, WHO advocates for policies that promote nutrition on a global scale and develop evidence-informed guidance for their implementation. This work is framed by the 2012 World Health Assembly resolution 65.6: Comprehensive implementation plan on maternal, infant and young child nutrition. It also contributes to the United Nations Decade of Action on Nutrition 2016–2025.  Actions to end malnutrition are also vital for achieving the diet-related targets of the Global action plan for the prevention and control of noncommunicable diseases 2013–2020, the Global strategy for women’s, children’s, and adolescent’s health 2016–2030, and the 2030 Agenda for sustainable development."
Marburg virus disease,https://www.who.int/health-topics/marburg-virus-disease,"Marburg virus disease (MVD) is a severe disease with a fatality ratio of up to 88%. This rate can be lower with good and early patient care.
MVD was initially detected in 1967 after two simultaneous outbreaks in Marburg and Frankfurt in Germany, and in Belgrade, Serbia. The outbreak was associated with laboratory work using African green monkeys (
Cercopithecus aethiops
) imported from Uganda. Subsequently, outbreaks and sporadic cases have been reported in Angola, the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Equatorial Guinea, Ghana, Guinea, Kenya, Rwanda, South Africa (in a person with recent travel history to Zimbabwe), Tanzania and Uganda.
Initially, human MVD infection results from prolonged exposure to mines or caves inhabited by Rousettus fruit bat colonies. Once introduced in the human population, Marburg virus can spread through human-to-human transmission via direct contact (through broken skin or mucous membranes) with the blood, secretions, organs or other bodily fluids of infected people, and with surfaces and materials (e.g. bedding, clothing) contaminated with these fluids.","The incubation period (interval from infection to onset of symptoms) varies from 2 to 21 days.
MVD begins abruptly, with high fever, severe headache and severe malaise. Muscle aches and pains are a common feature. Severe watery diarrhoea, abdominal pain and cramping, nausea and vomiting can begin on the third day. Non-itchy rash have been reported in patients between 2 and 7 days after onset of symptoms.
From day 5 of the disease, patients may develop haemorrhagic manifestations, including fresh blood in vomitus and faeces, bleeding from the nose, gums and vagina. Bleeding at venepuncture sites (where intravenous access is obtained to give fluids or obtain blood samples) can also be observed. Involvement of the central nervous system can result in confusion, irritability and aggression. Orchitis (inflammation of one or both testicles) has been reported occasionally in the late phase of disease.
In fatal cases, death occurs most often between 8 and 9 days after symptom onset, usually preceded by severe blood loss and shock.","Early intensive supportive care including rehydration and treatment of specific symptoms can improve survival.
Currently there are no vaccines or antiviral treatments approved for MVD. There are candidate monoclonal antibodies and antivirals, along with candidate vaccines that can be evaluated in clinical trials.
Diagnosis
It can be difficult to clinically distinguish MVD from other infectious diseases such as malaria, typhoid fever, shigellosis, meningitis and other viral haemorrhagic fevers. Confirmation that symptoms are caused by Marburg virus infection are made using the following diagnostic methods:
antibody-capture enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA)
antigen-capture detection tests
reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) assay
virus isolation by cell culture in maximum containment laboratories.
Samples collected from patients are an extreme biohazard risk. Laboratory testing on non-inactivated samples should be conducted under maximum biological containment conditions. All non-inactivated biological specimens should be packaged using the triple packaging system when transported nationally and internationally."
Maternal health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/maternal-health,"Maternal health refers to the health of women during pregnancy, childbirth and the postnatal period.
Each stage should be a positive experience, ensuring women and their babies reach their full potential for health and well-being.
Although important progress has been made in the last two decades, about 287 000 women died during and following pregnancy and childbirth in 2020. This number is unacceptably high.
The most common direct causes of maternal injury and death are excessive blood loss, infection, high blood pressure, unsafe abortion, and obstructed labour, as well as indirect causes such as anemia, malaria, and heart disease.
Most maternal deaths are preventable with timely management by a skilled health professional working in a supportive environment.
Ending preventable maternal death must remain at the top of the global agenda. At the same time, simply surviving pregnancy and childbirth can never be the marker of successful maternal health care. It is critical to expand efforts reducing maternal injury and disability to promote health and well-being.
Every pregnancy and birth is unique. Addressing inequalities that affect health outcomes, especially sexual and reproductive health and rights and gender, is fundamental to ensuring all women have access to respectful and high-quality maternity care.","About 140 million births take place every year and the proportion attended by skilled health personnel has increased: from 58% in 1990 to 81% in 2019. This is mostly due to larger numbers of births taking place at a health facility.
Deaths from complications during pregnancy, childbirth, and the postnatal period have declined by 38% in the last two decades, but at an average reduction of just under 3% per year, this pace of progress is far too slow.
It also hides vast inequalities within and across countries.
More than half of maternal deaths occur in fragile and humanitarian settings. Sub-Saharan Africa and Southern Asia share the greatest burden of maternal deaths, 86% of the global total in 2017.
The Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs) offers an opportunity for the international community to work together and accelerate progress to improve maternal health for all women, in all countries, under all circumstances.
SDG targets for maternal health include 3.1, aiming for an average global ratio of less than 70 deaths per 100 000 births by 2030, and 3.8, calling for the achievement of universal health coverage. These cannot be achieved without reproductive, maternal, newborn and child health coverage for all.","Improving maternal health is one of WHO’s key priorities, grounded in a human rights approach and linked to efforts on universal health coverage.
WHO advocates for health planning where women’s values and preferences are at the centre of their own care. Meaningful engagement and empowerment of women, families, communities, and providers is essential for quality improvement initiatives.
Promoting health along the whole continuum of pregnancy, childbirth and postnatal care is also crucial. This includes good nutrition, detecting and preventing diseases, ensuring access to sexual and reproductive health and supporting women who may be experiencing intimate partner violence.
It is WHO’s responsibility to monitor progress towards the global goal for reducing maternal death (SDG target 3.1). WHO generates data, research, clinical guidelines and programmatic tools to support achievement of global targets and evidence-based strategies for ending preventable maternal mortality (EPMM) and improving maternal health and well-being.
WHO supports Member States as they implement plans to promote access to quality health services for all. Strong partnerships are crucial, such as The Network for Improving Quality of Care for Maternal, Newborn and Child Health, launched by WHO and UNICEF."
Measles,https://www.who.int/health-topics/measles,"Measles is a highly contagious viral disease. It remains an important cause of death among young children globally, despite the availability of a safe and effective vaccine.
While vaccination has prevented an estimated 60 million deaths between 2000–2023, measles is still common in many developing countries, particularly in parts of Africa and Asia. An estimated 107 500 people died from measles in 2023. The overwhelming majority (more than 95%) of measles deaths occur in countries with low per capita incomes and weak health infrastructures.
Member States in all WHO Regions have adopted measles elimination goals. WHO is the lead technical agency responsible for coordination of immunization and surveillance activities supporting all countries to achieve these goals.","Measles is transmitted via droplets from the nose, mouth or throat of infected persons. Initial symptoms, which usually appear 10–14 days after infection, include high fever, a runny nose, bloodshot eyes, and tiny white spots on the inside of the mouth. Several days later, a rash develops, starting on the face and upper neck and gradually spreading downwards.
Severe measles is more likely among poorly nourished young children, especially those with insufficient vitamin A, or whose immune systems have been weakened by HIV/AIDS or other diseases. The most serious complications include blindness, encephalitis (an infection that causes brain swelling), severe diarrhoea and related dehydration, and severe respiratory infections such as pneumonia.","Routine measles vaccination for children, combined with mass immunization campaigns in countries with low routine coverage, are key public health strategies to reduce global measles deaths.
The measles vaccine has been in use since the 1960s. It is safe, effective and inexpensive. WHO recommends immunization for all susceptible children and adults for whom measles vaccination is not contraindicated. Reaching all children with 2 doses of measles vaccine, either alone, or in a measles-rubella (MR), measles-mumps-rubella (MMR), or measles-mumps-rubella-varicella (MMRV) combination, should be the standard for all national immunization programmes."
Medical devices,https://www.who.int/health-topics/medical-devices,"Access to good quality, affordable, and appropriate health products is indispensable to advance universal health coverage, address health emergencies, and promote healthier populations.
Without medical devices, common medical procedures – from bandaging a sprained ankle, to diagnosing HIV/AIDS, implanting an artificial hip or any surgical intervention – would not be possible. Medical devices are used in many diverse settings, for example, by laypersons at home, by paramedical staff and clinicians in remote clinics, by opticians and dentists and by health-care professionals in advanced medical facilities, for prevention and screening and in palliative care. Such health technologies are used to diagnose illness, to monitor treatments, to assist disabled people and to intervene and treat illnesses, both acute and chronic.
Today, there are an estimated 2 million different kinds of medical devices on the world market, categorized into more than 7000 generic devices groups.
A medical device can be any instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, appliance, implant, reagent for in vitro use, software, material or other similar or related article, intended by the manufacturer to be used, alone or in combination for a medical purpose.","Policies, strategies, and action plans for health technologies, specifically for medical devices, are required in any national health plan. Within the context of a robust health system they ensure access to safe, effective, and high-quality medical devices that prevent, diagnose, and treat disease and injury, and assist patients in their rehabilitation.
WHO’s “Global Model Regulatory Framework for Medical Devices including in vitro diagnostic medical devices” supports Member States to develop and implement regulatory controls and regional guidelines for good manufacturing to ensure the quality, safety and efficacy of medical devices available in their countries. The Organization also works with Member States and collaborating centres to develop guidelines and tools, including norms and standards on medical devices.
Additionally, WHO supports Member States in establishing mechanisms to assess national needs for health technologies in particular medical devices and to assure their availability and use, particularly in low-resource settings. A web-based health technologies database serves as a clearing house and provides countries guidance on appropriate medical devices according to levels of care, setting, environment, and intended health intervention, tailored to the specific needs of country or region.",N/A
Medicines,https://www.who.int/health-topics/medicines,"The first synthetic pharmaceutical, Aspirin, was introduced in 1897. Since then there have been incredible advances in drugs for a wide range of health concerns including disease, mental health and other conditions. Today there are thousands of drugs
    on the market able to prevent, treat and lessen the impact of ailments that would have been fatal just a few generations ago. At the same time, antimicrobial resistance is challenging the effectiveness of many commonly used medicines in one of the
    most concerning threats to global health today.
Access to appropriate medications is shown to have substantial impacts on community health and the related economic indicators. Quality-assured, safe and effective medicines, vaccines and medical
devices are fundamental to a functioning health system. However, globalized trade can undermine regulation, and in resource-limited settings especially, incidence of substandard or falsified medicines is growing. Working to increase access to essential
pharmaceuticals while limiting the spread of falsified products is at the heart of WHO’s global strategy on medicines.","Equal access and the reliable supply of medicines is an
ongoing goal of WHO and global health delivery systems, the achievement of
which is hampered by several factors. The first is regulatory issues, which can
affect how medicines are bought to market, create lag times and cause the
supply of medicines in some areas of the globe to be delayed long after they
are available elsewhere. High prices, misuse of drugs and poor or unreliable
drug quality contribute to this issue. Price has long been a barrier in poor
countries, but because of sharp increases in recent years, this issue is
spreading to some wealthy countries as well.
The price of medicine remains the largest impediment to
access and the economic impact of pharmaceuticals is substantial. They are the
largest public expenditure on health after personal costs in many low-income
countries, and the expense is a major cause of household impoverishment and
debt. Public expenditure ranges widely between nations, from under 20% of total
healthcare costs in high-income countries to up to 66% in low-income countries.","Universal health coverage can only be achieved when there
is affordable access to safe, effective and quality medicines and health
products. WHO works with partners and Member States to strengthen regulation,
including post-marketing surveillance, and to eliminate substandard and
falsified medicines. It also develops international norms and standards so that
countries worldwide can regulate health products and technologies consistently.
In parallel, WHO facilitates access to quality-assured, safe and effective health
products by assessing medicines, vaccines and medical devices for priority
diseases, while working to fight the growing issue of antibacterial resistance.
Since 1977, WHO has maintained a list of essential
medicines as a means to promote health equity around the world. This list began
with 208 identified medicines and has grown to include 460 different
pharmaceuticals. Although it was not designed as a global standard, the list
now acts as a guide for the procurement and supply of medicines at the national
and local level."
Meningitis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/meningitis,"Meningitis is a serious infection of the meninges, the membranes covering the brain and spinal cord. It is a devastating disease and remains a major public health challenge. The disease can be caused by many different pathogens including bacteria, fungi or viruses, but the highest global burden is seen with bacterial meningitis.
Several different bacteria can cause meningitis.
Streptococcus pneumoniae
,
Haemophilus influenzae
,
Neisseria meningitidis
are the most frequent ones. N. meningitidis, causing meningococcal meningitis, is the one with the potential to produce large epidemics. There are 12 serogroups of N. meningitidis that have been identified, 6 of which (A, B, C, W, X and Y) can cause epidemics.
Meningococcal meningitis can affect anyone of any age, but mainly affects babies, preschool children and young people. The disease can occur in a range of situations from sporadic cases, small clusters to large epidemics throughout the world, with seasonal variations. Geographic distribution and epidemic potential differ according to serogroup. The largest burden of meningococcal meningitis occurs in the meningitis belt, an area of sub-Saharan Africa, which stretches from Senegal in the west to Ethiopia in the east.
N. meningitidis
can cause a variety of diseases. Invasive meningococcal disease (IMD) refers to the range of invasive diseases caused by N. meningitidis, including septicemia, arthritis and meningitis. Similarly,
S. pneumoniae
causes other invasive diseases including otitis and pneumonia
Transmission
The bacteria that cause meningitis are
transmitted from person-to-person through droplets of respiratory or throat
secretions from carriers. Close and prolonged contact – such as kissing,
sneezing or coughing on someone, or living in close quarters with an infected
person, facilitates the spread of the disease. The average incubation period is
4 days but can range between 2 and 10 days.
Neisseria meningitidis
only
infects humans. The bacteria can be carried in the throat and can sometimes
overwhelm the body's defences allowing infection to spread through the
bloodstream to the brain. A significant proportion of the population (between 5
and 10%) carries
Neisseria
meningitidis
in their throat at any given time.","The most common symptoms of meningitis are a stiff neck, high fever, sensitivity to light, confusion, headaches and vomiting. Even with early diagnosis and adequate treatment, 5% to 10% of patients die, typically within 24 to 48 hours after the onset of symptoms. Bacterial meningitis may result in brain damage, hearing loss or a learning disability in 10% to 20% of survivors. A less common, but even more severe (and often fatal), form of meningococcal disease is meningococcal septicaemia, which is characterized by a haemorrhagic rash and rapid circulatory collapse.
Diagnosis
Initial diagnosis of meningococcal meningitis can be made by clinical examination followed by a lumbar puncture showing a purulent spinal fluid. The bacteria can sometimes be seen in microscopic examinations of the spinal fluid. The diagnosis is confirmed
    by growing the bacteria from specimens of spinal fluid or blood, or by polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Diagnosis can also be supported by rapid diagnostic tests such as agglutination tests, although currently available tests have several limitations.
    The identification of the meningococcal serogroups and testing for susceptibility to antibiotics are important to define control measures. For more guidance on diagnostic methods for meningitis see below:
Laboratory methods for the diagnosis of meningitis caused by
Neisseria meningitidis, Streptococcus pneumoniae, and Haemophilus influenzae
Laboratory materials for the diagnosis of bacterial meningitis
by polymerase chain reaction (PCR).
For more information on meningitis diagnosis see Our Work - Improving Meningitis Diagnosis","Meningococcal disease is potentially fatal and is a medical emergency. Admission to a hospital or health centre is necessary and appropriate antibiotic treatment must be started as soon as possible. Appropriate antibiotic treatment must be started as
    soon as possible, ideally after the lumbar puncture has been carried out if such a puncture can be performed immediately. If treatment is started prior to the lumbar puncture it may be difficult to grow the bacteria from the spinal fluid and confirm
    the diagnosis. However, confirmation of the diagnosis should not delay treatment.
A range of antibiotics can treat the infection, including penicillin, ampicillin and ceftriaxone. Under epidemic conditions in Africa in areas with limited health infrastructure and resources, ceftriaxone is the drug of choice.
Vaccines and immunization
Licensed vaccines against meningococcal disease have been available for more than 40 years. Over time, there have been major improvements in strain coverage and vaccine availability, but to-date, no universal vaccine against meningococcal disease exists.
    Vaccines are serogroup specific and the protection they confer is of varying duration, dependent on which type is used.
Since 2010, a meningococcal A conjugate vaccine has been rolled out through mass preventive immunization campaigns in the meningitis belt of sub-Saharan Africa, dramatically bringing down cases of the A serogroup.
There are three types of meningococcal vaccines available:
Polysaccharide vaccines
used in outbreak response, mainly in Africa
Conjugate vaccines
used in prevention and outbreak response.
Protein based vaccine
, against
N. meningitidis B
. It has been introduced into the routine immunization schedule (four countries as of 2020) and used in outbreak response
For more information on meningococcal vaccines and immunization
.
For more information on the meningitis ICG vaccine stockpile
.
Chemoprophylaxis
Giving antibiotics promptly to close contacts of a person with meningococcal meningitis decreases the risk of transmission.
Outside the African meningitis belt, chemoprophylaxis is recommended for close contacts
In the African meningitis belt, chemoprophylaxis for close contacts is recommended in non-epidemic situations.
Ciprofloxacin antibiotic is the antibiotic of choice, and ceftriaxone an alternative."
Mental health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/mental-health,"Mental health is a state of mental well-being that enables people to cope with the stresses of life, realize their abilities, learn well and work well, and contribute to their community. It has intrinsic and instrumental value and is integral to our well-being.
At any one time, a diverse set of individual, family, community and structural factors may combine to protect or undermine mental health. Although most people are resilient, people who are exposed to adverse circumstances – including poverty, violence, disability and inequality – are at higher risk of developing a mental health condition.
Many mental health conditions can be effectively treated at relatively low cost, yet health systems remain significantly under-resourced and treatment gaps are wide all over the world. Mental health care is often poor in quality when delivered. People with mental health conditions often also experience stigma, discrimination and human rights violations.","Mental health conditions include mental disorders and psychosocial disabilities as well as other mental states associated with significant distress, impairment in functioning or risk of self-harm.
In 2019, 970 million people globally were living with a mental disorder, with anxiety and depression the most common.
Mental health conditions can cause difficulties in all aspects of life, including relationships with family, friends and community. They can result from or lead to problems at school and at work.
Globally, mental disorders account for 1 in 6 years lived with disability. People with severe mental health conditions die 10 to 20 years earlier than the general population. And having a mental health condition increases the risk of suicide and experiencing human rights violations.
The economic consequences of mental health conditions are also enormous, with productivity losses significantly outstripping the direct costs of care.","All WHO Member States are committed to implementing the
Comprehensive mental health action plan 2013–2030
, which aims to improve mental health by strengthening governance, providing community-based care, implementing promotion and prevention strategies, and strengthening information systems, evidence and research.
WHO’s
World mental health report: transforming mental health for all
called on all countries to accelerate progress towards implementing the action plan by deepening the value given to mental health, prioritizing mental health promotion and prevention, and developing networks of community-based services.
In 2019, WHO launched the
WHO Special Initiative for Mental Health (2019–2023): Universal Health Coverage for Mental Health
to ensure access to quality and affordable mental health care for 100 million more people in 12 priority countries.
WHO’s Mental Health Gap Action Programme (mhGAP)
similarly aims to scale up services for mental, neurological and substance use disorders, especially in low- and middle-income countries.
As part of the
QualityRights
Initiative, WHO has developed a comprehensive package of training and guidance materials to build capacity in implementing a human rights and recovery approach to mental health care."
Micronutrients,https://www.who.int/health-topics/micronutrients,"Micronutrients are vitamins and minerals needed by the body in very small amounts. However, their impact on a body’s health are critical, and deficiency in any of them can cause severe and even life-threatening conditions. They perform a range of functions, including enabling the body to produce enzymes, hormones and other substances needed for normal growth and development. Deficiencies in iron, vitamin A and iodine are the most common around the world, particularly in children and pregnant women. Low- and middle-income counties bear the disproportionate burden of micronutrient deficiencies.
Micronutrient deficiencies can cause visible and dangerous health conditions, but they can also lead to less clinically notable reductions in energy level, mental clarity and overall capacity. This can lead to reduced educational outcomes, reduced work productivity and increased risk from other diseases and health conditions.
Many of these deficiencies are preventable through nutrition education and consumption of a healthy diet containing diverse foods, as well as food fortification and supplementation, where needed.  These programmes have made great strides in reducing micronutrient deficiencies in recent decades but more efforts are needed","Micronutrient deficiencies can cause several serious health issues. A lack of iron, folate and vitamins B12 and A can lead to anaemia.
Anaemia
is a condition in which there is a reduced number of red blood cells or haemoglobin concentration, causing fatigue, weakness, shortage of breath and dizziness.  This can further lead to difficulties in functioning in work, education and community engagement. An estimated 42% of children under 5 years of age and 40% of pregnant women worldwide are anaemic.
Severe iodine deficiency can lead to brain damage and during pregnancy can cause a number of issues including stillbirth, spontaneous abortion and congenital anomalies. Less severe iodine deficiency may still cause mental impairment that reduces intellectual capacity.  The preferred strategy for the control of iodine deficiency remains universal salt iodization, which requires that all food-grade salt used in household and food processing be fortified with iodine. UNICEF estimates that 66% of households globally have access to iodized salt.
Vitamin A deficiency is the leading cause of preventable blindness in children and increases the risk of disease and death from severe infections such as diarrhoeal disease and measles. Vitamin A deficiency may also occur in women during the last trimester of pregnancy in high-risk areas. Breastfeeding is the best way to protect babies from vitamin A deficiency and, in areas where vitamin A deficiency is a public health problem, vitamin A supplementation is recommended in infants and children 6-59 months of age.","WHO works with Member States and partners to prevent micronutrient deficiencies though a number of programmes and following
the WHO 2016–2025 nutrition strategy
. These programmes include iron and folic acid supplementation, high dose vitamin A supplementation, the promotion of breastfeeding, fortification of foods with micronutrients, and healthy, diverse diets containing foods naturally rich in vitamin and minerals. For example, salt iodization has helped reduce the rate of iodine deficiency around the world, while the fortification of wheat flour with iron and folic acid has helped reduce rates of anaemia and neural tube defects.
WHO collaborates with UN partners to disseminate global guidance on the assessment of micronutrient status and effective micronutrient interventions. These guidelines allow WHO and other agencies to better respond to populations affected by emergencies when micronutrient deficiencies are more common due to chronic and severe food insecurity."
Middle East respiratory syndrome coronavirus (MERS-CoV),https://www.who.int/health-topics/middle-east-respiratory-syndrome-coronavirus-mers,"Middle East respiratory
syndrome coronavirus (MERS-CoV) is a virus transferred to humans from infected
dromedary camels. It is a zoonotic virus, meaning it is transmitted between
animals and people, and it is contractable through direct or indirect contact
with infected animals. MERS-CoV has been identified in dromedaries in several
countries in the Middle East, Africa and South Asia. In total, 27 countries
have reported cases since 2012, leading to 858 known deaths due to the
infection and related complications.
The origins of the
virus are not fully understood but according to the analysis of different virus
genomes it is believed that it may have originated in bats and later transmitted
to camels at some point in the distant past.
Human-to-human
transmission is possible, but only a few such transmissions have been found
among family members living in the same household. In health care settings,
however, human-to-human transmission appears to be more frequent.","MERS-CoV infections
range from showing no symptoms (asymptomatic) or mild respiratory symptoms to
severe acute respiratory disease and death.
A typical
presentation of MERS-CoV disease is fever, cough and shortness of breath.
Pneumonia is a common finding, but not always present. Gastrointestinal
symptoms, including diarrhoea, have also been reported. Severe illness can
cause respiratory failure that requires mechanical ventilation and support in
an intensive care unit. The virus appears to cause more severe disease in older
people, people with weakened immune systems and those with chronic diseases
such as renal disease, cancer, chronic lung disease, and diabetes.
Approximately 35% of
patients with MERS-CoV have died, but this may be an overestimate of the true
mortality rate, as mild cases of MERS may be missed by existing surveillance
systems. The case fatality rates are currently counted only amongst the
laboratory-confirmed cases.
Until more is
understood about MERS-CoV, people with diabetes, renal failure, chronic lung
disease and immunocompromised persons are considered at high risk of severe
disease from MERS-CoV infection. These people should avoid contact with camels,
drinking raw camel milk or camel urine, or eating meat that has not been
properly cooked.","No vaccine or specific treatment is currently available, although several MERS-CoV specific vaccines and treatments are in development. Treatment is supportive and based on the patient’s clinical condition.
As a general precaution, anyone visiting farms, markets, barns, or other places where dromedary camels and other animals are present should practice general hygiene measures, including regular hand washing before and after touching animals and avoiding
    contact with sick animals.
The consumption of raw or undercooked animal products, including milk and meat, carries a high risk of infection that can cause disease in humans. Animal products that are processed appropriately through cooking or pasteurization are safe for consumption
    but should also be handled with care to avoid cross contamination with uncooked foods. Camel meat and camel milk are nutritious products that can continue to be consumed after pasteurization, cooking or other heat treatments.
Transmission of the virus has occurred in health care facilities in several countries, including transmission from patients to health care providers and transmission between patients before MERS-CoV was diagnosed. It is not always possible to identify patients with MERS‐CoV
early or without testing because symptoms and other clinical features may be non‐specific."
Mpox,https://www.who.int/health-topics/mpox,"Mpox (previously known as monkeypox) is a viral disease caused by an orthopoxvirus called monkeypox virus. It spreads mainly through close contact with someone who has mpox, causing a painful rash, enlarged lymph nodes and fever. It can make people very sick and leave scars.
The disease mainly spreads from person to person through close contact. This includes, but isn’t limited to, sexual contact. Transmission occurs through exposure to bodily fluids; lesions on the skin or on internal mucosal surfaces, such as in the mouth or throat; respiratory particles; and contaminated objects.
In areas where animals carry the virus, mpox is a zoonotic disease, meaning it can spread from animals to humans. It's found in tropical rainforests in central, east and west Africa, where small mammals such as squirrels, Gambian pouched rats, dormice, and various species of monkeys may be carriers.
Since May 2022, mpox has spread globally, with cases reported from countries without previously documented mpox transmission. The spread in most countries today is from people and not animals.","Mpox typically causes a fever, a rash resembling pimples or blisters and swollen lymph nodes.   Symptoms usually appear within a week of exposure but can take anywhere from 1 to 21 days to develop.
The illness often begins with a feverish phase lasting 1 to 3 days with symptoms including intense headache, swollen lymph nodes back pain, muscle aches and severe fatigue. The first stage is followed by the skin eruption stage, lasting from 2 to 4 weeks. Lesions evolve from macules (lesions with a flat base) to papules (raised firm painful lesions) to vesicles (filled with clear fluid) to pustules (filled with pus), followed by scabs or crusts.  They can leave scars. For some people, the first symptom of mpox is the rash.
Some people with mpox become very sick and it can even be fatal in some cases. Children, pregnant people and people with weak immune systems, including people living with HIV that is not well controlled, are at higher risk for serious illness and death due to complications from mpox.","Prevention and control of mpox rely on raising awareness in communities and educating health workers to prevent infection and stop transmission.
Mpox vaccines also provide protection against infection and severe disease. WHO recommends the use of vaccines for those most at risk of exposure during outbreaks, including people who have had close contact with someone with mpox, and health workers. People who were vaccinated against smallpox in childhood may have some cross-protection against mpox.
To prevent spread, close contact with people who have mpox or with contaminated materials should be avoided. Masks, gloves and other personal protective equipment should be worn while taking care of the sick, whether in a health facility or at home.
Where animal-to-human transmission is possible, contact with sick or dead animals should be avoided, and all foods containing animal meat or parts must be properly cooked before consumption.
Care of patients with mpox should focus on managing symptoms to make people feel better, and to prevent medical complications. Potential treatments against mpox are being developed and tested."
"Mycetoma, chromoblastomycosis and other deep mycoses",https://www.who.int/health-topics/mycetoma-chromoblastomycosis-and-other-deep-mycoses,"Mycetoma is a chronic, progressively destructive morbid 
inflammatory disease usually of the foot but any part of the body can be
 affected. Infection is most probably acquired by traumatic inoculation 
of certain fungi or ‎bacteria into the subcutaneous tissue. Mycetoma was
 described in the modern literature in 1694 but was first reported in 
the mid-19th century in the Indian town of Madura, and hence was 
initially called Madura foot.
Mycetoma commonly affects young adults, particularly males 
aged between 20 and 40 years, mostly in  developing countries. People of
 low socioeconomic status and manual workers such as agriculturalists, 
labourers and herdsmen are the worst affected.
Mycetoma has numerous adverse medical, health and socioeconomic impacts on patients, communities and health authorities.
As mycetoma is a badly neglected disease, accurate data on its incidence and prevalence are not available.","Mycetoma
is characterized by a triad of painless 
‎subcutaneous mass, multiple sinuses and discharge ‎containing grains. 
It usually ‎spreads to involve the skin, deep structures and bone 
resulting in ‎destruction, ‎deformity and loss of function, which may be fatal. ‎Mycetoma commonly ‎involves the extremities, back and 
gluteal region.‎
Given its slow progression, painless nature, massive lack of 
health education and scarcity of medical and health facilities in 
endemic areas, many patients present late with advanced infection where 
amputation may be the only available treatment.  Secondary bacterial 
infection is common, and lesions may cause increased pain and disability
 and fatal septicaemia (severe infections involving the entire human 
system) if untreated. Infection is not transmitted from human to human.","The treatment depends on the causative organisms for the 
bacterial causes; it is a long term antibiotics combination whereas for
 the fungal type,  treatment requires combined antifungals drugs and 
surgery. The treatment is unsatisfactory, has many side effects, is 
expensive and not available in most endemic areas.
Mycetoma is not a notifiable disease (a disease required by 
law to be reported) and no surveillance systems exist.  There no 
preventable or control programmes for mycetoma yet.  Preventing 
infection is difficult, but people living in or travelling to endemic 
areas should be advised not to walk barefooted."
Neglected tropical diseases,https://www.who.int/health-topics/neglected-tropical-diseases,"Neglected tropical diseases (NTDs) are a diverse group of conditions
1
caused by a variety of pathogens (including viruses, bacteria, parasites, fungi and toxins) and associated with devastating health, social and economic consequences. NTDs are mainly prevalent among impoverished communities in tropical areas, although some have a much larger geographical distribution. It is estimated that NTDs affect more than 1 billion people, while the number of people requiring NTD interventions (both preventive and curative) is 1.6 billion.
The epidemiology of NTDs is complex and often related to environmental conditions. Many of them are vector-borne, have animal reservoirs and are associated with complex life cycles. All these factors make their public-health control challenging.
-------------------------------------
1.
NTDs include: Buruli ulcer; Chagas disease; dengue and chikungunya; dracunculiasis; echinococcosis; foodborne trematodiases; human African trypanosomiasis; leishmaniasis; leprosy; lymphatic filariasis; mycetoma, chromoblastomycosis and other deep mycoses; noma; onchocerciasis; rabies; scabies and other ectoparasitoses; schistosomiasis; soil-transmitted helminthiases; snakebite envenoming; taeniasis/cysticercosis; trachoma; and yaws.","WHO estimates that over 1.6 billion of the world’s population should be targeted by prevention and treatment activities for at least one of these diseases, every year.
In addition to significant mortality and morbidity - approximately 200,000 deaths and 19 million disability adjusted life years (DALYs) lost annually, NTDs cost developing communities the equivalent of billions of United States dollars each year in direct health costs, loss of productivity and reduced socioeconomic and educational attainment. They are also responsible for other consequences such as disability, stigmatization, social exclusion and discrimination and place considerable financial strain on patients and their families.
In spite of this, NTDs have historically ranked very low and almost absent from the global health policy agenda – only to gain recognition in 2015 with the Sustainable Development Goals (SDG target 3.3). SDG3 can therefore be achieved only if the NTD goals are met but, because interventions to tackle NTDs are widely cross-sectoral, increasing their global prioritization can in fact catalyze progress to achieve all SDGs.","WHO’s action to control, prevent, eliminate and eradicate NTDs is guided by
the NTD road map for 2021-2030
, that moves away from vertical disease programmes to integrated cross-cutting approaches. The aim is to facilitate the coordinated scale-up of key interventions through public health approaches such as preventive chemotherapy, individual case management, vector control, veterinary public health and water, sanitation and hygiene (WASH).
The overarching 2030 global targets include a 90% reduction in the number of people requiring treatment for NTDs; a 75% reduction in DALYs related to NTDs; at least 100 countries eliminating at least one NTD; and the eradication of two diseases (dracunculiasis and yaws).
Additional cross-cutting targets focus on integrated approaches, multisectoral coordination, universal health coverage and country ownership, while a further set of targets has been devised to measure progress against each disease."
Newborn health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/newborn-health,"To ensure every child survives and thrives to reach their full potential, we must focus on improving care around the time of birth and the first week of life.
The high rates of preventable death and poor health and well-being of newborns and children under the age of five are indicators of the uneven coverage of life-saving interventions and, more broadly, of inadequate social and economic development. Poverty, poor nutrition and insufficient access to clean water and sanitation are all harmful factors, as is insufficient access to quality health services such as essential care for newborns.
Health promotion, disease prevention services (such as vaccinations) and treatment of common childhood illnesses are essential if children are to thrive as well as survive.","Newborn deaths account for 47% of deaths among children under the age of 5 globally, resulting in 2.4 million lives lost each year. About one third of newborn deaths occur on the day of birth and close to three quarters occur within the first week of life. In addition, almost 2 million babies born with no signs of life at 28 weeks of pregnancy or more (stillbirths) and 295 000 maternal deaths occur each year.
Children who die within the first 28 days of birth suffer from conditions and diseases associated with lack of quality care at birth or skilled care and treatment immediately after birth and in the first days of life. The vast majority of newborn deaths take place in low and middle-income countries.","In 2014, 194 Member States of the Sixty-seventh World Health Assembly endorsed the action plan (Resolution WHA67.10). Led by UNICEF and the World Health Organization, Every Newborn Action Plan (ENAP) was guided by the advice of experts and partners and by multistakeholder consultations and a web-based consultation with over 300 comments from stakeholders. The WHO Director-General has been requested to monitor progress towards the achievement of the global goal and targets, reporting periodically to the World Health Assembly until 2030.
Twenty-eight focus countries were targeted for data collection through the use of a progress tracking tool. This systematic tracking of progress enables the assessment of the status of implementation of ENAP strategies, maps technical assistance needs and identifies barriers to implementation in line with the ENAP milestones and recommendations.
Another area of work is the Quality of Care Network. The main objective of the network is broadening the focus from access to care to include quality of care for maternal, newborn and child health to cut preventable maternal and newborn illness and deaths, and to improve every mother’s experience of care."
Nipah virus infection,https://www.who.int/health-topics/nipah-virus-infection,"Nipah virus infection is a
zoonotic illness that is transmitted to people from animals, and can also be
transmitted through contaminated food or directly from person-to-person. In
infected people, it causes a range of illnesses from asymptomatic (subclinical)
infection to acute respiratory illness and fatal encephalitis. The virus can
also cause severe disease in animals such as pigs, resulting in significant
economic losses for farmers.
Although Nipah virus has
caused only a few known outbreaks in Asia, it infects a wide range of animals
and causes severe disease and death in people.
During the first
recognized outbreak in Malaysia, which also affected Singapore, most human
infections resulted from direct contact with sick pigs or their contaminated
tissues. Transmission is thought to have occurred via unprotected exposure to
secretions from the pigs, or unprotected contact with the tissue of a sick
animal.
In subsequent outbreaks in Bangladesh and India, consumption of fruits or fruit
products (such as raw date palm juice) contaminated with urine or saliva from
infected fruit bats was the most likely source of infection.
Human-to-human
transmission of Nipah virus has also been reported among family and care givers
of infected patients.","Human infections range from asymptomatic infection to acute respiratory infection, seizures and fatal encephalitis. Infected people initially develop symptoms that include fever, headaches, myalgia, vomiting and sore throat. This can be followed by dizziness, drowsiness, altered consciousness, and neurological signs that indicate acute encephalitis. Some people can also experience atypical pneumonia and severe respiratory problems, including acute respiratory distress. Encephalitis and seizures occur in severe cases, progressing to coma within 24 to 48 hours.
The incubation period is from 4 to 14 days but an incubation period as long  as 45 days has been reported.
Most people make a full recovery, although some are left with residual neurological conditions after acute encephalitis. Some cases of relapse have been reported.
The case fatality rate of Nipah virus infection is estimated at 40–75% but can vary by outbreak depending on surveillance and clinical management in affected areas.","There are currently no drugs or vaccines that specifically target Nipah virus infection. WHO has identified Nipah as a priority disease for the
WHO Research and Development Blueprint.
Intensive supportive care is recommended to treat severe respiratory and neurologic complications."
Noncommunicable diseases,https://www.who.int/health-topics/noncommunicable-diseases,"Noncommunicable diseases (NCDs), including heart disease, stroke, cancer, diabetes and chronic lung disease, are collectively responsible for 74% of all deaths worldwide. More than three-quarters of all NCD deaths, and 86% of the 17 million people who died prematurely, or before reaching 70 years of age, occur in low- and middle-income countries.
NCDs share five major risk factors: tobacco use, physical inactivity, the harmful use of alcohol, unhealthy diets and air pollution.
The epidemic of NCDs poses devastating health consequences for individuals, families and communities, and threatens to overwhelm health systems. The socioeconomic costs associated with NCDs make the prevention and control of these diseases a major development imperative for the 21st century.
WHO’s mission is to provide leadership and the evidence base for international action on surveillance, prevention and control of NCDs. Urgent government action is needed to meet global targets to reduce the burden of NCDs.","One of the most important ways of reducing deaths from noncommunicable diseases (NCDs) is to control the risk factors that lead to their development. These include reducing the use of tobacco and the harmful use of alcohol, maintaining an active lifestyle and consuming a healthy diet, and improving air quality. Actions towards these goals are cost-effective ways for countries to reduce the number of NCD deaths. Tackling these risk factors can not only save lives, but also provide a huge economic boost for countries.
Beyond prevention, management of NCDs is critical. This includes detection, screening and treatment of the diseases, as well as palliative care for those in need. The vast majority of premature deaths from NCDs occur in low- and middle-income countries, where universal health coverage or access to health care services is often limited. The development and promotion of universal health coverage is therefore essential in tackling NCDs and working to reduce the number of preventable global deaths.
Surveillance of NCDs is another vital action for providing the information needed for policy and programme development for NCD prevention and control. Tracking and reporting on NCD related global targets and indicators to understand progress in NCD prevention and control are key activities. Accurate data from countries are vital to reverse the global rise in death and disability from NCDs, to support evidence-based decision making, and to help monitor and evaluate the progress being made.","The WHO Department of Noncommunicable Diseases is responsible for global leadership, coordination, guidance and technical support to reduce premature mortality and morbidity from NCDs. In 2019, the World Health Assembly extended the WHO Global action plan for the prevention and control of NCDs 2013–2020 to 2030. It called for the development of an Implementation Roadmap 2023–2030 to accelerate progress on preventing and controlling NCDs. The Implementation Roadmap supports actions to achieve a set of  9 global targets with the greatest impact towards prevention and management of NCDs.
Noncommunicable diseases are recognized as a major global challenge in the United Nations 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development. The Agenda sets the target of reducing premature deaths from NCDs by one third by 2030. WHO plays a key leadership role in the coordination and promotion of the global fight against NCDs and the achievement of the Sustainable Development Goals target 3.4."
Nursing and midwifery,https://www.who.int/health-topics/nursing,"Nursing encompasses autonomous and collaborative care of individuals of all ages, families, groups and communities, sick or well and in all settings. It includes the promotion of health, the prevention of illness, and the care of ill, disabled and dying people. Nurses play a critical role in health care and are often the unsung heroes in health care facilities and emergency response. They are often the first to detect health emergencies and work on the front lines of disease prevention and the delivery of primary health care, including promotion, prevention, treatment and rehabilitation.
In many countries, nurses make up half of all health care professionals and have a vital role in how health actions are organized and applied, both at the front-line and managerial levels.  They are often the first and sometimes only health professional a patient will see and the quality of their initial assessment and subsequent care is vital to strong health outcomes.","Despite the critical role they play in health care, there is a shortage of nurses worldwide that is expected to rise as the population grows. Initiatives to expand health care services, particularly in low- and middle-income countries, are succeeding in providing access to previously underserved communities, which furthers the need for trained nurses. Every country needs a competent, motivated, well-distributed and supported health workforce as part of the global drive for universal health coverage, and nurses are central to these efforts.
Nurses and midwives account for nearly 50% of the global health workforce. However, they also represent 50% of the global shortage of health workers, which is estimated at 4 million. Since in most countries nurses and midwives form the bulk
    of the clinical health workforce, developing and strengthening human resources for health means recognizing that nursing and midwifery services play a vital role in improving health service delivery. Nursing also represents a significant share of
    the female workforce; globally, 70% of health and social workers are women. Achieving the goal of health care for all will require huge efforts to reduce the shortage of health workers around the world.","WHO recognizes the vital role that nurses play in primary
    health care delivery worldwide – including research, disease prevention,
    treating the injured, palliative care and more – which is represented through
    several World Health Assembly resolutions. These documents demonstrate the
    importance WHO Member States attach to nursing and midwifery services as a
    means of achieving better health for all communities.
Nursing and Midwifery at WHO is led by the Chief Nursing Officer (CNO), Dr Amelia Latu Afuhaamango Tuipulotu, from the Kingdom of Tonga. She was appointed to the role in December 2022, taking over from Elizabeth Iro, the first Chief Nursing Officer at WHO, who held the position from 2017-2022. A key role of the Office is to provide leadership to nurses and midwives worldwide.
Through the Department of Human Resources for Health (HRH), WHO works on many fronts to promote the role of nurses in health care delivery and expand the global health work force. The Department aims to facilitate the integration of nursing and midwifery services into other WHO programmes and provide evidence-based information on the global health workforce to assist countries and partners in collaborate efforts. WHO also supports technical efforts for capacity building at both the policy level and through in-country programmes, and works to forge networks and effective partnerships to help meet the global need for health care workers."
Nutrition,https://www.who.int/health-topics/nutrition,"Nutrition is a critical part of health and development. Better nutrition is related to improved infant, child and maternal health, stronger immune systems, safer pregnancy and childbirth, lower risk of non-communicable diseases (such as diabetes and cardiovascular disease), and longevity.
Healthy children learn better. People with adequate nutrition are more productive and can create opportunities to gradually break the cycles of poverty and hunger.
Malnutrition, in every form, presents significant threats to human health. Today the world faces a double burden of malnutrition that includes both undernutrition and overweight, especially in low- and middle-income countries. There are multiple forms of malnutrition, including undernutrition (wasting or stunting), inadequate vitamins or minerals, overweight, obesity, and resulting diet-related noncommunicable diseases.
The developmental, economic, social, and medical impacts of the global burden of malnutrition are serious and lasting for individuals and their families, for communities and for countries.
Learn about Nutrition and Food Safety and COVID-19","Most recent estimates show that globally, 149.2 million children under the age of 5 years of age are stunted (too short for their age) and 45.4 million are wasted (underweight for their height).  The number of children with stunting is declining in all regions except Africa. Over three-quarters of all children suffering from severe wasting live in Asia.
Around 45% of deaths among children under 5 years of age are linked to undernutrition. These mostly occur in low- and middle-income countries.
Anaemia is a serious global public health problem that particularly affects young children and pregnant women. WHO estimates that 40% of children less than 5 years of age and 37% of pregnant women worldwide are anaemic. Thirty percent of women of reproductive age have anaemia.
Globally, 1.9 billion adults are overweight or obese and 38.9 million children under 5 years of age are overweight. Rates of childhood overweight and obesity are rising, particularly in high-income and upper-middle-income countries.
Although breastfeeding protects against undernutrition and overweight, only 44% of infants under 6 months of age are exclusively breastfed.
High sodium consumption (>5 g salt/day) contributes to high blood pressure and increases the risk of heart disease and stroke. Most people consume too much salt – on average 9–12 grams per day, or around twice the recommended maximum level of intake.","According to the 2016–2025 nutrition strategy, WHO uses its convening power to help set, align and advocate for priorities and policies that move nutrition forward globally; develops evidence-informed guidance based on robust scientific and ethical frameworks; supports the adoption of guidance and implementation of effective nutrition actions; and monitors and evaluates policy and programme implementation and nutrition outcomes.
This work is framed by the Comprehensive implementation plan on maternal, infant, and young child nutrition, adopted by Member States through a World Health Assembly resolution in 2012. Actions to end malnutrition are also vital for achieving the diet-related targets of the Global action plan for the prevention and control of noncommunicable diseases 2013–2020, the Global strategy for women’s, children’s, and adolescent’s health 2016–2030, the report of the Commission on Ending Childhood Obesity (2016), and the 2030 Agenda for sustainable development.
In May 2018, the Health Assembly approved the 13th General Programme of Work (GPW13), which guides the work of WHO in 2019–2023. Reduction of salt/sodium intake and elimination of industrially produced trans-fats from the food supply are identified in GPW13 as part of WHO’s priority actions to achieve the aims of ensuring healthy lives and promote well-being for all at all ages."
Obesity,https://www.who.int/health-topics/obesity,"Overweight and obesity are defined as abnormal or excessive fat
accumulation that presents a risk to health. A body mass index (BMI) over 25 is
considered overweight, and over 30 is obese. In 2019, an estimated 5
million noncommunicable disease (NCD) deaths were caused by higher-than-optimal
BMI.
Rates of overweight and obesity continue to grow in adults and
children. From 1990 to 2022, the percentage of children and adolescents aged 5–19
years living with obesity increased four-fold from 2% to 8% globally, while the
percentage of adults 18 years of age and older living with obesity more than
doubled from 7% to 16%.
Obesity is one side of the double burden of
malnutrition
, and today more people are obese than underweight in every region except the South-East Asia Region. Once considered a problem only in high-income countries, today some middle-income countries have among the highest prevalence of overweight and obesity worldwide.","Overweight and obesity are major risk factors for a number of chronic diseases, including cardiovascular diseases such as heart disease and stroke, which are the leading causes of death worldwide. Being overweight can also lead to diabetes and its associated conditions, including blindness, limb amputations, and the need for dialysis. Rates of diabetes have quadrupled since around the world since 1980. Carrying excess weight can lead to musculoskeletal disorders including osteoarthritis. Obesity is also associated with some cancers, including endometrial, breast, ovarian, prostate, liver, gallbladder, kidney and colon. The risk of these noncommunicable diseases increases even when a person is only slightly overweight and grows more serious as the body mass index (BMI) climbs.
Obesity in childhood is associated with a wide range of serious health complications and an increased risk of premature onset of related illnesses. Studies have found that without intervention, children and adolescents with obesity will likely continue to be obese into adulthood.","Many of the causes of overweight and obesity are preventable and reversable. Although other factors are involved, the fundamental cause of obesity is an imbalance of calories consumed and calories expended. As global diets have changed in recent decades, there has been an increase in the consumption of energy-dense foods high in fat and free sugars. There has also been a decrease in physical activity due to the changing nature of many types of work, more access to transportation and increased urbanization.
Lowering the risk of overweight and obesity includes reducing the number of calories consumed from fats and sugars, increasing the portion of daily intake of fruit, vegetables, legumes, whole grains and nuts, and engaging in regular physical activity (60 minutes per day for children and 150 minutes per week for adults). In babies, studies have shown that exclusive breastfeeding from birth to 6 months of age reduces the risk of infants becoming overweight or obese."
Occupational health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/occupational-health,"Occupational health is an area of work in public health to promote and maintain highest degree of physical, mental and social well-being of workers in all occupations.
Its objectives are:
the maintenance and promotion of workers' health and working capacity;
the improvement of working conditions and the working environment to become conducive to safety and health;
the development of work organization and working cultures that should reflect essential value systems adopted by the undertaking concerned, and include effective managerial systems, personnel policy, principles for participation, and voluntary quality-related management practices to improve occupational safety and health.
The science and practice of occupational health involves several disciplines, such as occupational medicine, nursing, ergonomics, psychology, hygiene, safety and other.
The World Health Assembly urges countries to
develop national policies and action plans and to build institutional capacities on occupational health,
scale up the coverage with essential interventions for prevention and control of occupational and work-related diseases and injuries and occupational health services
ensure in collaboration with other relevant national health programmes such as those dealing with communicable and non-communicable diseases, prevention of injuries, health promotion, mental health, environmental health, and health systems development.",N/A,N/A
Onchocerciasis (river blindness),https://www.who.int/health-topics/onchocerciasis,"Onchocerciasis – or “river blindness” – is a parasitic disease caused by the filarial worm
Onchocerca volvulus
transmitted by repeated bites of infected blackflies (
Simulium
spp.). These blackflies breed along fast-flowing rivers and streams, 
close to remote villages located near fertile land where people rely on 
agriculture.
In the human body, the adult worms produce embryonic larvae 
(microfilariae) that migrate to the skin, eyes and other organs. When a 
female blackfly bites an infected person during a blood meal, it also 
ingests microfilariae which develop further in the blackfly and are then
 transmitted to the next human host during subsequent bites.","Onchocerciasis is an eye and skin disease. Symptoms are caused by 
the microfilariae, which move around the human body in the subcutaneous 
tissue and induce intense inflammatory responses when they die. Infected
 people may show symptoms such as severe itching and various skin 
changes. Some infected people develop eye lesions which can lead to 
visual impairment and permanent blindness. In most cases, nodules under 
the skin form around the adult worms.
Onchocerciasis occurs mainly in tropical areas. More than 99% of 
infected people live in 31 countries in sub-Saharan Africa: Angola, 
Benin, Burkina Faso, Burundi, Cameroon, Central African Republic, Chad, 
Republic of Congo, Côte d’Ivoire, Democratic Republic of the Congo, 
Equatorial Guinea, Ethiopia, Gabon, Ghana, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Kenya,
 Liberia, Malawi, Mali, Mozambique, Niger, Nigeria, Rwanda, Senegal, 
Sierra Leone, South Sudan, Sudan, Togo, Uganda, United Republic of 
Tanzania.
Onchocerciasis is also transmitted in Brazil, Venezuela (Bolivarian Republic of) and Yemen.","WHO recommends treating onchocerciasis with ivermectin at least once yearly for 10 to 15 years. Where
O. volvulus
co-exists with
Loa loa
, treatment strategies have to be adjusted.
Loa loa
is a parasitic filarial worm that is endemic in Cameroon, the Central 
African Republic, Congo, the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Nigeria 
and South Sudan. Treatment of individuals with high levels of
L. loa
in the blood can sometimes result in severe adverse events. In affected
 countries, it is recommended to follow the Mectizan Expert Committee 
(MEC)/APOC recommendations for the management of severe adverse events."
One Health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/one-health,"One Health is an integrated, unifying approach that aims to sustainably balance and optimize the health of people, animals and ecosystems.
It recognizes that the health of humans, domestic and wild animals, plants, and the wider environment (including ecosystems) are closely linked and interdependent.
While health, food, water, energy and environment are all wider topics with sector-specific concerns, the collaboration across sectors and disciplines contributes to protect health, address health challenges such as the emergence of infectious diseases, antimicrobial resistance, and food safety and promote the health and integrity of our ecosystems.
By linking humans, animals and the environment, One Health can help to address the full spectrum of disease control – from prevention to detection, preparedness, response and management – and contribute to global health security.
The approach can be applied at the community, subnational, national, regional and global levels, and relies on shared and effective governance, communication, collaboration and coordination. Having the One Health approach in place makes it easier for people to better understand the co-benefits, risks, trade-offs and opportunities to advance equitable and holistic solutions.","COVID-19 has led to the loss of millions of lives and trillions of dollars from the global economy, an impact that needs to be avoided in the future. The emergence of the SARS-CoV-2 virus has underlined the need to strengthen the One Health approach, with a greater emphasis on connections to the environment, as well as promoting a healthy and green recovery from COVID-19, as described in the
WHO manifesto for a healthy recovery from COVID-19
. Human health is a pillar of global health security that is sustained directly and indirectly through access to clean air and fresh water, safe food and healthy sustainable diets, and the availability of and access to medicines.
As we come together as a community in the aftermath of this global pandemic, we have an unprecedented opportunity to strengthen cross-sectoral collaboration; increase policy coordination and coherence supported by a more systematic use of robust scientific evidence; and promote the development of integrated indicators and safeguards to address upstream drivers of disease, with a focus on prevention. These efforts will not only contribute to the prevention of future pandemics but will help to build more resilient and equitable systems, environments, economies and societies.","In the context of the renewed interest from Member States to strengthen work on One Health and prevention of emerging zoonoses and the work of WHO Governing bodies on One Health, the
WHO One Health Initiative team
was set up to serve as the Secretariat of One Health High-Level Expert Panel (OHHLEP), WHO coordination mechanism for its One Health activities and the quadripartite collaboration.
Investing in One Health contributes to WHO’s vision to promote health, keep the world safe and serve the vulnerable. WHO works to integrate the One Health approach into the global health narrative, grounded in strong political leadership, technical expertise and inclusive implementation led and owned by countries.
WHO and partner organizations are working to increase the adoption of the One Health approach in national, regional and international health policies through intersectoral political and strategic leadership; operationalizing responses and scaling up of country support, including research and policy assessment; strengthening country capacities; and monitoring of risks and preparedness for early detection and response to emerging pathogens.
Through combined energies of the
Quadripartite
organizations (FAO, OIE, UNEP and WHO), a comprehensive One Health Joint Plan of Action is in development, supported and advised by the One Health High-Level Expert Panel. The Plan aims to mainstream and operationalize One Health at the global, regional and national levels; support countries in establishing and achieving national targets and priorities for interventions; mobilize investment; promote a whole of society approach; and enable collaboration, learning and exchange across regions, countries and sectors."
Oral health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/oral-health,"Oral health is the state of the mouth, teeth and orofacial structures that enables individuals to perform essential functions such as eating, breathing and speaking, and encompasses psychosocial dimensions such as self-confidence, well-being and the ability to socialize and work without pain, discomfort and embarrassment. Oral health varies over the life course from early life to old age, is integral to general health and supports individuals in participating in society and achieving their potential.
Oral diseases encompass a range of diseases and conditions that include dental caries, periodontal (gum) disease, tooth loss, oral cancer, oro-dental trauma, noma and birth defects such as cleft lip and palate. Oral diseases are among the most common noncommunicable diseases worldwide, affecting an estimated 3.5 billion people. While the global burden of oral health conditions is growing, particularly in low- and middle-income countries, the overall burden of oral health conditions on services is likely to keep increasing because of population growth and ageing.
Oral diseases disproportionately affect the most vulnerable and disadvantaged populations. People of low socioeconomic status carry a higher burden of oral diseases and this association remains across the life course, from early childhood to older age, and regardless of the country's overall income level.","Most oral diseases and conditions share modifiable risk factors with the leading noncommunicable diseases (diabetes, cardiovascular diseases, cancer, chronic respiratory diseases and mental disorders). These risk factors include tobacco use, alcohol consumption and unhealthy diets high in free sugars, all of which are increasing at the global level. There is a proven relationship between oral and general health. It is reported, for example, that diabetes is linked with the development and progression of periodontitis. Moreover, there is a causal link between high consumption of sugars and diabetes, obesity and dental caries.
When oral health is compromised by disease or injury, general health is also affected. The pain and discomfort associated with oral diseases make concentrating difficult, cause people to miss school or work, and can lead to social isolation. Oral diseases have a severe social and economic impact on individuals and families by increasing household expenditures and seriously affecting people’s quality of life and well-being.","The WHO Oral Health Programme leads the work on setting the global 
oral health policy agenda in close collaboration with member states and 
other key stakeholders. Recent momentum has led to the development of 
key policy documents to support countries in moving towards universal 
health coverage for oral health by 2030. These include the
Global strategy on oral health
,
the
Global oral health action plan
and the
Global oral health status report
.
To support implementation of this ambitious policy agenda, the WHO Oral Health Programme supports countries by:
providing leadership and technical support to countries on oral health policy design and implementation;
monitoring disease burden, risk factors, health service use and other health trends related to oral health; and
reviewing current and emerging evidence including cost-effective analyses of oral health interventions to support the establishment of norms and standards.
The WHO Oral Health Programme contributes to other priority activities in countries such as:
supporting the phase down in the use of dental amalgam in the context of the Minamata Convention on mercury;
strengthening the oral health care system with a focus on integrating essential oral health care into primary health care and UHC benefit package;
supporting the implementation of public health interventions based on digital technologies; and
reinforcing integration of oral health into life-course programmes including the UN Decade of Healthy Ageing."
Oxygen,https://www.who.int/health-topics/oxygen,"Oxygen is a life-saving
essential medicine
with no substitution. Healthcare professionals use oxygen to treat respiratory illnesses like
COVID-19
and
pneumonia
. Oxygen is also essential for
surgery
and trauma. Vulnerable groups like
older people
,
pregnant women
,
young infants and
newborns
need oxygen therapy regularly.
Despite being an essential medicine, oxygen is a complex product. Medicinal oxygen is produced in an industrial process applying good manufacturing practices (GMP) or is generated on-site using oxygen concentrators, which are in many legislations regulated as medical devices. Oxygen also requires a whole system to safely reach patients.
Due to their complexity, access to medical oxygen meets many challenges on availability, quality, affordability, management, supply, human resources capacity and safety. In face of these challenges, WHO continuously develops resources and tools to overcome them.","Surveys in low- and middle-income countries (LMICs) have found that fewer
    than half of all health facilities have uninterrupted access to oxygen. It has
    been reported that the lack of access to reliable oxygen supplies contributes
    to preventable deaths, particularly in LMICs. For example, it has been
    estimated that up to 122 000 deaths from childhood pneumonia could be prevented
    annually with the strengthening of oxygen supplies. Numerous studies show that
    oxygen access is a global problem. For example, a recent study found that among
    facilities treating respiratory infections in sub-Saharan Africa, only 1 in 5
    had oxygen in Mauritania and 1 in 10 in Niger. Surveys by the United States
    Agency for International Development found similar situations for countries in
    South America and South Asia. A serious concern at any time, the global medical
    oxygen problem has been exacerbated by the COVID-19 pandemic.
Despite being an essential medicine, producing oxygen that is safe for
    patient use is a complex process since it requires the devices and systems
    needed to deliver oxygen to patients, ranging from pulse oximeters to
    ventilators, and health workers that are trained to use such devices
    effectively. However daunting, the investment of time and resources required to
    meet oxygen supply demand is worth it. The support for the urgent scale-up of
    medicinal oxygen will save lives by improving care for people with COVID-19,
    severe pneumonia and other conditions needing oxygen therapy.","The
Access to COVID-19 Tools (ACT) Accelerator
, launched in 2020, supported assessment of oxygen needs in low- and middle-income countries (LMICs), and supported funding to increase access to medical oxygen. This was followed in 2023 by the
World Health Assembly resolution on Increasing access to medical oxygen
, which urges Member States to enhance access with WHO support.
WHO supports Member States to improve access to medical oxygen by:
deployment of oxygen systems through direct logistical and technical support;
providing technical guidance to clinical and biomedical engineering professionals (such as
technical specifications
, and
foundations of medical oxygen systems
);
education and training in the appropriate selection, procurement, maintenance, and use of
medical devices
;
supporting
research to ensure oxygen is most effectively used for patient benefit
; and
development of tools which enable forecasting and decisions
related to existing and future oxygen systems."
Palliative care,https://www.who.int/health-topics/palliative-care,"Palliative care is a crucial part of integrated, people-centred health services. Relieving serious health-related suffering, be it physical, psychological, social, or spiritual, is a global ethical responsibility. Thus, whether the cause of suffering
    is cardiovascular disease, cancer, major organ failure, drug-resistant tuberculosis, severe burns, end-stage chronic illness, acute trauma, extreme birth prematurity or extreme frailty of old age, palliative care may be needed and has to be available
    at all levels of care.
It is estimated that globally only 14% of patients who need palliative care receive it; to achieve Sustainable Development Goal 3, working towards universal health coverage, countries have to strengthen palliative care services. WHO works with countries
    to include palliative care as a key part of their health systems. To improve equitable access to palliative care services, emphasis is given to a Primary Health Care approach. Assessment tools have been developed to measure progress made. Strong partnerships
    are in place to develop and implement technical guidance, to strengthen capacity and to disseminate information.",N/A,N/A
Patient safety,https://www.who.int/health-topics/patient-safety,"The global landscape of health care is changing with health systems operating in increasingly complex environments. While new treatments, technologies and care models can have therapeutic potential, they can also pose new threats to safe care. Patient safety is a fundamental principle of health care and is now being recognized as a large and growing global public health challenge. Global efforts to reduce the burden of patient harm have not achieved substantial change over the past 15 years, despite pioneering work in some health care settings.
Patient safety is a framework of organized activities that creates cultures, processes, procedures, behaviours, technologies and environments in health care that consistently and sustainably lower risks, reduce the occurrence of avoidable harm, make error less likely and reduce its impact when it does occur.
Every point in the process of care-giving contains a certain degree of inherent unsafety.
Clear policies, organizational leadership capacity, data to drive safety improvements, skilled health care professionals and effective involvement of patients and families in the care process, are all needed to ensure sustainable and significant improvements in the safety of health care.","Patient safety in health care is an urgent and serious global public health concern. Patient harm exerts a very high burden on all health care systems across the world. Every year, an inadmissible number of patients suffer injuries or die because of unsafe and poor quality health care. Most of these injuries are avoidable. The burden of unsafe care broadly highlights the magnitude and scale of the problem.
Patient harm due to adverse events is likely to be among the 10 leading causes of death and disability worldwide.
Most of these deaths and injuries are avoidable.
It is commonly reported that around 1 in 10 hospitalized patients experience harm, with at least 50% being preventable.
Around two-thirds of all adverse events resulting from unsafe care, and the years lost to disability and death, occur in LMICs.
It is estimated that the cost of harm associated with the loss of life or permanent disability, which results in lost capacity and productivity of the affected patients and families, amounts to trillions of US dollars every year. Furthermore, the psychological cost to the patient and their family (associated with the loss or disabling of a loved one), is certainly significant, though more difficult to measure.","Recognizing the huge burden of patient harm in health care, the 72nd World Health Assembly, in May 2019, adopted a resolution (WHA72.6) on “Global action on patient safety”, which endorsed the establishment of World Patient Safety Day, to be observed every year on 17 September; and recognized “patient safety as a global health priority”. The resolution urges Member States to recognize patient safety as a key priority in health sector policies and programmes, and requests the Director-General of WHO to emphasize patient safety as a key strategic priority in WHO’s work, especially within the universal health coverage (UHC) agenda.
The resolution also requests WHO’s Director-General “to formulate a global patient safety action plan in consultation with Member States, regional economic integration organizations and all relevant stakeholders, including in the private sector”. This plan will be based on the guiding principles of equity, sustainability and accountability. The proposed action plan will seek inspiration and coherence with existing global action plans developed by WHO and other global health and development agencies. Responding to the unprecedented global patient safety movement, the need for very urgent and concerted action in this area, and aligning with the Sustainable Developmental Goals, WHO’s Director-General launched the WHO Flagship Initiative “A Decade of Patient Safety 2020-2030” in February 2020."
Pertussis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/pertussis,"Pertussis, also known as whooping cough, is a highly contagious respiratory infection caused by the bacterium
Bordetella pertussis.
In 2018, there were more than 151 000 cases of pertussis globally.
Pertussis spreads easily from person to person mainly through droplets produced by coughing or sneezing. The disease is most dangerous in infants, and is a significant cause of disease and death in this age group.
The first symptoms generally appear 7 to 10 days after infection. They include a mild fever, runny nose and cough, which in typical cases gradually develops into a hacking cough followed by whooping (hence the common name of whooping cough). Pneumonia is a relatively common complication, and seizures and brain disease occur rarely.
People with pertussis are most contagious up to about 3 weeks after the cough begins, and many children who contract the infection have coughing spells that last 4 to 8 weeks. Antibiotics are used to treat the infection.","The best way to prevent pertussis is through immunization. The three-dose primary series diphtheria-tetanus-pertussis (DTP3) (- containing) vaccines decrease the risk of severe pertussis in infancy. In 2018, 86% of the global target population had received the recommended three doses of DTP-containing vaccine during infancy.
WHO recommends the first dose be administered as early as 6 weeks of age; with subsequent doses given 4-8 weeks apart, at age 10-14 weeks and 14-18 weeks. A booster dose is recommended, preferably during the second year of life. Based on local epidemiology, further booster doses may be warranted later in life.
Vaccination of pregnant women is effective in preventing disease in infants too young to be vaccinated. National programmes may consider vaccination of pregnant women with pertussis-containing vaccine as a strategy additional to routine primary infant pertussis vaccination in countries or settings with high or increasing infant morbidity/mortality from pertussis.",N/A
Physical activity,https://www.who.int/health-topics/physical-activity,"Regular physical activity is proven to help prevent and manage noncommunicable diseases (NCDs) such as heart disease, hypertension, stroke, diabetes and several cancers. It also helps to maintain a healthy body weight and can improve mental health, quality of life and well-being. Physical activity refers to all movement. Popular ways to be active include walking, cycling, wheeling, sports, active recreation and play, and can be done at any level of skill and for enjoyment by everybody. Work such as household chores or jobs requiring physical labour is another way to be physically active.
Yet, current global estimates show 1 in 3 adults and 81% of adolescents do not do enough physical activity. Furthermore, as countries develop economically, levels of inactivity increase and can be as high as 70% due to changing transport patterns, increased use of technology for work and recreation, cultural values and increasing sedentary behaviour.
Sedentary behaviour is periods of low energy expenditure such as sitting and watching TV. Both sedentary behaviour and inadequate levels of physical activity have negative impacts on health systems, the environment, economic development, community and individual well-being and quality of life.","Physical inactivity is one of the leading risk factors for noncommunicable diseases (NCDs) and death worldwide.  Alternately, regular physical activity reduces risk of many types of cancer by 8–28%; heart disease and stroke by 19%; diabetes by 17%, depression and dementia by 28–32%.  It is estimated that 4–5 million deaths per year could be averted if the global population was more active.
One in 4 adults and 4 in 5 adolescents don’t do enough physical activity. Women and girls generally are less active than men and boys, widening health inequalities. Older adults and people living with disabilities are also less likely to be active and miss out on the physical, mental and social health benefits. Physical inactivity burdens society through the hidden and growing cost of medical care and loss of productivity.
WHO developed an
economic analysis
which predicts that nearly 500 million new cases of preventable major NCDs will occur globally between 2020 and  2030 if the prevalence of physical inactivity does not change. These NCDs will cost an estimated US $300 billion in healthcare costs alone in that 11 year period, or about US$ 27 billion per year. These estimates do not include the significant indirect costs including loss of productivity.
Failing to increase levels of physical activity will negatively impact attainment of global targets as well as multiple SDGs.","In response to the urgent need to address physical inactivity levels worldwide, WHO developed the
Global action plan on physical activity 2018–2030 (GAPPA): more active people for a healthier world
.
WHO
supports countries and stakeholders to implement the recommended actions by:
setting global      policy and guidelines, underpinned by latest evidence and consensus, which      are developed to help countries develop appropriate policies, investment      cases and financing mechanisms to increase levels of physical activity      among all populations;
providing global      tools and resources including toolkits and training packages to      promote key activities, such as walking and cycling; integrating physical      activity into primary health care; and innovations using digital platforms      to help change behaviours. Capacity building is supported with WHO      Academy courses, workshops and other knowledge exchange activities;
coordinating and      collaborating across sectors including sports, transport, education and      environment sectors to provide safe places and opportunities for physical      activity for everyone and to inform the development of norms and policy that      amplify key messages; and
monitoring global      progress on implementation of the
Global action plan on physical      activity
through the
Global status report
, and levels of      physical inactivity through instruments such as
Global physical activity questionnaire (GPAQ)
and the
Global school-based student health survey (GSHS)
.
WHO reports to the World Health Assembly on the global progress to increase physical activity by 15% by 2030, and GAPPA milestones of 2026 and 2030."
Plague,https://www.who.int/health-topics/plague,"Plague is an infectious disease caused by
Yersinia pestis
bacteria, usually found in small mammals and their fleas. The disease is transmitted between animals via their fleas and, as it is a zoonotic bacterium, it can also transmit from animals to humans.
Humans can be contaminated by the bite of infected fleas, through direct contact with infected materials, or by inhalation. Plague can be a very severe disease in people, particularly in its septicaemic and pneumonic forms, with a case-fatality ratio
of 30% - 100% if left untreated.
Although plague has been responsible for widespread pandemics throughout history, including the so-called Black Death that caused over 50 million deaths in Europe during the fourteenth century, today it can be easily treated with antibiotics and the use of standard preventative measures.
Plague is found on all continents except Oceania but most human cases since the 1990s have occurred in Africa. Democratic Republic of Congo, Madagascar and Peru are the three most endemic countries.","People infected with plague usually develop influenza-like symptoms after an incubation period of 3–7 days. Symptoms include fever, chills, aches, weakness, vomiting and nausea.
There are 3 main forms of plague.
Bubonic plague is the most common and is caused by the bite of an infected flea. The plague bacillus,
Y. pestis
, enters at the bite and travels to the nearest lymph node to replicate. The lymph node becomes inflamed, tense and painful, and is called a bubo. With advanced infections, the inflamed lymph nodes can turn into suppurating open sores. Bubonic plague cannot be transmitted from human to human.
Septicaemic plague occurs when infection spreads through the bloodstream. It may result from flea bites or from direct contact with infective materials through cracks in the skin. Advanced stages of the bubonic form of plague will also lead to direct spread of
Y. pestis
in the blood.
Pneumonic plague – or lung-based plague – is the most virulent and least common form of plague. Typically, it is caused by spread to the lungs from advanced bubonic plague. However, a person with secondary pneumonic plague may form aerosolized infective droplets and transmit plague to other humans. This is usually fatal.","Untreated plague can be rapidly fatal, so early diagnosis and treatment is essential for survival and to reduce complications. Antibiotics and supportive therapy are effective against plague if patients are diagnosed in time.
Laboratory testing is required to confirm infection. This includes identifying the causative bacteria in a sample of pus from a bubo, blood or sputum. WHO does not recommend vaccination except for high-risk people such as laboratory personnel and health
care workers.
Preventive measures include informing people when zoonotic plague is present in their environment and giving advice on how they can protect themselves. They should be advised to take precautions against flea bites and not to handle animal carcasses. People,
especially health workers, should also avoid direct contact with infected tissues such as buboes, or close exposure to patients with pneumonic plague.
Country readiness checklist
(in English)
Country readiness checklist
(in French)
Country readiness checklist
(in Portuguese)"
Pneumonia,https://www.who.int/health-topics/pneumonia,"Pneumonia is a form of acute respiratory infection that is most commonly caused by viruses or bacteria. It can cause mild to life-threatening illness in people of all ages, however it is the single largest infectious cause of death in children worldwide.
Pneumonia killed more than 808 000 children under the age of 5 in 2017, accounting for 15% of all deaths of children under 5 years.  People at-risk for pneumonia also include adults over the age of 65 and people with preexisting health problems.
The lungs are made up of small sacs called alveoli, which fill with air when a healthy person breathes. When an individual has pneumonia, the alveoli are filled with pus and fluid, which makes breathing painful and limits oxygen intake. These infections are generally spread by direct contact with infected people.
Vaccines can help prevent pneumonia.","Depending on the severity of the pneumonia, signs and symptoms may include:
Cough
Shortness of breath
Fever, sweating and shaking chills
Fatigue
Chest pain
Nausea, vomiting or diarrhea
Confusion, especially in older adults","Pneumonia may be treated with antibiotics, if it is bacterial. The antibiotic of choice is amoxicillin dispersible tablets. Most cases of pneumonia require oral antibiotics, which are often prescribed at a health centre. These cases can also be diagnosed and treated with inexpensive oral antibiotics at the community level by trained community health workers. Hospitalization is recommended only for severe cases of pneumonia.
Rest and plenty of hydration can also help people recover quicker.
People of all ages can reduce their risk of pneumonia by:
Get vaccinated: Immunization against Hib, pneumococcus, measles, influenza and whooping cough (pertussis) is the most effective way to prevent pneumonia.
Wash your hands: Maintain good hygiene and washing your hands frequently, especially when caring for others who are sick or after blowing your nose, will keep germs from spreading.
Address environmental factors: Reduce indoor air pollution by providing affordable clean indoor stoves and stop smoking.
Maintain healthy lifestyle: Eat a healthy diet, rest and get regular exercise to help you stay well.
Adequate nutrition is key to improving natural defences, starting with exclusive breastfeeding for the first 6 months of life."
Poliomyelitis (polio),https://www.who.int/health-topics/poliomyelitis,"Poliomyelitis (polio) is a highly infectious viral disease that largely affects children under 5 years of age. The virus is transmitted by person-to-person spread mainly through the faecal-oral route or, less frequently, by a common vehicle (e.g. contaminated water or food) and multiplies in the intestine, from where it can invade the nervous system and cause paralysis.
In 1988, the World Health Assembly adopted a resolution for the worldwide eradication of polio, marking the launch of the
Global Polio Eradication Initiative
, spearheaded by national governments, WHO, Rotary International, the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), UNICEF, and later joined by the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation and Gavi, the Vaccine Alliance.
Wild poliovirus cases have decreased by over 99% since 1988, from an estimated 350 000 cases in more than 125 endemic countries to 6 reported cases in 2021. Of the 3 strains of wild poliovirus (type 1, type 2 and type 3), wild poliovirus type 2 was eradicated in 1999 and wild poliovirus type 3 was eradicated in 2020. As at 2022, endemic wild poliovirus type 1 remains in two countries:  Pakistan and Afghanistan.","Poliovirus is highly infectious. The incubation period is usually 7–10 days but can range from 4–35 days. The virus enters the body through the mouth and multiplies in the intestine.  It then invades the nervous system. Up to 90% of those infected experience no or mild symptoms and the disease usually goes unrecognized. In others, initial symptoms include fever, fatigue, headache, vomiting, stiffness in the neck, and pain in the limbs. These symptoms usually last for 2–10 days and most recovery is complete in almost all cases.  However, in the remaining proportion of cases the virus causes paralysis, usually of the legs, which is most often permanent.  Paralysis can occur as rapidly as within a few hours of infection. Of those paralysed, 5-10% die when their breathing muscles become immobilized.
The virus is shed by infected people (usually children) through faeces, where it can spread quickly, especially in areas with poor hygiene and sanitation systems.","There is no cure for polio; it can only be prevented by immunization. The polio vaccine, given multiple times, can protect a child for life. More than 20 million people are able to walk today who would otherwise have been paralysed, since 1988, when the Global Polio Eradication Initiative was launched. An estimated 1.5 million childhood deaths have been prevented through the systematic administration of vitamin A during polio immunization activities.
Treatments for polio focus on limiting and alleviating symptoms. Heat and physical therapy can be used to stimulate the muscles and antispasmodic drugs are used to relax the effected muscles. This can improve mobility but does not reverse permanent polio paralysis.
Vaccination is crucial in the fight against polio. Failure to implement strategic approaches leads to ongoing transmission of the virus. Endemic transmission of wild poliovirus is continuing to cause cases in border areas of Afghanistan and Pakistan. Failure to stop polio in these last remaining areas could result in as many as 200 000 new cases every year within 10 years, all over the world. That is why it is critical to ensure polio is eradicated completely, once and for all."
Primary health care,https://www.who.int/health-topics/primary-health-care,"All people, everywhere, have the right to achieve the highest attainable level of health. This is the fundamental premise of primary health care (PHC).
Primary health care is a whole-of-society approach to effectively organize and strengthen national health systems to bring services for health and wellbeing closer to communities. It has 3 components:
integrated health services to meet people’s health needs throughout their lives
addressing the broader determinants of health through multisectoral policy and action
empowering individuals, families and communities to take charge of their own health.
Primary health care enables health systems to support a person’s health needs – from health promotion to disease prevention, treatment, rehabilitation, palliative care and more. This strategy also ensures that health care is delivered in a way that is centred on people’s needs and respects their preferences.
Primary health care is widely regarded as the most inclusive, equitable and cost-effective way to achieve universal health coverage. It is also key to strengthening the resilience of health systems to prepare for, respond to and recover from shocks and crises.","Universal health coverage will only be possible when everyone, everywhere can access the health services they need. Communities should be empowered to identify their health priorities and contribute to finding responsive solutions. Heath care and other sectors need to work together to ensure all decisions affecting health are addressed in an integrated way. This includes promoting policies to protect and improve people’s health and well-being; providing information, services and infrastructure for improved water and sanitation and other environmental determinants of health; prevention of noncommunicable diseases; preparing for and responding to health emergencies; providing services for pregnant women, routine vaccination for children and sexual and reproductive health services; mental health support; platforms for community consultation and many others. Primary health care brings these factors together to ensure the highest possible level of health and well-being and their equitable distribution.
The impact is seen in health systems that focus on people’s needs and are as close as feasible to their everyday environment. Primary health care-oriented health systems consistently produce better outcomes, enhanced equity and improved efficiency. Scaling up primary health care interventions across low- and middle-income countries could save 60 million lives and increase average life expectancy by 3.7 years by 2030.","WHO supports Member States in taking a primary health care approach to accelerate progress in achieving universal health coverage. Countries are demonstrating how this strategy has been effective in strengthening their health systems to address people’s needs, both in times of crisis as in normal times.
The principles of primary health care were first outlined in the
Declaration of Alma-Ata
in 1978, a seminal milestone in global health. Forty years later, global leaders ratified the
Declaration of Astana
at the
Global Conference on Primary Health Care
which took place in Astana, Kazakhstan in October 2018. The following year, at the
UN high-level meeting on universal health coverage
, countries declared their commitment to “expand the delivery of and prioritize primary health care as a cornerstone of a sustainable people-centred, community-based and integrated health system and the foundation for achieving universal health coverage.”
To support Member States in translating this commitment into practical actions that are aligned with national contexts and priorities, WHO established the
Special Programme on Primary Health Care
and, together with UNICEF, released the
Operational Framework for Primary Health Care
and the
Primary health care measurement framework and indicators."
Quality of care,https://www.who.int/health-topics/quality-of-care,"Quality of care is the degree to which health services for individuals and populations increase the likelihood of desired health outcomes.  It is based on evidence-based professional knowledge and is critical for achieving universal health coverage.
As countries commit to achieving Health for All, it is imperative to carefully consider the quality of care and health services.  Quality health care can be defined in many ways but there is growing acknowledgement that quality health services
should be:
Effective
– providing evidence-based healthcare services to those who need them;
Safe
– avoiding harm to people for whom the care is intended; and
People-centred
– providing care that responds to individual preferences, needs and values.
To realize the benefits of quality health care, health services must be:
Timely
– reducing waiting times and sometimes harmful delays;
Equitable
– providing care that does not vary in quality on account of gender, ethnicity, geographic location, and socio-economic status;
Integrated
– providing care that makes available the full range of health services throughout the life course;
Efficient
– maximizing the benefit of available resources and avoiding waste.","The Sustainable Development Goals urge countries to achieve Universal Health Coverage (UHC), including financial risk protection and access to
quality
essential health care services. However, the reality in many settings is that providing quality care remains a significant challenge, and inadequate quality results in avoidable mortality, human suffering and significant economic losses.
While challenges to improving the quality of care are substantial, the need for action is clear, and many countries are making progress to build quality into their health systems. The WHO-World Bank-OECD report
–  Delivering quality health services
– highlights the need for action across multiple stakeholders at all health system levels. The provision of quality services requires good governance; a skilled and competent health workforce that is supported and motivated; financing mechanisms that enable and encourage quality care; information systems that continuously monitor and learn to drive better care; medicines, devices and technologies that are available, safe and appropriately regulated; and accessible and well-equipped healthcare facilities.
WHO, World Bank and the OECD have proposed a series of actions from key constituencies – governments, health systems, citizens and patients, and health workers – that need to work together to achieve the goal of quality health service delivery at the front line.","UHC cannot be achieved      without attention to quality of care in all settings including those experiencing fragility, conflict      and vulnerability.
Quality health services      should be: effective; safe; people-centred; timely; equitable; integrated;      and efficient.
Improving the quality of      health services requires strong national direction from governments,      focused sub-national support, and action at the health facility level.      Across all levels there is a need for engagement and empowerment of the      communities served by the health system.
National policies and      strategies aimed at improving quality of care provide a strong foundation      for improving quality across the health system and need to be closely      aligned with broader national health policy and planning.
Quality needs to be      continually measured and monitored to drive improvement, which relies on      accurate, timely and actionable data.
Improving the quality of      health services requires attention to knowledge generation and learning.      Lessons on delivery of quality care should be systematically captured,      documented and shared within and between countries.
Major public health      crises – such as outbreaks of highly infectious diseases – are a priority      for countries. For health systems to be resilient, they require quality      health services that are delivered prior to, maintained during, and      improved upon following a public health emergency."
Rabies,https://www.who.int/health-topics/rabies,"Rabies is a viral zoonotic disease that causes
progressive and fatal inflammation of the brain and spinal cord. Clinically, it
has two forms:
Furious rabies – characterized by hyperactivity and hallucinations.
Paralytic rabies – characterized by paralysis and coma.
Although fatal once clinical signs appear,
rabies is entirely avoidable; vaccines, medicines and technologies have long
been available to prevent death from rabies. Nevertheless, rabies still kills
tens of thousands of people each year. Of these cases, approximately 99% are
acquired from the bite of an infected dog.
Dog-mediated human rabies can be eliminated by
tackling the disease at its source: infected dogs. Making people aware of how
to avoid the bites of rabid dogs, to seek treatment when bitten and to
vaccinate animals can successfully disrupt the rabies transmission cycle.
Rabies is estimated to cause 59 000 human
deaths annually in over 150 countries, with 95% of cases occurring in Africa
and Asia. Due to underreporting and uncertain estimates, this number is likely
a gross underestimate. The burden of disease is disproportionally borne by
rural poor populations, with approximately half of cases attributable to
children under 15 years of age.","Early symptoms of a rabies infection can
include a fever with pain and unusual or unexplained tingling, pricking or
burning sensation (paraesthesia) at the wound site. In later states, the virus
spreads to the central nervous system, causing fatal inflammation of the brain
and spinal cord. The incubation period of the disease can vary from 1 week to 1
year, though it is typically 2–3 months.
The two types of rabies show different
symptoms. Furious rabies causes signs of hyperactivity, excitable behaviour,
hydrophobia (fear of water) and sometimes aerophobia (fear of drafts or of
fresh air). Death occurs after a few days due to cardio-respiratory arrest.
Paralytic rabies, which accounts for about
20% of the total number of human cases, runs a less dramatic and usually longer
course than the furious form. Muscles gradually become paralysed, starting at
the site of the bite or scratch. A coma slowly develops and eventually death
occurs. The paralytic form of rabies is often misdiagnosed, contributing to the
under-reporting of the disease.","Vaccinating dogs is the most cost-effective strategy for preventing rabies in people, and human rabies vaccines exist for pre-exposure immunization.
If you are bitten or scratched by an animal, particularly a dog:
Wash the wound immediately with soap or detergent.
Flush the wound thoroughly for about 15 minutes with copious amounts of water.
Apply an iodine-containing or anti-viral medication to the wound 15 minutes after it has been washed and flushed.
Avoid applying irritants to the wounds such as chili powder, plant juices, acids and alkalis.
Avoid covering the wound with dressings or bandages.
Seek transportation to a health care facility for further assessment and treatment by a healthcare professional.
If possible, safely confine the biting animal and collect information on it and the bite circumstance to provide to the health care professional and public health officer. Keep the biting animal confined and under observation for 10 days.
WHO continues to promote human rabies prevention through the elimination of rabies in dogs, dog bite prevention strategies, and more widespread use of the intradermal route for post-exposure prophylaxis, which reduces volume and therefore the cost of cell-cultured vaccine by 60% to 80%."
Radiation,https://www.who.int/health-topics/radiation,"Radiation is energy that travels in the form of waves or particles and is part of our everyday environment. People are exposed to radiation from cosmic rays, as well as to radioactive materials found in the soil, water, food, air and also inside the body.
Human-made radiation sources are widely used in medicine, industry, and research. There are two types of radiation: ionizing and non-ionizing radiation.","Ionizing radiation is a type of energy released by atoms that travels in the form of electromagnetic waves (gamma or X-rays) or particles (neutrons, beta or alpha). Ionizing radiation can remove electrons from the atoms, i.e. they can ionize atoms. In terms of natural radiation sources, there are more than 60 different naturally occurring radioactive materials present in the environment, with radon gas being the highest contributor to people’s exposure.
Artificial radiation sources are used for nuclear power generation and many other industrial and research applications, with the medical use of ionizing radiation being today the highest contributor to people’s exposure (e.g. diagnostic radiology, image-guided interventions, nuclear medicine and radiotherapy).","Non-ionizing radiation is radiation in the part of the electromagnetic spectrum where there is insufficient energy to cause ionization. It includes electric and magnetic fields, radio waves, microwaves, and optical radiation, which consists of infrared, visible, and ultraviolet radiation.
Non-ionizing radiation encompasses both natural and human-made sources of electromagnetic fields. Electrical power supplies and appliances are the most common sources of low frequency electric and magnetic fields in our living environment. Everyday sources of radiofrequency electromagnetic fields include telecommunications, broadcasting antennas and microwave ovens.
Optical radiation technologies, such as lasers, light bulbs and UV lamps, are used in industry, research and medicine. Non-ionizing radiation also encompasses mechanical waves such as infrasound and ultrasound."
Radiation emergencies,https://www.who.int/health-topics/radiation-emergencies,"Radiation emergencies are non-routine situations or events that require a prompt action to mitigate a radio-nuclear hazard or its adverse consequences for human life, health, property or the environment.
Nuclear emergencies involve release of the energy resulting from a nuclear chain reaction or from the decay of the products of chain reaction (e.g. nuclear power plant accidents such as Chernobyl and Fukushima accidents).  Radiological emergencies are situations involving a radiation exposure from a radioactive source. When referring to an emergency situation regardless of its type, “radiation emergency” term is often used.
Radiation emergencies may result from misuse of radioactive sources during industrial, medical or research applications, accidental exposure to uncontrolled (abandoned, lost or stolen) radiation sources, accidents during transport of radioactive materials, but also can be combined with conventional emergencies (a fire or a release of chemical substances), natural disasters, military conflicts, or malicious acts involving radiation sources.","Radiation emergencies can greatly impact human health and  the environment. The impact will vary considerably, depending on the scenario, scale of the emergency, type of radiation and exposure duration, the pathway of the exposure (external, internal, or combined), availability and timeliness of countermeasures, as well as individual characteristics of the exposed person (age, gender, underlying state of health).
As a result, people may be exposed to radiation levels ranging from very low doses not resulting in any clinical manifestations of such exposure, to higher doses which may cause radiation injuries (a.k.a. “tissue reactions”) or even be fatal. The risk of health effects increases with the radiation dose. Workers at nuclear installations, first responders and fire-fighters are at higher risk of being over-exposed to radiation and receiving radiation injures, whereas, for the majority of people affected by the consequences of a nuclear emergency, it will be unlikely to suffer the direct impact of radiation.
In addition, urgent protective actions implemented in response to a radiation emergency, such as sheltering, evacuation, or resettling from contaminated areas, restrictions on locally produced foodstuffs etc. may also lead to negative socio-economic impact on the human lives and the society as a whole. Losing homes and jobs, lack of access to a regular health care, stigmatization of evacuees and other hardship may further impact people’s health through severe stress, anxiety, fatigue, depression, and other mental health and psychosocial consequences.","As a full party to the
Convention on Assistance in the Case of a Nuclear Accident or Radiological Emergency
, WHO has a mandate to provide technical assistance and advice on public health measures and medical countermeasures. The IAEA provides Secretariat for the Convention and for
the Inter-Agency Committee for Radiological and Nuclear Emergencies
(IACRNE) that brings together more than 20 international organizations for coordination of their work on preparedness and response to radiation emergencies. The roles of IACRNE member organizations are described in the
Joint Radiation Emergency Management Plan of the International Organizations
.
To fulfill its mandate under these Conventions, WHO established in 1987 the
Radiation Emergency Medical Preparedness and Assistance Network (REMPAN)
to enhance preparedness for radiation emergencies and to advise health authorities on medical and public health response in the event of a radiation emergency. The Network is WHO’s technical arm for implementing capacity building activities in member states and for providing technical assistance in case of radiation emergencies. In addition, a global network of cytogenetic laboratories
WHO BioDoseNet
was set up in 2008 to support biological dosimetry capacity of member states readiness for a mass-casualty type of a radiation emergency."
Radon,https://www.who.int/health-topics/radon,"Radon is a naturally occurring radioactive gas. It has no smell, colour or taste, and is produced from the natural radioactive decay of uranium in rocks and soil. Radon can also be found in water.
Radon gas escapes easily from the ground into the air. Outdoors, radon quickly dilutes to very low concentrations and is generally not a problem. However, it tends to concentrate in enclosed spaces, such as underground mines, houses, and other buildings. Soil gas infiltration is recognized as the most important source of residential radon. Other sources of radon include building materials and water extracted from wells, but are of less importance.
Radon decays and produces further radioactive particles. As we breathe, the particles are deposited on the cells lining the airways, where they can damage DNA and potentially cause lung cancer.
Radon causes between 3–14% of all lung cancers, depending on the average radon level and the smoking prevalence in a country. Radon is much more likely to cause lung cancer in people who smoke: smokers are 25 times more at risk from radon than non-smokers.","For most people, the greatest exposure to radon occurs in the home. The concentration of radon in a home depends on the amount of uranium in the underlying rocks and soils, the construction of the house and the ventilation habits of the inhabitants.
Radon levels can be measured in an inexpensive and simple manner.
Well-tested, durable and cost-efficient methods exist for preventing radon in new houses and reducing radon in existing dwellings. Radon prevention should be considered when new houses are built, particularly in radon prone areas. Radon levels in existing homes can be reduced by, for example, improving the ventilation of the house and sealing floors and walls.
In many countries, drinking water is obtained from groundwater sources such as springs and wells. Radon dissolved in drinking-water can be released into indoor air. Normally, a higher radon dose is received from inhaling radon compared with ingestion. Straightforward and effective techniques exist to reduce the concentration of radon in drinking-water supplies by aeration or using special filters.","WHO works with international partners to increase understanding of the effects of radon exposure on health and to promote sound policy options for preventing and mitigating radon exposure.
WHO supports the development of national radon programmes and activities related to radon policies, radon mitigation and prevention as well as radon risk communication."
Refugee and migrant health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/refugee-and-migrant-health,"Today there are some 1 billion migrants globally, about 1 in 8 of the global population. These include 281 million international migrants and 82.4 million forcibly displaced (48 million internally displaced, 26.4 million refugees, 4.1 million asylum seekers)
(1)
. UNHCR estimates there are many millions of stateless people globally.
The experience of migration is a key determinant of health and well-being. Refugees and migrants remain among the most vulnerable members of society faced often with xenophobia; discrimination; poor living, housing, and working conditions; and inadequate access to health services, despite frequently occurring physical and mental health problems.
The COVID-19 pandemic has posed additional challenges both in terms of increased risk of infection and death experienced by refugees and migrants and has highlighted existing inequities in access to and utilization of health services. Refugees and migrants have also suffered the negative economic impact of lockdown and travel restrictions.
Refugees and migrants need to be in good health to protect both themselves and host populations. They have the human right to health, and countries have an obligation to provide refugee and migrant sensitive health care services.
In 2020 WHO established the Health and Migration Programme (PHM) to provide global leadership in health and migration issues in the context of WHO’s own
Global action plan: promoting the health of refugees and migrants 2019–23.
[1] https://www.unhcr.org/refugee-statistics/","Refugees and migrants often come from communities affected by war, conflict or economic crisis, with vulnerabilities related to the condition of their journeys such as inadequate access to food and water, sanitation and other basic services. They are at risk of communicable diseases, accidental injuries, hypothermia, burns, unwanted pregnancy and delivery-related complications, and various noncommunicable diseases. Moreover, refugees and migrants are at risk of poor mental health outcomes. Refugee and migrant health are also strongly related to the social determinants of health in host communities (e.g., employment, income, education and housing).
To promote public health protection for them and the host populations, refugees and migrants should have equitable access to quality health services, free of discrimination, exclusion and stigma. In addition, appropriate multisectoral public policy responses are required to address the social determinants.
Refugees and migrants also play a key employment role in the provision of health and social services, and access to health services for the populations recognizes this contribution and contributes to social well-being and cohesion.
The WHO Health and Migration Programme (PHM) works with countries to promote the human right to health and access to quality and culturally appropriate health services, with adequate social and financial protection.","The WHO
Global action plan: promoting the health or refugees and migrants
(GAP) was agreed by the World Health Assembly in 
2019. The GAP is part of an international framework established by the 
United Nations to manage global migration positively, including the 
Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs), and two global compacts, the 
Global Compact on Refugees (GCR) and the Global Compact for Safe, 
Orderly and Regular Migration (GCM).
The WHO
Global action plan
has six key priorities:
promote the health of refugees and migrants through a mix of short-term and long-term public health interventions;
promote continuity and quality of essential health care, while developing, reinforcing and implementing occupational health and safety measures;
advocate the mainstreaming of refugee and migrant health into global, regional and country agendas and the promotion of refugee-sensitive and migrant-sensitive health policies and legal and social protection; the health and well-being of refugee and migrant women, children and adolescents; gender equality and empowerment of refugee and migrant women and girls; and partnerships and intersectoral, intercountry and interagency coordination and collaboration mechanisms;
enhance capacity to tackle the social determinants of health and to accelerate progress towards achieving the Sustainable Development Goals, including universal health coverage;
strengthen health monitoring and health information systems; and
support measures to improve evidence-based health communication and to counter misconceptions about migrant and refugee health.
WHO Health and Migration Programme (PHM) aims to implement the
Global action plan
to promote and secure the health rights of refugees and 
migrants by providing global leadership in health and migration issues."
Rehabilitation,https://www.who.int/health-topics/rehabilitation,"Rehabilitation addresses the impact of a health condition
on a person’s everyday life by optimizing their functioning and reducing their
experience of disability. Rehabilitation expands the focus of health beyond
preventative and curative care to ensure people with a health condition can
remain as independent as possible and participate in education, work and
meaningful life roles. Anyone may need rehabilitation at some point in their
lives, whether they have experienced an injury, disease, illness, or because
their functioning has declined with age.
Globally, 1 in 3 people today are estimated to be living
with a health condition that would benefit from rehabilitation. This need is
predicted to increase in the coming years due to changes in the health and characteristics
of the population. For example, people are living longer but with more chronic
disease and disability. Emergencies, including conflicts, disasters and
outbreaks can all create surges in rehabilitation needs. Globally, many people
are living with mid- and long-term consequences of COVID-19 and may be in need
of rehabilitation to support their recovery from the disease.","Although the need for rehabilitation is increasing
globally, many countries are unequipped to respond to existing needs. In some
low- and middle-income countries, more than 50% of people do not receive the
rehabilitation services they require. Rehabilitation services are often under
funded and under valued, particularly in countries without strong health
systems.
Rehabilitation helps to reduce the impacts of disease and
injury on individuals, while also complimenting other health interventions. This
means it can be seen as an investment in health care costs because it can lower
long term reliance on health systems through reducing hospitalization, shortening
hospital stays and preventing readmissions. The investment pays off further by enabling
people to return to work, education and other pursuits more quickly following the
health issue.
Rehabilitation is a neglected but essential part of emergency
response and long-term recovery. Emergencies disproportionately effect weaker
health systems and the most vulnerable, but early and ongoing access to
rehabilitation reduces complications, optimizes functioning and reduces
disability in those affected, supporting individuals, families and communities
in their recovery.","WHO views rehabilitation as an essential part of achieving both
universal health coverage and goal 3 of the
Sustainable Development Goals
. To
this end, WHO works to make rehabilitation part of health care at all levels
through efforts to strengthen health systems as a whole.
In 2017 WHO launched the
Rehabilitation 2030
initiative
, which emphasizes the need for concerted and coordinated action
by all stakeholders to strengthen the health system to provide quality and
timely rehabilitation. This occurs through actions such as improving leadership
and governance; developing a strong multidisciplinary rehabilitation workforce;
expanding financing for rehabilitation; and improving data collection and
research on rehabilitation. In emergencies, we are developing tools to help
strengthen rehabilitation preparedness, while also working to better integrate
rehabilitation into responses.
WHO continues to support countries to implement these
actions through providing technical support, developing guidance and practical
tools, and increasing the development of robust evidence for rehabilitation. These
efforts focus both on local and national health systems, as well as responses
to emergencies to ensure rehabilitation services are available to anyone who
needs them."
Research,https://www.who.int/health-topics/research,"Research is indispensable for resolving public health challenges – whether it be tackling diseases of poverty, responding to rise of chronic diseases,  or ensuring that mothers have access to safe delivery practices.
Likewise, shared vulnerability to global threats, such as severe acute respiratory syndrome, Ebola virus disease, Zika virus and avian influenza has mobilized global research efforts in support of enhancing capacity for preparedness and response. Research is strengthening surveillance, rapid diagnostics and development of vaccines and medicines.
Public-private partnerships and other innovative mechanisms for research are concentrating on neglected diseases in order to stimulate the development of vaccines, drugs and diagnostics where market forces alone are insufficient.
Research for health spans 5 generic areas of activity:
measuring the magnitude and distribution of the health problem;
understanding the diverse causes or the determinants of the problem, whether they are due to biological, behavioural, social or environmental factors;
developing solutions or interventions that will help to prevent or mitigate the problem;
implementing or delivering solutions through policies and programmes; and
evaluating the impact of these solutions on the level and distribution of the problem.","High-quality research is essential to fulfilling WHO’s mandate for the attainment by all peoples of the highest possible level of health. One of the Organization’s core functions is to set international norms, standards and guidelines, including setting international standards for research.
Under the “WHO strategy on research for health”, the Organization works to identify research priorities, and promote and conduct research with the following 4 goals:
Capacity
- build capacity to strengthen health research systems within Member States.
Priorities
- support the setting of research priorities      that meet health needs particularly in low- and middle-income countries.
Standards
- develop an enabling environment for research      through the creation of norms and standards for good research practice.
Translation
- ensure quality evidence is turned into      affordable health technologies and evidence-informed policy.
WHO’s research activities also include strengthening the culture of research for evidence-based decision-making within the Organization so that research informs our technical activities, policy decisions and recommendations.",N/A
Rift valley fever,https://www.who.int/health-topics/rift-valley-fever,"Rift Valley fever (RVF) is a viral zoonosis that primarily affects animals but also has the capacity to infect humans. It is transmitted by mosquitoes and blood feeding flies. In humans, the disease ranges from a mild flu-like illness to severe haemorrhagic
    fever that can be lethal. When livestock are infected the disease can cause significant economic losses due to high mortality rates in young animals and waves of abortions in pregnant females.
While some human infections have resulted from the bite of infected mosquitoes, most human infections result from contact with the blood or organs of infected animals. Occupational groups such as herders, farmers, slaughterhouse workers and veterinarians
    are at higher risk of infection. Humans may also become infected by ingesting the unpasteurized or uncooked milk of infected animals. No human-to-human transmission of RVF has been documented.
The virus is a member of the
Phlebovirus
genus and was first identified in 1931 in a sheep epidemic on a farm in the Rift Valley of Kenya. Since then, outbreaks have been reported in sub-Saharan Africa and North Africa. In 2000, the
    first reported cases of the disease outside the African continent came from Saudi Arabia and Yemen.","Mild form of Rift Valley Fever in humans
The interval from infection to onset of symptoms for Rift Valley fever (RVF) varies from 2 to 6 days. In its mild form, people who are infected with the virus either experience no detectable symptoms at all or develop a mild form of the disease characterized
    by a feverish syndrome with sudden onset of flu-like fever, muscle pain, joint pain and headache. Some patients develop neck stiffness, sensitivity to light, loss of appetite and vomiting; in these patients the disease, in its early stages, may be
    mistaken for meningitis. The symptoms of RVF usually last from 4 to 7 days.
Severe form of Rift Valley Fever in humans
While most human cases are relatively mild, a small percentage of patients develop a much more severe form of the disease. This usually appears as one or more of three distinct syndromes: ocular (eye) disease (0.5-2% of patients), meningoencephalitis
    (less than 1%) or haemorrhagic fever (less than 1%).
The total case fatality rate for RVF has varied widely between documented epidemics but, overall, has been less than 1%. Most fatalities occur in patients who develop the haemorrhagic icterus (jaundice) form of the disease.","Diagnosis
Because the symptoms of Rift Valley fever (RVF) are varied and non-specific, clinical diagnosis is often difficult, especially early in the course of the disease. RVF is difficult to distinguish from other viral haemorrhagic fevers as well as from many
    other diseases that cause fever, including malaria and typhoid fever. As such, definitive diagnosis requires laboratory testing.
Treatment
As most human cases of RVF are relatively mild and of short duration, patients with this form of the disease require no specific treatment. For the more severe cases, the predominant treatment is general supportive therapy.
An inactivated vaccine has been developed for human use. However, it is not licensed or commercially available. It has been used experimentally to protect veterinary and laboratory personnel at high risk of exposure to RVF. Other candidate vaccines are
    under investigation.
During an outbreak of RVF, close contact with animals and their body fluids has been identified as the most significant risk factor for RVF virus infection. Risk of animal-to-human transmission of infection can be reduced by avoiding unsafe animal husbandry
    and slaughtering practices by maintaining good hygiene, and avoiding unsafe consumption of fresh blood, raw milk or animal tissue in affected regions."
Road traffic injuries,https://www.who.int/health-topics/road-safety,"Road traffic crashes result in the deaths of approximately 1.19 million people around the world each year and leave between 20 and 50 million people with non-fatal injuries. More than half of all road traffic deaths occur among vulnerable road users, such as pedestrians, cyclists and motorcyclists.
Road traffic injuries are the leading cause of death for children and young adults aged 5–29. Yet two thirds of road traffic fatalities occur among people of working age (18–59 years). Nine in 10 fatalities on the roads occur in low- and middle-income countries, even though these countries have around 60% of the world's vehicles.
In addition to the human suffering caused by road traffic injuries, they also incur a heavy economic burden on victims and their families, both through treatment costs for the injured and through loss of productivity of those killed or disabled. More broadly, road traffic injuries have a serious impact on national economies, costing countries 3% of their annual gross domestic product.
Measures proven to reduce the risk of road traffic injuries and deaths exist and the 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development has set an ambitious target of reducing road traffic deaths and injuries by 50% by 2030.","Many factors increase both the risk of road traffic crashes and the risk of death or injury they result in.
Driving at higher speed significantly increases both the likelihood of a crash occurring and the severity of its consequences. For every 1% increase in mean speed there is a 4% increase in fatal crash risk. The risk of death for pedestrians hit by motorized vehicles also rises rapidly as speed increases. A pedestrian hit by a vehicle travelling at 65 kilometres per hour is 4.5 times more likely to die than those hit by a vehicle travelling at 50 kilometres per hour.
Driving under the influence of alcohol or other psychoactive substances presents significant risk factor for road traffic injuries. In the case of drink-driving, risk of road traffic injury increases significantly as the driver’s blood alcohol concentration goes up. In the case of drug-driving, the risk of road traffic injury increases to differing degrees depending on the psychoactive drug used.
There are a number of other significant risk factors:
the non-use of motorcycle helmets, seat-belts and child restraints
distraction, including the use of mobile phones, leading to impaired driving
unsafe vehicles and unsafe road infrastructure
inadequate post-crash care
inadequate enforcement of traffic laws.","WHO works with Member States and partners to support road safety evaluation, implementation and planning. As the lead agency for road safety in the United Nations, WHO plays a key role in guiding global efforts by advocating for road safety at the highest political levels, compiling and sharing good practices and raising awareness of road safety.
WHO serves as the secretariat for the United Nations Decade of Action for Road Safety 2021–2030 which aims to reduce road traffic deaths and injuries by at least 50% by 2030. This includes convening a global network of Heads of National Road Safety Agencies, producing Global Status Reports to track progress, and providing technical assistance.
WHO works with a range of partners to provide technical support to countries and works with non-governmental organizations (NGOs) to share knowledge, experience and best practices. WHO chairs the United Nations Road Safety Collaboration, and organizes and hosts, with key partners, high profile advocacy events such as UN road safety weeks and the annual World Day of Remembrance for Road Traffic Victims."
Scabies,https://www.who.int/health-topics/scabies,"Scabies is one of the commonest dermatological conditions, accounting for a substantial proportion of skin disease in many low- and middle-income countries. Globally, it is estimated to affect more than 200 million people at any time and more than 400 million people every year.
Scabies is caused by infestation of the skin with a microscopic mite (
Sarcoptes scabiei
var.
hominis
) characterized by itch and a skin eruption. Scabies is frequently complicated by bacterial skin infection (impetigo). In turn, impetigo may result in abscesses, sepsis and invasive infections with bacteria, most frequently
Staphylococcus aureus
and
Streptococcus pyogenes
, the latter of which may result in kidney disease and rheumatic heart disease. Scabies also impacts quality of life: itch and visible rash often lead to poor sleep, stigmatization and social exclusion, interrupting school and work attendance.
Scabies affects the world’s most disadvantaged populations,
especially people living in crowded and impoverished conditions, from island communities in the Pacific to favelas of Latin America, remote and rural communities across Africa and Australia, and displaced populations living in camps. In resource-poor settings, scabies and its complications impose a major cost on health care systems. In high-income countries, cases are sporadic, yet outbreaks in health institutions and vulnerable communities contribute to significant economic costs for national health services.","Scabies mites burrow under the upper layer of the skin to lay their eggs, resulting in intense itching. Characteristics of scabies are papules or burrows in typical locations, including the web spaces of the fingers and toes, wrists, buttocks, breasts in females, and genitals. In young children and the elderly, scabies lesions may also be present on the palms, soles and scalp. The itching and rash cause poor sleep, stigmatization and social exclusion, as well as absenteeism from education and employment, resulting in reduced learning potential for children and economic impacts for families and communities. Presence of redness, pus or crusts may indicate a secondary bacterial infection. This should be differentiated from crusted scabies, a severe form of scabies, that is characterized by thick, scaly, plaques over the skin and, in severe cases, deep fissures.","Primary management of affected individuals involves application of a topical scabicide such as 5% permethrin, 0.5% malathion in aqueous base, 10–25% benzyl benzoate emulsion or 5–10% sulfur ointment. Oral ivermectin is also highly effective and is approved in several countries. The safety of ivermectin in pregnant women or children below
15 kg body weight has not been established, so ivermectin should not be used in these groups until more safety data are available. Itch commonly intensifies with effective treatment for 1–2 weeks and treated individuals should be informed accordingly.
Because people in the early stage of new infestation may be asymptomatic, it is critical to treat the whole household at the same time as the diagnosed case. Repeating treatment in the time frame appropriate for the chosen medication (typically after 7–14 days) will lead to a higher efficacy, particularly for oral ivermectin, which does not kill mite eggs."
Schistosomiasis (Bilharzia),https://www.who.int/health-topics/schistosomiasis,"Schistosomiasis is a disease of poverty that leads to chronic
ill-health. Infection is acquired when people come into contact with
fresh water infested with the larval forms (cercariae) of parasitic
blood flukes, known as schistosomes. The microscopic adult worms live in
the veins draining the urinary tract and intestines. Most of the eggs
they lay are trapped in the tissues and the body’s reaction to them can
cause massive damage.
Schistosomiasis affects almost 240 million people worldwide, and
more than 700 million people live in endemic areas. The infection is
prevalent in tropical and sub-tropical areas, in poor communities
without potable water and adequate sanitation. Urogenital
schistosomiasis is caused by Schistosoma haematobium and intestinal
schistosomiasis by any of the organisms
S. guineensis, S. intercalatum, S. mansoni, S. japonicum
, and
S. mekongi
.
Several million people all over the world suffer from severe morbidity as a consequence of schistosomiasis.
The WHO strategy on use of anthelminthic drugs now makes it possible to
control schistosomiasis in poor and marginalized communities, in
conjunction with interventions against lymphatic filariasis,
onchocerciasis and soil transmitted helminthiasis. In highly endemic
areas, severe morbidity due to schistosomiasis can be prevented by
regular treatment of at risk groups targeted based on community
diagnosis based on sentinel groups. Praziquantel has been safely
co-administered with albendazole and ivermectin, in areas where these
drugs have been used separately for preventive chemotherapy.","Symptoms of schistosomiasis are caused by the body’s reaction to the worms' eggs.
Intestinal schistosomiasis can result in abdominal pain, diarrhoea, and blood in the stool. Liver enlargement is common in advanced cases, and is frequently associated with an accumulation of fluid in the peritoneal cavity and hypertension of the abdominal blood vessels. In such cases there may also be enlargement of the spleen.
The classic sign of urogenital schistosomiasis is haematuria (blood in urine). Fibrosis of the bladder and ureter, and kidney damage are sometimes diagnosed in advanced cases. Bladder cancer is another possible complication in the later stages. In women, urogenital schistosomiasis may present with genital lesions, vaginal bleeding, pain during sexual intercourse, and nodules in the vulva. In men, urogenital schistosomiasis can induce pathology of the seminal vesicles, prostate, and other organs. This disease may also have other long-term irreversible consequences, including infertility.
The economic and health effects of schistosomiasis are considerable and the disease disables more than it kills. In children, schistosomiasis can cause anaemia, stunting and a reduced ability to learn, although the effects are usually reversible with treatment.","Praziquantel is the recommended treatment against all forms of
schistosomiasis. It is effective, safe, and low-cost. Even though
re-infection may occur after treatment, the risk of developing severe
disease is diminished and even reversed when treatment is initiated and
repeated in childhood.
Schistosomiasis control has been
successfully implemented over the past 40 years in several countries,
including Brazil, Cambodia, China, Egypt, Mauritius, Islamic Republic of
Iran, Oman, Jordan, Saudi Arabia, Morocco, Tunisia, etc. In Burundi,
Burkina Faso, Ghana, Niger, Rwanda, Sierra Leone, the United Republic of
Tanzania, and Yemen, it has been possible to scale-up schistosomiasis
treatment to the national level and have an impact on the disease in a
few years. An assessment of the status of transmission is required in
several countries.
Over the past 10 years,
there has been scale-up of treatment campaigns in a number of
sub-Saharan countries, where most of those at risk live."
Self-care for health and well-being,https://www.who.int/health-topics/self-care,"Self-care is the ability of individuals, families and communities to promote health, prevent disease, maintain health, and cope with illness and disability with or without the support of a health worker.
Currently 3.6 billion people – half of the world – lack access to essential health services. WHO recommends self-care interventions for every country and economic setting, as a critical path to reach universal health coverage, promote
        health, keep the world safe, and serve the vulnerable.
Self-care recognises individuals as active agents in managing their own health care, in areas including health promotion; disease prevention and control; self-medication; providing care to dependent persons, and rehabilitation, including palliative
        care.
Self-care interventions are evidence-based,
quality tools
that support self-care. They include medicines, counselling, diagnostics and/or digital technologies which can be accessed fully or partially outside of formal health services. Depending on
        the intervention, they can be used with or without the direct supervision of health workers.
Self-care interventions can:
empower individuals and communities to manage their health and well-being
strengthen national institutions with efficient use of domestic resources for health
improve primary healthcare (PHC) and contribute to achieving UHC","A people-centred approach
Self-care interventions support the needs and rights of individuals through a
people-centred approach
that is grounded in human rights and gender equality.
This is a holistic approach to the health and well-being of each person, taking account of their circumstances, needs and desires across a lifetime, as well as the environment in which they live.
Self-care is the power of individuals to prevent and treat diseases themselves, in the context of a safe and supportive enabling environment. It does not replace the health care system, but instead provides additional choices and options for health care.
Available, accessible, affordable, acceptable and good quality self-care interventions are core components of promoting and protecting people’s right to health. Self-care interventions can improve the efficiency of health service delivery, access and coverage.
This requires supportive laws and policies, health financing, regulated quality products and interventions, and education which promotes the participation of individuals, as well as privacy and confidentiality.
Human rights considerations help to reduce violence, coercion, stigma and discrimination by improving each person’s exercise of their right to health, information, and independent decision-making.","Pandemics and humanitarian crises
In situations where existing health systems are stretched, there is often an unprecedented demand on individuals and communities to manage their health.
Innovative strategies that go beyond the conventional health sector response is urgently needed given that:
a record 274 million people are currently in need of humanitarian assistance and protection and disease outbreaks are a constant global threat
at least 400 million people worldwide lack access to the most essential health services.
1 in 5 of the world’s population are now living in humanitarian crises, in which health systems are challenged to deliver essential services.
Self-care interventions can provide valuable, additional options to the usual health facility- or health worker-based services, as part of a supportive health system.
This is particularly relevant during a pandemic like COVID-19, when self-isolation and physical distancing measures make it more difficult for people to access their normal health care services and medications and national health systems can be disrupted.
WHO includes self-care interventions as priority actions in
operational guidance
on maintaining essential health services for the COVID-19 context."
Sepsis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/sepsis,"Sepsis is a life-threatening condition that arises when the body’s response to infection causes injury to its own tissues and organs. It is frequently a final common pathway to death for many infectious diseases worldwide. It involves organ dysfunction caused by a dysregulated host response to infection and if not recognized early and managed promptly, it can lead to septic shock, multiple organ failure and death. Although a precise estimate of the global epidemiological burden of sepsis is difficult to ascertain, a recent scientific publication reported that sepsis affects an estimated 49 million people and causes 11 million deaths globally every year.
In the community setting, sepsis often presents as the clinical deterioration of common and preventable infections. Sepsis also frequently results from
infections acquired in health care settings, which are one of the most frequent adverse events during care delivery and affect hundreds of millions of patients worldwide every year.
If sepsis develops during pregnancy, while or after giving birth, or after an abortion, it is called maternal sepsis. Sepsis in newborn babies is called neonatal sepsis. Despite being highly preventable, maternal and neonatal sepsis continues to be a major cause of death for pregnant women and newborn babies.","Sepsis is a medical emergency and requires immediate attention to prevent further complications or death. It may present different warning signs and symptoms at times, some of which may cause misidentification with other conditions. A septic infection may cause a fever, but may also cause low body temperature, cold extremities and shivering. There may be difficulty breathing or rapid breathing, as well as an increased heart rate, or conversely a weak pulse and low blood pressure. It may cause low urine output, as well as blue-tinted, mottled or abnormally pale skin, and an altered mental state. Finally, it may cause extreme body pain or discomfort, which makes it easy to confuse for influenza or food poisoning.
In children, sepsis may present through very fast breathing, convulsions, pale skin, lethargy or difficulty waking up or feeling abnormally cold to the touch. For children under 5 years, it may cause difficulty feeding, repeated vomiting or a lack of urination.
Suspecting sepsis and acting quickly is crucial for early recognition and diagnosis.","Early identification of symptoms and timely establishment of appropriate clinical management are critical elements to reducing the risk and impact of sepsis. The detection of some biomarkers, such as C reactive protein and procalcitonin, can be effective in diagnosing the condition.
After early recognition, diagnostics to help identify a causal pathogen of infection leading to sepsis are important to guide targeted antimicrobial treatment. The appropriate antimicrobial therapy (for example, antibiotics and antifungals) should be given within one hour of sepsis identification.
Antimicrobial resistance (AMR) can jeopardize clinical management of sepsis because empirical antibiotic treatment is often required. Early fluid resuscitation is important in the initial phase and vasopressors may be required to improve and maintain tissue perfusion.
There are two main steps to preventing sepsis:
Prevention of microbial transmission and infection
Prevention of an infection evolving into sepsis
Within the community, sepsis prevention is assisted through the use of effective hygiene practices, improving sanitation and water quality and availability, providing access to vaccines, particularly for those at high risk, as well as appropriate nutrition, including breastfeeding for newborns.
Prevention in health care facilities relies on infection prevention and control (IPC) programmes, effective hygiene practices, and clean, well-functioning equipment."
Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS),https://www.who.int/health-topics/severe-acute-respiratory-syndrome,"Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) is a viral respiratory disease caused by a SARS-associated coronavirus. It was first identified at the end of February 2003 during an outbreak that emerged in China and spread to 4 other countries. WHO co-ordinated the international investigation with the assistance of
the Global Outbreak Alert and Response Network (GOARN)
and worked closely with health authorities in affected countries to provide epidemiological, clinical and logistical support and to bring the outbreak under control.
SARS is an airborne virus and can spread through small droplets of saliva in a similar way to the cold and influenza. It was the first severe and readily transmissible new disease to emerge in the 21
st
century and showed a clear capacity to spread along the routes of international air travel.
SARS can also be spread indirectly via surfaces that have been touched by someone who is infected with the virus.
Most patients identified with SARS were previously healthy adults aged 25–70 years. A few suspected cases of SARS have been reported among children under 15 years. The case fatality among persons with illness meeting the current WHO case definition for probable and suspected cases of SARS is around 3%.","The
incubation period of SARS is usually 2-7 days but may be as long as 10 days.
The
first symptom of the illness is generally fever (>38°C), which is often
high, and sometimes associated with chills and rigors. It may also be
accompanied by other symptoms including headache, malaise, and muscle pain. At
the onset of illness, some cases have mild respiratory symptoms. Typically,
rash and neurologic or gastrointestinal findings are absent, although a few
patients have reported diarrhoea during the early febrile stage.
After
3-7 days, a lower respiratory phase begins with the onset of a dry,
non-productive cough or dyspnoea (shortness of breath) that may be accompanied
by, or progress to, hypoxemia (low blood oxygen levels). In 10–20% of cases,
the respiratory illness is severe enough to require intubation and mechanical
ventilation. Chest radiographs may be normal throughout the course of illness,
though not for all patients. The white blood cell count is often decreased early
in the disease, and many people have low platelet counts at the peak of the
disease.","There is no cure or vaccine for SARS and treatment should be supportive and based on the patient’s symptoms.
Controlling outbreaks relies on containment measures including:
prompt detection of cases through good surveillance networks and including an early warning system;
isolation of suspected of probably cases;
tracing to identify both the source of the infection and contacts of those who are sick and may be at risk of contracting the virus;
quarantine of suspected contacts for 10 days;
exit screening for outgoing passengers from areas with recent local transmission by asking questions and temperature measurement; and
disinfection of aircraft and cruise vessels having SARS cases on board using WHO guidelines.
Personal preventive measures to prevent spread of the virus include frequent hand washing using soap or alcohol-based disinfectants. For those with a high risk of contracting the disease, such as health care workers, use of personal protective equipment, including a mask, goggles and an apron is mandatory.  Whenever possible, household contacts should also wear a mask."
Sexual and reproductive health and rights,https://www.who.int/health-topics/sexual-and-reproductive-health-and-rights,"The World Health Organization defines sexual health as a state of physical, emotional, mental and social well-being related to sexuality; it is not merely the absence of disease, dysfunction or infirmity. Sexual health requires a positive and respectful approach to sexuality and sexual relationships, as well as the possibility of having pleasurable and safe sexual experiences, free of coercion, discrimination and violence. For sexual health to be attained and maintained, the sexual rights of all individuals must be respected, protected and fulfilled.
Making universal access to sexual and reproductive health and rights a reality can make a difference in the lives of people across the globe. With persistent efforts on all fronts, we can foster societies where all people can express their sexuality safely, positively and with dignity, including the inalienable right for people to decide if, how and when to have children. The health and human rights imperatives are clear: it is time for the global health community to unite around a bold agenda to affirm and secure sexual health as part of sexual and reproductive health and rights for all.","Sexual and reproductive health are integral elements of the right of everyone to the enjoyment of the highest attainable standard of physical and mental health. The United Nation’s Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs) have explicitly recognized sexual and reproductive health and reproductive rights as essential not only to health, but also to gender equality and wider economic and social development. Access to comprehensive sexual and reproductive health services are therefore critical for progressing towards universal health coverage, while also contributing to gender equality and people’s empowerment.
Ensuring access to comprehensive sexual and reproductive health services upholds the dignity, rights and well-being of people worldwide. When people have control over their sexuality and reproduction, they can fully participate in social, economic and political spheres. Sexual and reproductive health also impacts environmental sustainability.
Investing in a package of sexual and reproductive health services (family planning, maternal and newborn care, treatment for curable sexually transmitted infections) that fully meets the needs of women has been shown to provide multiple health, social and economic benefits including significant decreases in unintended pregnancies, unsafe abortions and maternal deaths.","Comprehensive sexual and reproductive health encompass a wide range of health needs. Services should cover access to contraception, fertility and infertility care, maternal and perinatal health, prevention and treatment of sexually transmitted infections (STIs), protection from sexual and gender-based violence, and education on safe and healthy relationships. By addressing these various aspects of health, primary health care systems demonstrate a commitment to holistic care that considers the physical, mental and social well-being of individuals.
Advancing comprehensive sexual and reproductive health coverage requires political commitment and well-defined, coherent strategies for ensuring progress. In moving towards these aims, WHO recommends the following:
Ensure that sexual and reproductive health (SRH) is integrated into national health policies and plans.
Review existing laws and regulations that affect the provision of, and access to, SRH services; when necessary, align these with human rights international laws and commitments.
Include comprehensive SRH services within national health benefit packages, following a life course approach.
Ensure that priority-setting processes for health benefit packages are guided by principles of equity, rights and gender equality.
Promote the active participation and leadership of women and girls at all levels.
Ensure sufficient resources for civil society actors and strengthen accountability.
Invest in and strengthen national governments’ capacity for improved measurement and tracking of resource flows for SRH services.
Strengthen the evidence-base for advocacy and resource mobilization by developing investment cases on the health, social and economic costs and benefits of investing in SRH."
Sexual health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/sexual-health,"Sexual health is fundamental to the overall health and well-being of individuals, couples and families, and to the social and economic development of communities and countries. Sexual health, when viewed affirmatively, requires a positive and respectful
    approach to sexuality and sexual relationships, as well as the possibility of having pleasurable and safe sexual experiences, free of coercion, discrimination and violence. The ability of men and women to achieve sexual health and well-being depends
    on their:
access to comprehensive, good-quality information about sex and sexuality;
knowledge about the risks they may face and their vulnerability to adverse consequences of unprotected sexual activity;
ability to access sexual health care;
living in an environment that affirms and promotes sexual health.
Sexual health-related issues are wide-ranging, and encompass sexual orientation and gender identity, sexual expression, relationships, and pleasure. They also include negative consequences or conditions such as:
infections with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), sexually transmitted infections (STIs) and reproductive tract infections (RTIs) and their adverse outcomes (such as cancer and infertility);
unintended pregnancy and abortion;
sexual dysfunction;
sexual violence; and
harmful practices (such as female genital mutilation, FGM).","WHO has been working in the area of sexual health since at least 1974, when the deliberations of an expert committee resulted in the publication of a technical report entitled “Education and treatment in human sexuality” (WHO, 1975).
Starting
in 2000, the Pan American Health Organization (PAHO) and WHO convened a number of expert consultations to review terminology and identify programme options. The culmination of these meetings was a Technical Consultation in 2002,  where the working
definitions of the key sexual health-related terms below were developed.
Sex
Sex refers to the biological characteristics that define humans as female or male. While these sets of biological characteristics are not mutually exclusive, as there are individuals who possess both, they tend to differentiate humans as males
                and females.
In general use in many languages, the term sex is often used to mean “sexual activity”, but for technical purposes in the context of sexuality and sexual health discussions, the above definition is preferred.
Show less
Show more
Sexual health
According to the current working definition, sexual health is:
“…a state of physical, emotional, mental and social well-being in relation to sexuality; it is not merely the absence of disease, dysfunction or infirmity. Sexual health requires a positive and respectful approach to sexuality
                and sexual relationships, as well as the possibility of having pleasurable and safe sexual experiences, free of coercion, discrimination and violence. For sexual health to be attained and maintained, the sexual rights of all persons must
                be respected, protected and fulfilled.”
(WHO, 2006a)
Show less
Show more
Sexuality
Sexual health cannot be defined, understood or made operational without a broad consideration of sexuality, which underlies important behaviours and outcomes related to sexual health. The working definition of sexuality is:
“…a central aspect of being human throughout life encompasses sex, gender identities and roles, sexual orientation, eroticism, pleasure, intimacy and reproduction. Sexuality is experienced and expressed in thoughts, fantasies,
                desires, beliefs, attitudes, values, behaviours, practices, roles and relationships. While sexuality can include all of these dimensions, not all of them are always experienced or expressed. Sexuality is influenced by the interaction of
                biological, psychological, social, economic, political, cultural, legal, historical, religious and spiritual factors.”
(WHO, 2006a)
Show less
Show more
Sexual rights
There is a growing consensus that sexual health cannot be achieved and maintained without respect for, and protection of, certain human rights. The working definition of sexual rights given below is a contribution to the continuing dialogue
                on human rights related to sexual health.The application of existing human rights to sexuality and sexual health constitute sexual rights. Sexual rights protect all people's rights to fulfil and express their sexuality and enjoy sexual
                health, with due regard for the rights of others and within a framework of protection against discrimination."" (WHO, 2006a, updated 2010)
“The fulfilment of sexual health is tied to the extent to which human rights are respected, protected and fulfilled. Sexual rights embrace certain human rights that are already recognized in international and regional human rights documents
                and other consensus documents and in national laws.
Rights critical to the realization of sexual health include:
Rights critical to the realization of sexual health include:
the rights to equality and non-discrimination
the right to be free from torture or to cruel, inhumane or degrading treatment or punishment
the right to privacy
the rights to the highest attainable standard of health (including sexual health) and social security
the right to marry and to found a family and enter into marriage with the free and full consent of the intending spouses, and to equality in and at the dissolution of marriage
the right to decide the number and spacing of one's children
the rights to information, as well as education
the rights to freedom of opinion and expression, and
the right to an effective remedy for violations of fundamental rights.
The responsible exercise of human rights requires that all persons respect the rights of others.
Show less
Show more","“Human rights provide an international legal framework within which the sexual and reproductive health needs and aspirations of all people can be considered.”
(GRUSKIN, 2005)
In recent years, international human rights instruments have been increasingly used to support and advance legal claims by individuals and whole communities so that national governments will guarantee the respect, protection and fulfilment of their sexual and reproductive health rights (Cook et al., 2003). The working definitions and framework for programming presented here are grounded in internationally recognized human rights and offer a rights-based approach to programming in sexual health. The key conceptual elements of sexual health are listed below.
Key conceptual elements of sexual health
When viewed holistically and positively:
Sexual health is about well-being, not merely the absence of disease.
Sexual health involves respect, safety and freedom from discrimination and violence.
Sexual health depends on the fulfilment of certain human rights.
Sexual health is relevant throughout the individual’s lifespan, not only to those in the reproductive years, but also to both the young and the elderly.
Sexual health is expressed through diverse sexualities and forms of sexual expression.
Sexual health is critically influenced by gender norms, roles, expectations and power dynamics.
Sexual health needs to be understood within specific social, economic and political contexts."
Sexually transmitted infections (STIs),https://www.who.int/health-topics/sexually-transmitted-infections,"Sexually transmitted infections (STIs) are spread predominantly by unprotected sexual contact. Some STIs can also be transmitted during pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding and through infected blood or blood products.
STIs have a profound impact on health. If untreated, they can lead to serious consequences including neurological and cardiovascular disease, infertility, ectopic pregnancy, stillbirths, and increased risk of Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV). They are
    also associated with stigma, domestic violence, and affects quality of life.
The majority of STIs have no symptoms. When they are present common symptoms of STIs are vaginal or urethral discharge, genital ulcer and lower abdominal pain.
The most common and curable STIs are trichomonas, chlamydia, gonorrhoea and syphilis. Rapidly increasing antimicrobial resistance is a growing threat for untreatable gonorrhoea.
Viral STIs including HIV, genital herpes simplex virus (HSV), viral hepatitis B, human papillomavirus (HPV) and human T-lymphotropic virus type 1 (HTLV-1) lack or have limited treatment options. Vaccines are available for hepatitis B to prevent
    infection that can lead to liver cancer and for HPV to prevent cervical cancer. HIV, HSV and HTLV-1 are lifelong infections: for HIV and HSV there are treatments that can suppress the virus, but currently there are no cures for any of these viral STIs.
Condoms used correctly and consistently are effective methods to protect against STIs and HIV. Screening with early diagnosis of people with STIs and their sexual partners offers the best opportunity for effective treatment and for preventing complications
    and further transmission.","A person can have an STI without having obvious symptoms of disease. When present, common symptoms of STIs include: abnormal vaginal discharge, urethral discharge, genital ulcers and lumps, and lower abdominal pain.
Symptoms of specific STIs are:
Gonorrhoea and chlamydial infection
These STIs cause cervicitis in women, urethritis in men and extra-genital infections, including rectal and oropharyngeal manifestations. Common symptoms include vaginal or penile discharge and burning with urination. Infants of infected mothers can
    contract neonatal conjunctivitis (red eyes) due to exposure to the STIs during vaginal delivery. Rectal and pharyngeal infections can be asymptomatic.
Syphilis
Syphilis is often asymptomatic, when symptoms occur, primary syphilis presents as a solitary, painless ulcer. Secondary syphilis may manifest as generalized lesions affecting skin, mucous membranes and lymph-node including a classic rash on the palms of the hands and soles of the feet. Latent syphilis is asymptomatic and characterized by positive syphilis serology.
Trichomoniasis
The predominant symptoms include abnormal vaginal discharge with redness of the vulva, itching and painful intercourse.
Genital herpes simplex virus (HSV)
HSV most commonly presents as painful sores, vesicles or ulcerations on the external genitalia and mouth. Symptomatic genital HSV is a lifelong condition
 that can be characterized by frequent symptomatic recurrences.
Human T-lymphotropic virus type 1 (HTLV-1)
Generally asymptomatic, the chronic form of HTLV-1 can cause severe disease, including adult T-cell leukaemia/lymphoma (ATL) and a progressive nervous system condition known as HTLV-1-associated myelopathy or tropical spastic paraparesis (HAM/TSP).","Effective treatment is currently available for several STIs.
Three bacterial STIs (chlamydia, gonorrhoea and syphilis) and one parasitic STI (trichomoniasis) are usually curable with existing, effective single-dose or multiple-dose regimens of antibiotics.
For viral STIs (HIV, HSV and HTLV-1), the most effective medications available are antivirals or anti-cancer drugs (in the case of HTLV-1), that can modulate the course of the diseases, though they cannot cure these three diseases.
Antimicrobial resistance
(AMR) to antibiotics used to treat STIs, in particular gonorrhoea, has increased rapidly in recent years and has reduced successful treatment outcomes. Results from the current Gonococcal AMR Surveillance Programme (GASP) show trends of high rates of quinolone resistance, increasing azithromycin resistance and emerging resistance of extended-spectrum cephalosporins.
The emergence of decreased susceptibility of gonorrhoea to extended-spectrum cephalosporins, together with established high-levels of resistance to penicillins, sulphonamides, tetracyclines, quinolones and macrolides make gonorrhoea a multidrug-resistant organism. AMR for other STIs, though less common, also exists, making prevention and prompt treatment critical.
To adequately treat STIs it is important to take the appropriate antimicrobials, with the correct dose   and duration for the specific STI to ensure adequate treatment or cure, and to prevent the development of antimicrobial resistance."
Smallpox,https://www.who.int/health-topics/smallpox,"Smallpox is an acute contagious disease caused by the variola virus, a member of the orthopoxvirus family. It was one of the most devastating diseases known to humanity and caused millions of deaths before it was eradicated. It is believed to have existed
    for at least 3000 years.
The smallpox vaccine, created by Edward Jenner in 1796, was the first successful vaccine to be developed. He observed that milkmaids who previously had caught cowpox did not catch smallpox and showed that a similar inoculation could be used to prevent
    smallpox in other people.
The World Health Organization launched an intensified plan to eradicate smallpox in 1967. Widespread immunization and surveillance were conducted around the world for several years. The last known natural case was in Somalia in 1977. In 1980 WHO declared
    smallpox eradicated – the only infectious disease to achieve this distinction. This remains among the most notable and profound public health successes in history.","Early symptoms of smallpox include high fever, fatigue and severe back pain, and less often, abdominal pain and vomiting. Two to 3 days later the virus produces a characteristic rash with bumps full of a clear liquid, which later fill with pus and finally
    develop a crust that dries and falls off. The rash begins on the face and hands, then spreads to the rest of the body. Lesions develop in the mucous membranes of the nose and mouth and ulcerate soon after formation.
Smallpox is transmitted from person to person via infective droplets during close contact with infected people who have symptoms of the disease, or in some cases through contaminated clothing and bedding. It has an incubation period of 7–17 days
    after exposure and only becomes infectious once a fever develops. People remain infectious until the last scabs fall off.
Smallpox was fatal in up to 30% of cases.
WHO smallpox recognition card","The period since eradication has been defined by a lengthy and complex debate focussed on the destruction of the last remaining stocks of live variola virus. In 1996, at the 49th World Health Assembly, Member States decided to have this stock destroyed
    in June 1999, and only to allow small samples to be kept for research purposes at two designated secure laboratories – one in the United States and one in the Russian Federation. Temporary retention of the existing stocks of variola virus are
    used for further essential research, which is overseen by the Advisory Committee for Variola Virus Research. This group meets on an annual basis.
The WHO Smallpox Secretariat
based in WHO Headquarters coordinates all smallpox eradication-related and post-eradication activities. These include overseeing permitted
research with live variola virus for the development of countermeasures such as vaccine and antivirals. Since the eradication era, safer vaccines and specific treatments have been developed for smallpox and related diseases such as
monkeypox
. The Secretariat is also responsible for emergency preparedness and manages a
smallpox vaccine
emergency stockpile in the unlikely event that the disease re-emerges. The Secretariat manages the
biosafety and biosecurity inspections
of the authorized variola virus repositories as mandated by the World Health Assembly, and ensures
annual reporting
to WHO Governing Bodies. The Smallpox Secretariat supports WHO Archives in preserving the global history of smallpox and documenting the lessons learned from successful eradication of smallpox.
The
WHO Smallpox
Secretariat's
current roles and responsibilities include:
Variola virus research and development of countermeasures
organizing annual meetings of the
WHO Advisory Committee on Variola Virus Research (ACVVR)
coordinating review of
research
proposals
 for work with variola virus through the ACVVR
managing relationships with the two variola virus repositories (which are also WHO Collaborating Centres)
recording, processing and monitoring requests from researchers for variola virus DNA from the 2 repositories under specific rules
conducting biennial
biosafety and biosecurity inspections
of the 2 global variola virus repositories
developing normative guidance regarding
research on variola virus DNA
and related matters
Emergency preparedness and response
coordinating and preparing normative guidance on development and use of medical countermeasures for orthopoxviruses
developing preparedness and response strategies, and tools to implement preparedness measures
maintaining and managing the
smallpox global vaccine stockpile
coordinating development of a laboratory network for orthopoxvirus detection and diagnostics
developing normative guidance and response strategies for human
monkeypox
and other orthopoxviruses
supporting capacity-building and developing training materials
contributing to global health security initiatives
Preserving global smallpox history
overseeing the
Smallpox Eradication Programme archives
in collaboration with
WHO Archives
and the
WHO Library
leading on policy discussions and
commemorative events
regarding smallpox eradication
reporting annually to the
WHO Executive Board
and the
World Health Assembly
The Secretariat also
mobilizes and manages funding
for these activities and for ad hoc events as required such as technical consultations and training.
Show less
Show more"
Snakebite envenoming,https://www.who.int/health-topics/snakebite,"Snakebite envenoming is a potentially life-threatening disease caused by toxins in the bite of a venomous snake. Envenoming can also be caused by having venom sprayed into the eyes by certain species of snakes that have the ability to spit venom as a defence measure.
Inadequate past efforts to control snakebite envenoming has produced fragmented, inaccurate epidemiological data. Many victims do not attend health centres or hospitals and instead rely on traditional treatments. However, available data show 4.5–5.4 million people get bitten by snakes annually. Of this, 1.8–2.7 million develop clinical illness and 81 000 to 138 000 die from complications.
High-risk groups include rural agricultural workers, herders, fishermen, hunters, working children, people living in poorly constructed houses and those with limited access to education and healthcare. Morbidity and mortality occur most frequently among young people and children suffer higher case fatality. Furthermore, women experience increased barriers to accessing medical care in some cultures and pregnant women are extremely vulnerable.
An ongoing crisis restricting access to safe, effective antivenom treatment in many regions, and particularly sub-Saharan Africa, is one factor that contributes to the predisposition for seeking help through traditional medicine.","Bites or sprayed venom from venomous snakes can cause a range of acute and serious medical emergencies. Envenoming from different types of snakes can cause different symptoms, some more serious than others. This makes the preparation of correct antivenoms an ongoing problem. Envenoming can cause severe paralysis that may prevent breathing, making immediate medical attention critical. People may also experience bleeding disorders that can lead to fatal haemorrhages or irreversible kidney failure. Severe local tissue destruction may also occur, which can lead to permanent disability and even limb amputation. Children are at higher risk of severe effects due to lower body mass than adults.
Most deaths and serious consequences from snake bites are entirely preventable by making safe and effective antivenoms more widely available and accessible, particularly in high-risk areas. High quality snake antivenoms are the only effective treatment to prevent or reverse most of the venomous effects of snake bites.","Snake antivenoms are effective treatments to prevent or reverse most of the harmful effects of snakebite envenoming and are included in the WHO list of essential medicines. The availability and accessibility of these antivenoms, along with raising awareness on primary prevention methods among communities and health workers, are the best ways to limit serious consequences and deaths from snakebite envenoming.
After a bite by a snake suspected of being venomous, follow these steps:
Immediately move away from the area where the bite occurred.
Remove anything tight from around the bitten part of the body to avoid harm if swelling occurs.
Reassure the victim, as most venomous snake bites do not cause immediate death.
Immobilize the person completely and transport the person to a health facility as soon as possible
Applying pressure at the bite site with a pressure pad may be suitable in some cases.
Avoid traditional first aid methods or herbal medicines.
Paracetamol may be given for local pain (which can be severe).
Vomiting may occur, so place the person on their left side in the recovery position.
Closely monitor airway and breathing and be ready to resuscitate if necessary"
Social determinants of health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/social-determinants-of-health,"The social determinants of health (SDH) are the non-medical factors that influence health outcomes. They are the conditions in which people are born, grow, work, live, and age, and the wider set of forces and systems shaping the conditions of daily life. These forces and systems include economic policies and systems, development agendas, social norms, social policies and political systems.
The SDH have an important influence on health inequities - the unfair and avoidable differences in health status seen within and between countries. In countries at all levels of income, health and illness follow a social gradient: the lower the socioeconomic position, the worse the health.
The following list provides examples of the social determinants of health, which can influence health equity in positive and negative ways:
Income and social protection
Education
Unemployment and job insecurity
Working life conditions
Food insecurity
Housing, basic amenities and the environment
Early childhood development
Social inclusion and non-discrimination
Structural conflict
Access to affordable health services of decent quality.
Research shows that the social determinants can be more important than health care or lifestyle choices in influencing health. For example, numerous studies suggest that SDH account for between 30-55% of health outcomes. In addition, estimates show that the contribution of sectors outside health to population health outcomes exceeds the contribution from the health sector.
Addressing SDH appropriately is fundamental for improving health and reducing longstanding inequities in health, which requires action by all sectors and civil society.","There are challenges to overcome in implementing action to address health inequities through the social determinants of health. The social determinants of health equity is a complex and multifaceted field. It involves a wide range of stakeholders within and beyond the health sector and all levels of government. In addition, social determinants of health data can be difficult to collect and share.
While the evidence base on the social determinants of health has strengthened during the past decade, the evidence base on what works needs to be strengthened and good practices disseminated effectively.
Three areas for critical action identified in the report of the
Global Commission on Social Determinants of Health
reflect their importance in tackling inequities in health. These include:
Improve daily living conditions:
The circumstances in which people are born, grow, live, work and age;
Tackle the inequitable distribution of power, money and resources:
The structural drivers of those conditions of daily life (for example, macroeconomic and urbanization policies and governance);
Measure and understand the problem and assess the impact of action:
Expand the knowledge base, develop a workforce that is trained in the social determinants of health, and raise public awareness about the social determinants of health.
Scaled up and systematic action is required that is universal but proportionate to the disadvantage across the social gradient. This is necessary for effective delivery to addressing inequities in health and promoting healthier populations.","Life expectancy and healthy life expectancy have increased, but unequally. There remain persistent and widening gaps between those with the best and worst health and well-being.
Poorer populations systematically experience worse health than richer populations. For example:
There is a difference of 18 years of life expectancy between high- and low- income countries;
In 2016, the majority of the 15 million premature deaths due to non-communicable diseases (NCDs) occurred in low- and middle-income countries;
Relative gaps within countries between poorer and richer subgroups for diseases like cancer have increased in all regions across the world;
The under-5 mortality rate is more than eight times higher in Africa than the European region. Within countries, improvements in child health between poorest and richest subgroups have been impaired by slower improvements for poorer subgroups.
Such trends within and between countries are unfair, unjust and avoidable. Many of these health differences are caused by the decision-making processes, policies, social norms and structures which exist at all levels in society.
Inequities in health are socially determined, preventing poorer populations from moving up in society and making the most of their potential.
Pursuing health equity means striving for the highest possible standard of health for all people and giving special attention to the needs of those at greatest risk of poor health, based on social conditions.
Action requires not only equitable access to healthcare but also means working outside the healthcare system to address broader social well-being and development.
“Health equity is defined as the absence of unfair and avoidable or remediable differences in health among population groups defined socially, economically, demographically or geographically”."
Soil-transmitted helminthiases,https://www.who.int/health-topics/soil-transmitted-helminthiases,"Soil-transmitted helminth (STH) infections are among the most common 
infections worldwide and affect the poorest and most deprived 
communities. They are transmitted by eggs present in human faeces which 
in turn contaminate soil in areas where sanitation is poor.
The main species that infect people are the roundworm (
Ascaris lumbricoides
), the whipworm (
Trichuris trichiura
) and the hookworms (
Necator americanus
and
Ancylostoma duodenale
).
Intestinal worms produce a wide range of symptoms including 
intestinal manifestations (diarrhoea, abdominal pain), general malaise 
and weakness. Hookworms cause chronic intestinal blood loss that result 
in anaemia.
Soil-transmitted helminths are transmitted by eggs that are passed in
 the faeces of infected people. Adult worms live in the intestine where 
they produce thousands of eggs each day. In areas that lack adequate 
sanitation, these eggs contaminate the
        soil. This can happen in several ways:
eggs that are attached to vegetables are ingested when the vegetables are not carefully cooked, washed or peeled;
eggs are ingested from contaminated water sources;
eggs are ingested by children who play in the contaminated soil and then put their hands in their mouths without washing them.","Morbidity is related to the number of worms harboured. People with 
infections of light intensity (few worms) usually do not suffer from the
 infection. Heavier infections can cause a range of symptoms including 
intestinal manifestations (diarrhoea
        and abdominal pain), malnutrition, general malaise and weakness,
 and impaired growth and physical development.
Infections of very high intensity can cause intestinal obstruction that should be treated surgically.
S. stercoralis
may cause dermatological and gastro-intestinal morbidity and is also 
known to be associated with chronic malnutrition in children. In case of
 reduced host immunity, the parasite can cause the 
hyperinfection/dissemination syndrome
        that is invariably fatal if not promptly and properly cured and 
is often fatal despite the treatment.
In 2001, delegates at the World Health Assembly unanimously endorsed a
 resolution (WHA54.19) urging endemic countries to start seriously 
tackling worms, specifically schistosomiasis and soil-transmitted 
helminths.
The strategy for control of soil-transmitted helminth 
infections is to control morbidity through the periodic treatment of 
at-risk people living in endemic areas. People at risk are:
preschool children
school-age children
women of reproductive age (including pregnant women in the second and third trimesters and breastfeeding women)
adults in certain high-risk occupations such as tea-pickers or miners.","The WHO recommended medicines –albendazole (400 mg) and mebendazole 
(500 mg) – are effective, inexpensive and easy to administer by 
non-medical personnel (e.g. teachers). They have been through extensive 
safety testing and have
        been used in millions of people with few and minor side-effects.
Both
 albendazole and mebendazole are donated to national ministries of 
health through WHO in all endemic countries for the treatment of all 
children of school age.
WHO has prequalified two formulations of generic ivermectin, which are available at affordable price in the
WHO catalogue
. Member States who are in need can make order through WHO."
Stillbirth,https://www.who.int/health-topics/stillbirth,"A baby who dies after 28 weeks of pregnancy, but before or during birth, is classified as a stillbirth.
There are nearly 2 million stillbirths every year – one every 16 seconds. Over 40% of all stillbirths occur during labour – a loss that could be avoided with improved quality and respectful care during childbirth including routine monitoring and timely access to emergency obstetric care when required.
Experiencing a stillbirth during pregnancy or childbirth is a tragedy insufficiently addressed in global agendas, policies and funded programmes. There are psychological costs, especially to women and their families, such as maternal depression, financial consequences and economic repercussions, as well as stigma and taboo.
In 2014, the World Health Assembly endorsed the Every Newborn Action Plan (ENAP), which includes a global target of 12 or fewer third trimester (late) stillbirths per 1,000 total births in every country by 2030. In 2021, 139 mainly high-income and upper middle-income countries had met this target, but 56 countries will not each the ENAP target by 2030 if further efforts are not made. If current trends continue, 15.9 million babies will be stillborn; nearly half of these (7.7 million, 48%) will occur in sub-Saharan Africa.","With quality health care throughout pregnancy and childbirth, most stillbirths are preventable.
The major causes of stillbirth include pregnancy and childbirth-related complications, prolonged pregnancy, maternal infections such as malaria, syphilis and HIV, maternal conditions especially hypertension, and diabetes, and fetal growth restriction (when an unborn baby is unable to achieve its growth potential and therefore smaller than it should be). Congenital abnormalities are responsible for less than 10% of stillbirths reported nationally in high-income countries and the exact proportion in low-income settings is unknown due to limitations in diagnostics. Factors related to age of the mother and practicing smoking can also increase the risk of maternal disease and stillbirth.
Stillbirths can be prevented through family planning to avoid unwanted pregnancies, good health and nutrition prior to and during pregnancy, quality and respectful antenatal and childbirth care including adequate skilled health personnel including midwives.
Syphilis treatment in pregnancy could also prevent an estimated 200 000 stillbirths, while fetal heart rate monitoring and labour surveillance and prompt interventions when needed are crucial for preventing 832 000 intrapartum stillbirths and reducing neonatal deaths.
Stillbirths are strongly linked to adverse social and economic determinants of health. Prevention and responsive care need to be integrated across the continuum of maternal health care, and beyond. This includes respectful and supportive care in the event of a death.
Listening to the experiences and voices of women and their communities is essential to help address issues of stigma associated with stillbirth.","More needs to be done to integrate stillbirth prevention within global and national agendas for high quality health care for women, adolescents, and babies.
Through the Global Strategy for Women's, Children's and Adolescents Health 2016–2030 and implementing the recommendations of the
Every Newborn Action Plan
(2014), WHO is working to end preventable stillbirths, as part of efforts to improve maternal, newborn, child and adolescent health.
Most stillbirths do not receive a birth certificate and are not registered. Improving systems for reporting births and neonatal deaths is a matter of human rights and a prerequisite for reducing stillbirths. In addition, there is a need to strengthen routine health information systems to accurately capture and report stillbirths for monitoring and improving the quality of care.
WHO provides tools to help countries improve their data on both stillbirths and neonatal deaths. WHO also has guidance to help countries review and investigate individual deaths so they can recommend and implement solutions to prevent similar ones in the future and a standard classification system for perinatal deaths (ICD-PM).
WHO and UNICEF are supporting a call for collective action to end preventable stillbirths by:
increasing awareness and reducing stigma
supporting bereaved women and families
strengthening health systems to provide high-quality care
nationalizing and localizing stillbirth targets
improving measurement of stillbirths to enhance evidence and knowledge."
Substandard and falsified medical products,https://www.who.int/health-topics/substandard-and-falsified-medical-products,"Up to two billion people around the world lack access to necessary medicines, vaccines, medical devices including in vitro diagnostics,  and other health products, which creates a vacuum that is too often filled by substandard and falsified products. This problem is growing as global supply chains become more complex, meaning products manufactured in one country may be packaged in a second country and distributed across borders to be marketed or sold to consumers in a third. The growth of e-commerce also contributes to this trend by making it easier to purchase medicines online, often from unauthorized sources.
WHO has identified this issue one of the urgent health challenges for the next decade given that more than one in ten medicines in low- and middle-income countries are estimated to be substandard or falsified. No country remains untouched from this issue, and WHO has received reports of substandard or falsified medical medicines, vaccines and in vitro diagnostics from all regions of the world. Both generic and innovator medicines can be falsified, ranging from very expensive products for cancer to very inexpensive products for treatment of pain.
WHO Member States have agreed on a comprehensive global strategy focused on prevention, detection and response to move towards achieving increased access to quality, safe, effective and quality medical products.","Substandard and falsified medical products create many problems for both the individual taking the medicine and for families, the larger society, health care system and supply chain. When medicines do not work the way they should, they can fail to treat
    or prevent disease, contribute to antimicrobial resistance, waste precious resources and lead to a loss of confidence in medicines and distrust of healthcare providers. This can have a negative socioeconomic impact, contributing to related loss in
    productivity and adding expenses to the individual and national health system.
They are most likely to reach patients in situations where there is constrained access to quality and safe medical products, poor governance and weak technical capacity. Although this issue impacts all countries, countries where there are weak or non-existent
    regulatory systems bear the greatest burden of substandard and falsified medical products.
In an increasingly globalized world, no one country has sufficient resources and capacity to deal with this issue in isolation. Through global systems and processes such as the WHO Global Surveillance and Monitoring System and WHO Member State Mechanism,
    Member States are working together to prevent, detect and respond to substandard and falsified medical products.",N/A
Suicide prevention,https://www.who.int/health-topics/suicide,"More than 720 000 people die by suicide every year. For each suicide, there are an estimated 20 suicide attempts.
Suicide can occur at any stage of life and in all regions of the world. In 2021, suicide was the third leading cause of death among 15–29-year-olds globally, and 73% of all suicides happened in low- and middle-income countries. Almost 20% of global suicides were due to pesticide self-poisoning.
While the link between suicide and mental health conditions (in particular, depression and alcohol use disorders) and a previous suicide attempt is well established in high-income countries, many suicides happen impulsively in moments of crisis. Further risk factors for suicide include experience of loss, loneliness, discrimination, relationship dispute, financial problems, chronic pain and illness, violence, abuse, and conflict or other humanitarian emergencies.
Stigma around mental health conditions and suicide means many people thinking about suicide do not seek help. Suicides and suicide attempts have a ripple effect that impacts on families, friends, colleagues, communities and societies.
Suicide: facts and figures globally
Suicide worldwide in 2019
LIVE LIFE: an implementation guide for suicide prevention in countries","Much can be done at individual, community and national levels to prevent suicide and suicide attempts.
WHO’s LIVE LIFE
approach recommends four effective, evidence-based key interventions which should be included in every national response to suicide:
limit access to the means of suicide
interact with the media for responsible reporting of suicide
foster socio-emotional life skills in adolescents
early identify, assess, manage and follow up anyone who is affected by suicidal behaviours.
The foundational pillars of the interventions are situation analysis, multisectoral collaboration, awareness raising, capacity building, financing, surveillance, monitoring and evaluation.
Suicide prevention efforts require coordination and collaboration among multiple sectors, including health, education, labour, agriculture, business, justice, law, defence, politics and the media. Suicide prevention is often not adequately addressed because of stigma and lack of awareness that suicide is a major public health problem.
Communities also play a crucial role in preventing suicide.
The WHO community engagement toolkit
guides communities in identifying priorities and implementing activities according to local contexts.","The urgency to act to prevent suicides has been recognized and prioritized at the highest levels.
The reduction of suicide rates in countries is an indicator in the UN Sustainable Development Goals (the only indicator for mental health), WHO’s General Programme of Work and WHO’s Comprehensive Mental Health Action Plan 2013–2030.
The first WHO world suicide report,
Preventing suicide: a global imperative
, published in 2014, aimed to increase awareness of the public health significance of suicide and suicide attempts and make suicide prevention a public health priority.
Governments are encouraged to join WHO’s
LIVE LIFE initiative
, implement WHO’s
LIVE LIFE
package of effective and evidence-based key interventions for suicide prevention, and develop or strengthen comprehensive national suicide prevention strategies in a multisectoral public health approach. National leadership and coordination on suicide prevention are further supported by the publication of
National suicide prevention strategies: progress, examples and indicators
.
Recognizing that data and statistics are necessary for advocacy and decision-making, WHO published
Suicide worldwide in 2019: Global Health Estimates
.
WHO’s vision is a world where death by suicide is no longer a leading cause of death and where people who are attempting or thinking about suicide feel comfortable seeking help which is provided capably and respectfully to all."
Sustainable development,https://www.who.int/health-topics/sustainable-development,"Sustainable development is a broad term to describe policies, projects and investments that provide benefits today without sacrificing environmental, social and personal health in the future. These policies are often described as green because they focus on limiting the impact of development on the environment. However, the benefits of sustainable development are also felt across a wide cross section of human health and well-being, including reductions in pollution- and environment-related disease, improved health outcomes and decreased stress.
As the threats of climate change become increasingly important, win-win strategies for mitigation, health improvement and cost savings offer a range of advantages for various stakeholders. For example, greener health care operations can generate patient and worker health benefits while also saving energy, mitigating climate risks and creating long-term cost savings. The World Health Organization is committed to pursuing sustainable development in all its work to help protect the people of tomorrow from the health growing health risks of today.","Many sustainable development strategies can offer significant wins for health, climate and the environment, and the benefits can be seen almost immediately. For example, many health and development goals can be achieved simultaneously by tackling air pollution, which is responsible for an estimated 7 million premature deaths annually. Polluting emissions include powerful short-lived climate pollutants (SLCPs)—particularly black carbon, ozone and methane—which are very harmful to health but have only brief atmospheric lifetimes.
Transport policies and investments that favour clean public transport, along with walking and cycling, can have a dramatic impact on air quality. This can reduce multiple health risks at the same time, including stroke, heart attack, lung disease and some cancers. They can also reduce the estimated 1.25 million deaths annually from traffic injury, while also improving access to health services, particularly in densely populated areas.
Sustainable development housing policies can further reduce emissions through considerations such as building siting and land use, choices of construction materials, design features and ventilation and energy.","WHO’s work is guided by the
Sustainable Development Goals
, particularly Goal 3: “Ensure healthy lives and promote well-being for all at all ages.” The Goals inform projects and policies across
    the Organization, including guidelines on housing, urban development, transportation systems and health care delivery.
For example, the WHO Housing and health guidelines, first published in 2018, highlight the increasing impact of housing conditions on human health in light of urban growth, climate and demographic changes. The guidelines provide Member States, partners
    and the public with evidence-based recommendations relevant to inadequate living space (crowding), low and high indoor temperatures, injury hazards in the home, and accessibility of housing for people with functional impairments.
The
Urban Health Initiative (UHI)
also focuses on ways for cities to enable good health by catalysing effective action on urban air pollution and short-lived climate pollutants (SLCPs)—saving lives by linking health, environment and sustainable
    development. WHO also collaborates with the Climate and Clean Air Coalition (CCAC) on the Breathe Life campaign, which aims to cut air pollution and reduce the 7 million premature deaths annually that it causes."
Syphilis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/syphilis,"Syphilis is a bacterial sexually transmitted infection (STI) caused by
Treponema pallidum
which results in substantial morbidity and mortality, and it is curable. Syphilis is transmitted through sexual contact with the infectious lesions, via blood transfusion or from a pregnant woman to her fetus.
Mother-to-child transmission of syphilis
is usually devastating to the fetus in cases that were not detected or
treated sufficiently early in pregnancy
. Maternal syphilis, when untreated, treated late or not treated with penicillin, results in adverse birth outcomes (ABOs) estimated in 50−80% of cases, depending on the stage of syphilis. These ABOs are often severe and include stillbirth (most commonly), neonatal death, prematurity, low birth weight, and congenitally infected infants.
Syphilis can be prevented through safer sex practices including the correct and consistent use of condoms. Many people with syphilis do not have any symptoms or have only minor symptoms that go unnoticed. Identifying infection through laboratory tests and treatment of positive cases will prevent further transmission and adverse pregnancy outcomes including congenital syphilis. Screening can be done using rapid tests that can provide results in less than 20 minutes, allowing for immediate treatment.
When untreated, syphilis lasts many years and goes through different stages. Treatment for syphilis is done with injectable penicillin benzathine, with 1 to 3 doses depending on the stage of the disease. Only penicillin can prevent congenital syphilis. Treatment with penicillin has been hampered by periodic and prolonged
shortages of benzathine penicillin
in numerous countries, including high-, low- and middle-income countries.","Many people with syphilis do not present symptoms or do not perceive them. Untreated, syphilis lasts many years and is characterized into different stages. Sexual transmission typically occurs during early stages, i.e., up to 2 years after infection.
During the initial phase (primary syphilis), which lasts on average 21 days, a solitary, painless, usually hard and round sore (chancre) appears at the site of inoculation (contact), often in the vagina, penis or anus (but it may also be extra-genital) and may go unnoticed. The chancre heals with or without treatment within 3 to 10 weeks. If untreated, the disease progresses to the secondary stage.
Secondary syphilis is characterized by a rash that can vary widely and mimic other infectious or non-infectious conditions, but characteristically affects the palms and soles. The rash is non-itchy and can be minimal enough to be overlooked. In warm and moist areas of the body, such as the anus and labia, large white or grey raised lesions may develop at the location of the primary chancre (condyloma lata). The symptoms and signs of secondary syphilis spontaneously resolve, even without treatment. Without treatment, the latent stage starts.
Latent syphilis presents no clinical symptoms or signs and the treatment is different from the early phase. After years or decades without treatment, neurological and cardiovascular diseases among others may occur.","Syphilis diagnosis is based on the person’s history, physical examination, laboratory testing and sometimes radiology, as symptoms are not common or noticeable. Identifying asymptomatic infection through laboratory tests and treatment of positive cases will prevent further transmission and adverse pregnancy outcomes, including congenital syphilis. Laboratory tests for syphilis include direct detection of
T. pallidum
or indirect methods such as serology. Rapid screening and diagnostic tests are also available and can provide results in less than 20 minutes, facilitating immediate treatment initiation.
WHO recommends syphilis to be treated with injectable penicillin (benzathine penicillin G) with 1 or 3 doses, depending on the stage of the disease. WHO has detailed
treatment guidelines for syphilis
, and one specifically for the
screening and treatment of syphilis in pregnancy
.
Congenital syphilis
There are currently no diagnostic tests for
congenital syphilis
. All live or stillborn infants of women with syphilis should be examined for evidence of congenital syphilis. Live-born infants should be examined and tested at birth to define treatment requirement. When indicated, also at monthly intervals for 3 months until the infant’s serology are, and remain, negative, as maternal antibodies can be passively transmitted to the baby during pregnancy."
Taeniasis and cysticercosis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/taeniasis-and-cysticercosis,"Infection with the tapeworm
Taenia solium
can result in two distinct conditions:
taeniasis
and
cysticercosis
. Taeniasis is the intestinal infection with the tapeworm and it occurs when a person eats raw or undercooked, infected pork. Taeniasis has no major impact on human health. However, tapeworm eggs pass in the faeces of the tapeworm carrier and in the absence of a proper sanitation may contaminate the environment. While tapeworm eggs are infective for pigs,
T. solium
eggs may also infect humans if they are ingested by a person (via the fecal-oral route, or by ingesting contaminated food or water). Ingestion of tapeworm eggs causes infection with the larval parasite in the tissues such as
muscles, skin, eyes and the central nervous system (human cysticercosis), with possible devastating effects on health.
When cysts develop in the brain, the condition is referred to as
neurocysticercosis
.","Taeniasis
is usually characterized by mild and non-specific symptoms associated to an intestinal infection (abdominal pain, nausea, diarrhoea, etc.). These symptoms may continue until the tapeworm dies following treatment, otherwise it may live for years.
For
cysticercosis
, the incubation period is variable, and infected people may remain asymptomatic for years. In some endemic regions, infected people may develop visible or palpable nodules (a small solid bump or node which is solid that can be detected by touch) beneath the skin.
Neurocysticercosis
is associated with a variety of signs and symptoms depending on the number, size, stage and location of the pathological changes as well as the host’s immune response and the parasite’s genotype, but it can also be clinically asymptomatic. Symptoms may include chronic headaches, blindness, seizures (epilepsy if they are recurrent), hydrocephalus, meningitis, dementia and symptoms caused by lesions occupying spaces of the central nervous system.","The treatment of
taeniasis
by
Taenia solium
is important to prevent neurocysticercosis and as a tool to assist in controlling or stopping the parasite transmission cycle. The treatment can be done on an individual bases, or as Mass Drug Administration depending on the local circumstances and the control approaches being implemented. Taeniasis can be treated using anthelmintics (Praziquantel, Niclosamide, Albendazole).
In
neurocysticercosis
, since the destruction of cysts may lead to an inflammatory response, specialised treatment of active disease is required and may include long courses with high doses of anthelmintic, as well as supporting therapy with corticosteroids and/or anti-epileptic drugs, and possibly surgery. The dosage and the duration of treatment can vary greatly and depend mainly on the number, size, location and developmental stage of the cysts, their surrounding inflammatory edema, acuteness and severity of clinical symptoms or signs."
Tetanus,https://www.who.int/health-topics/tetanus,"Tetanus is a serious illness contracted through exposure to the spores of the bacterium,
Clostridium tetani
, which live in soil, saliva, dust and manure. The bacteria can enter the body through a deep cuts, wounds or burns affecting the nervous system. The infection leads to painful muscle contractions, particularly of the jaw and neck muscle, and is commonly known as “lockjaw”.
People of all ages can get tetanus but the disease is particularly common and serious in newborn babies and their mothers when the mother is unprotected from tetanus by the vaccine, tetanus toxoid. Tetanus occurring during pregnancy or within 6 weeks of the end of pregnancy is called maternal tetanus, while tetanus occurring within the first 28 days of life is called neonatal tetanus.
The disease remains an important public health problem in many parts of the world, but especially in low-income countries or districts, where immunization coverage is low and unclean birth practices are common. WHO estimates that in 2018 (the latest year for which estimates are available), 25 000 newborns died from neonatal tetanus, 88% reduction from the situation in 2000.","Nearly all cases of tetanus occur in people who have never been vaccinated or in adults who have not kept up to date on their booster shots.
Signs and symptoms of tetanus appear anytime from 3 to 21 days after tetanus bacteria enter the body through a wound. Most cases occur within 14 days.
Symptoms can include:
jaw cramping or the inability to open the mouth
muscle spasms often in the back, abdomen and extremities
sudden painful muscle spasms often triggered by sudden noises
trouble swallowing
seizures
headache
fever and sweating
changes in blood pressure or fast heart rate.
In neonatal tetanus, symptoms include muscle spasms, which are often preceded by the newborn’s inability to suck or breastfeed, and excessive crying.
Tetanus is diagnosed on the basis of clinical features and does not require laboratory confirmation. Tetanus requires treatment in a medical facility, often in a referral hospital. People who recover from tetanus do not have natural immunity and can be infected again and therefore need to be immunized.","Tetanus can be prevented through immunization with tetanus-toxoid-containing vaccines (TTCV), which are included in routine immunization programmes globally and administered during antenatal care contacts.
To be protected throughout life, WHO recommends that an individual receives 6 doses (3 primary plus 3 booster doses) of TTCV. The 3-dose primary series should begin as early as 6 weeks of age, with subsequent doses given with a minimum interval of 4 weeks between doses.
The 3 booster doses should preferably be given during the second year of life (12–23 months), at 4–7 years of age, and at 9–15 years of age. Ideally, there should be at least 4 years between booster doses.
There are many kinds of vaccines used to protect against tetanus:
diphtheria and tetanus (DT) vaccines
diphtheria, tetanus, and pertussis (whooping cough) (DTaP) vaccines
tetanus and diphtheria (Td) vaccines
tetanus, diphtheria, and pertussis (Tdap) vaccines.
Neonatal tetanus can be prevented by immunizing women of reproductive age with TTCV, either during pregnancy or outside of pregnancy. Additionally, robust medical practices can also prevent tetanus disease including clean delivery and cord care during childbirth, and proper wound care for surgical and dental procedures."
Tick-borne encephalitis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/tick-borne-encephalitis,"Tick-borne encephalitis (TBE) is an important cause of viral infections of the central nervous system in eastern, central, northern and increasingly western European countries, and in northern China, Mongolia, and the Russian Federation. Tick-borne encephalitis virus is a member of the family
Flaviviridae.
Approximately 10 000–12 000 clinical cases of tick-borne encephalitis are reported each year, but this figure is believed to be significantly lower than the actual total number of clinical cases.
The vast majority of infections with the virus result from infected ticks, which often remain firmly attached to the skin for days. On rare occasions, infection can result from consumption of unpasteurized milk from infect goats, sheep or cows. People come in contact with the ticks during outdoor activities in forested areas up to an altitude of about 2000 meters. There is no direct person-to-person transmission.","Most infections remain asymptomatic. In case of clinical illness, the incubation period for tick-borne encephalitis lasts 2–28 days (most commonly 7–14 days) and is followed by 1–8 days of general cold symptoms, such as fatigue, headache and general malaise, usually combined with fever of ≥38 °C.
After an asymptomatic interval of 1–20 days up to 15% of patients experience a second phase of the disease characterized by fever frequently exceeding 40 °C and signs of central nervous system involvement, such as meningitis (e.g. fever, headache, and a stiff neck), encephalitis (e.g., drowsiness, confusion, and sensory disturbances), myelitis or radiculitis.
Encephalitis developing during this second phase may result in paralysis, permanent sequelae or death. About 1% of cases with neurological pathologies may die; higher fatality rates have been reported from the Russian federation, which may be related to a different virus subtype. Severity of illness increases with age of the patient, but fatalities have been reported from all age groups. There is no specific treatment for tick-borne encephalitis.","People can protect themselves from ticks by wearing appropriate clothing, including long trousers and closed footwear, when hiking or camping in countries or areas at risk. The whole body should be inspected daily and attached ticks removed as soon as possible. The consumption of unpasteurized dairy products should also be avoided in those areas.
Immunization offers the most effective protection. Currently, there are 4 widely used vaccines of assured quality: FSME-Immun and Encepur, manufactured in Austria and Germany respectively, and based on European strains of the virus; and TBE-Moscow and EnceVir, manufactured in the Russian Federation and based on Far-Eastern strains. The 4 vaccines are considered to be safe and effective.
In areas where the disease is highly endemic, WHO recommends that vaccination be offered to all age groups, including children.
Ticks also transmit Borreliosis (Lyme disease), which is a bacterial infection. TBE vaccination is not effective against this disease, which however is treatable with antimicrobials."
Tobacco,https://www.who.int/health-topics/tobacco,"Nicotine contained in tobacco is highly addictive and tobacco use is a major risk factor for cardiovascular and respiratory diseases, over 20 different types or subtypes of cancer, and many other debilitating health conditions. Every year, more than 8
million people die from tobacco use. Most tobacco-related deaths occur in low- and middle-income countries, which are often targets of intensive tobacco industry interference and marketing.
Tobacco can also be deadly for non-smokers. Second-hand smoke exposure has also been implicated in adverse health outcomes, causing 1.2 million deaths annually. Nearly half of all children breathe air polluted by tobacco smoke and 65 000 children die
each year due to illnesses related to second-hand smoke. Smoking while pregnant can lead to several life-long health conditions for babies.
Heated tobacco products (HTPs) contain tobacco and expose users to toxic emissions, many of which cause cancer and are harmful to health. Electronic nicotine delivery systems (ENDS) and electronic non-nicotine delivery systems (ENNDS), commonly known as e-cigarettes,
do not contain tobacco and may or may not contain nicotine, but are harmful to health and undoubtedly unsafe. However, it is too early to provide a clear answer on the long-term impact of HTPs and/or e-cigarette use.","An estimated 1.3 billion people worldwide use tobacco products, 80% of whom are in low- and middle-income countries. Tobacco use contributes to poverty by diverting household spending from basic needs, such as food and shelter, to tobacco. This spending
behaviour is difficult to curb because tobacco is so addictive. It also causes premature death and disability of productive age adults in households thus leading to reduced household income and increased healthcare costs.
In addition to the detrimental impact of tobacco on health, the total economic cost of smoking (from health expenditures and productivity losses together) are estimated to be around US$ 1.4 trillion per year, equivalent in magnitude to 1.8% of the world's
annual gross domestic product (GDP). Almost 40% of this cost occurred in developing countries, highlighting the substantial burden these countries suffer.
Tobacco taxes are applied in part to combat this effect and are seen as the most cost-effective way of curbing tobacco use, particularly among youth and low-income populations. A tax increase that increases tobacco prices by 10% decreases tobacco consumption
by about 4% in high-income countries and about 5% in low- and middle-income countries.","The scale of this human and economic tragedy is shocking, but it’s also preventable. Big Tobacco — along with all manufacturers of tobacco products — is fighting to ensure the dangers of their products are concealed, but we are fighting back: In 2003, WHO Member States unanimously adopted the WHO Framework Convention on Tobacco Control (WHO FCTC), the only public health treaty under the auspices of WHO. In force since 2005, it has currently 181 Parties.
To help countries implement the WHO FCTC, WHO introduced MPOWER, a package of technical measures and resources, each of which corresponds to at least one provision of the WHO FCTC. MPOWER builds the capacity of countries to implement 6 measures to reduce the demand for tobacco products: monitor tobacco use and prevention policies, protect people from tobacco use, offer help to quit tobacco use, warn about the dangers of tobacco, enforce bans on tobacco advertising, promotion and sponsorship and raise taxes on tobacco."
Trachoma,https://www.who.int/health-topics/trachoma,"Trachoma is a disease of the eye and the leading infectious cause of blindness worldwide. It is caused by an obligate intracellular bacterium called
Chlamydia trachomatis
. Infection is transmitted from person to person by direct or indirect transfer of ocular and nasal discharges of infected people; indirect transfer includes carriage on the body of species of flies. Preschool-age children harbour the principal reservoir of infection. Models suggest that an individual requires more than 150 lifetime infections to develop the blinding complications of trachoma.
Trachoma is endemic in some of the world’s poorest populations, who live in rural and remote areas and have highly inadequate access to water, sanitation and healthcare. Africa is the most affected continent, but it also has the most widespread control efforts. The disease is also found in Central and South America, Asia, Australia, and the Middle East. As of 19 March 2024, 18 countries had been validated as having eliminated trachoma as a public health problem. In 2022 alone, 129 224 people received surgical treatment for advanced trachoma, and 36.2 million were treated with antibiotics. Despite these successes, the disease remains a serious public health concern, with an estimated US$ 8 billion annual loss in productivity due to blindness and visual impairment.","Infection is associated with inflammatory changes in the conjunctiva known as “active trachoma”. An individual’s immune system can clear a single episode of infection, but in endemic communities, re-acquisition of the organism occurs frequently.
After years of
repeated episodes of active trachoma
, the inside of the eyelid can become so severely scarred (trachomatous conjunctival scarring) that it turns inwards and causes the eyelashes to rub against the eyeball (trachomatous trichiasis), resulting in constant pain and light intolerance; this and other alterations of the eye can lead to scarring of the cornea. Left untreated, this condition leads to the formation of irreversible opacities, with resulting visual impairment or blindness. The age at which this occurs depends on several factors including local transmission intensity. In very highly endemic communities, it can occur in childhood, though onset of visual impairment between the ages of 30 and 40 years is more typical.
Women are blinded up to four times as often as men, probably due to more frequent contact with infected children.
Individuals living in the poorest and most remote communities of Africa, Asia, Australia, the Middle East, Central and South America and the Pacific Islands are at risk.","Trachoma can be prevented by limiting environmental risk factors. These include inadequate hygiene, crowded households, inadequate access to water and inadequate access to and use of sanitation. Infections usually begin at an early age and grow less frequent
and shorter in duration with increasing age. Infections are most often acquired through family and contact with others with active disease. Repeated infections cause the most serious symptoms of the disease.
Trachoma can be eliminated as a public health problem using the SAFE strategy, comprising:
S
urgery to treat trachomatous trichiasis, the blinding stage of the disease;
A
ntibiotics to clear infection, particularly mass drug administration of the antibiotic azithromycin, which is donated by the manufacturer to national programmes through the International Trachoma Initiative;
F
acial cleanliness; and
E
nvironmental improvement, particularly better access to water and sanitation.
WHO adopted the SAFE strategy in 1993 and continues in its mandate to provide leadership and coordination of international efforts to eliminate trachoma as a public health problem."
"Traditional, Complementary and Integrative Medicine",https://www.who.int/health-topics/traditional-complementary-and-integrative-medicine,"Traditional medicine
Traditional medicine has a long history. It is the sum total of the knowledge, skill, and practices based on the theories, beliefs, and experiences indigenous to different cultures, whether explicable or not, used in the maintenance of health as well as in the prevention, diagnosis, improvement or treatment of physical and mental illness.
Complementary medicine
The terms “complementary medicine” or “alternative medicine” refer to a broad set of health care practices that are not part of that country’s own tradition or conventional medicine and are not fully integrated into the dominant health-care system. They are used interchangeably with traditional medicine in some countries.
Herbal medicines
Herbal medicines include herbs, herbal materials, herbal preparations and finished herbal products, that contain as active ingredients parts of plants, or other plant materials, or combinations.","The WHO Traditional Medicine Strategy 2014–2023
was developed and launched in response to the World Health Assembly resolution on traditional medicine (WHA62.13). The strategy aims to support Member States in developing proactive policies and implementing action plans that will strengthen the role traditional medicine plays in keeping populations healthy.
Addressing the challenges, responding to the needs identified by Member States and building on the work done under the WHO traditional medicine strategy: 2002–2005, the updated strategy for the period 2014–2023 devotes more attention than its predecessor to prioritizing health services and systems, including traditional and complementary medicine products, practices and practitioners.
The strategic objectives are:
To build the knowledge base for active management of T&CM through appropriate national policies;
To strengthen the quality assurance, safety, proper use and effectiveness of T&CM by regulating products, practices and practitioners;
To promote universal health coverage by integrating T&CM services into health care service delivery and self-health care.","The WHO global report on traditional and complementary medicine 2019
was developed to address the gap in reliable, credible and official data from Member States in the area of T&CM.
This report reviews global progress in T&CM over the past two decades and is based on contributions from 179 WHO Member States. It provides valuable information for policy-makers, health professionals and the public for capitalizing on the potential contribution of T&CM to health and well-being."
Transplantation,https://www.who.int/health-topics/transplantation,"Transplantation of human cells, tissues or organs is the best – and often the only – way to save lives for people with serious or life-threatening diseases and injuries.
Transplantation involves replacing non-functional cells, tissues or organs with healthy counterparts that are obtained from another individual through voluntary donation during their lifetime or after their death.
Access to transplantation varies a lot between countries, as does the safety, quality, efficacy of donation and transplantation of human cells, tissues and organs. Growth and development of transplantation worldwide is highly unequal and faces many challenges including:
lack of national strategies for transplantation;
inadequate legislation, ethical frameworks and regulation, which may allow for practices such as organ trafficking;
lack of donation, processing and transplantation infrastructure;
deficient universal health coverage, meaning that access to transplantation is excluded; and
low awareness and engagement amongst the public and healthcare professionals.
Ethical concerns are a major issue. The shortage of organs can lead to illegal activities, like trafficking in body parts for transplants.
Research into alternatives, like using animal products (xenotransplantation) or bioengineered materials, is progressing. These could help reduce the need for human donations but aren’t yet a full replacement. Even when they become available, high costs might limit access. For now, ensuring access to human cells, tissues, and organs for transplantation remains critical.","The benefits of tissue transplantation include survival after severe burn trauma, recovery of movement, closure of chronic wounds, rehabilitation of heart function and restoration of sight. Tissue transplants allow many recipients to return to economically productive lives and promote their independence.
Organ transplantation is often the best if not the only treatment for acute and chronic organ failure. Non-communicable diseases such as diabetes and arterial hypertension, combined with various social determinants such as alcoholism and obesity, may lead to chronic kidney disease and liver cirrhosis. In terms of survival, quality of life and cost-effectiveness, kidney transplantation has better outcomes than dialysis. In chronic or acute liver failure, as well as some cardio-respiratory conditions, transplantation is the only option.
Over 1.5 million patients have undergone haematopoietic stem cell transplant, primarily for haematological cancer. Its potential for treating non-malignant disorders and genetic diseases such as sickle cell anaemia and thalassemia with this type of transplant is increasingly recognized. Previously, only limited treatment options were available, and with no hope of cure.
Increasingly, treatment non-malignant disorders and genetic diseases with haematopoietic stem cell transplant is being considered.","Initiated by the Fortieth World Health Assembly, the
WHO Guiding principles on human cell, tissue and organ transplantation
are a significant contribution to this area of health care, providing an orderly, ethical and acceptable framework for the acquisition and transplantation of human cells, tissues and organs for therapeutic purposes. They were updated in 2020 (
WHA Resolution 63.22
) to reflect changes in practices and attitudes, and they continue to greatly influence the development of appropriate professional codes and practices, as well as legislation, around the world.
Following a
WHO report
showing a lack of progress in the development of transplantation worldwide, the World Health Assembly adopted
a new resolution in 2024 (77.4) on increasing availability, ethical access and oversight of transplantation of human cells, tissues and organs
. The resolution calls for:
Member States to strengthen regulatory frameworks, integrate transplantation into health care systems, increase deceased donation rates, protect living donors from harm and exploitation, and raise public awareness.
WHO to support Member States through the development of a Global strategy on donation and transplantation.
WHO acknowledges the different needs and resources of health systems, the importance of respecting previous and current initiatives, and the commonalities among the established transplantation activities. To ensure relevance, it relies on the expertise of its advisory bodies and extended expert consultations, as well as the continued work with collaborating centres and non-State actors."
Travel and health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/travel-and-health,"Travellers may encounter various health risks during travel. The risks can depend on many things, including the health of the traveller, the type of travel, and the destination. Health risks can come from factors such as changes in temperature and humidity, air pollution, issues of safety and security, access to health and dental care services and products, exposure to infectious diseases, access to safe food and water, sanitation and hygiene standards, availability of facilities and equipment for disabled people, and local laws and customs.
International travel can be stressful. Travellers may be away from family and friends and may need to adjust to foreign cultures and languages. Coping with high levels of stress may cause physical, social and psychological problems. Changes to the circadian rhythm (e.g. jet lag) and sleep deprivation can trigger seizures in people with epilepsy, provoke migraine attacks and cause more behavioural symptoms in people living with dementia.
All individuals planning travel should seek information or advice on potential health risks before they travel. It is important for travellers to understand how best to avoid or minimize these risks, take appropriate preventive measures, and exercise necessary precautions before, during and after travel.","Travellers should prepare themselves in several ways before departure. First, it is important to gather information about the potential health risks early in the planning stage. Travellers should also be aware of differences in local laws and customs, including those relating to substance use and sexual relationships.
Travellers should visit a travel clinic, preferably 4–8 weeks before departure or earlier, but it’s useful even if it’s very close to the departure date. There may be additional considerations for certain groups of travellers, including infants and young children, pregnant and breastfeeding women, older people, people with disabilities, and those who have underlying health conditions, including
mental, neurological and substance use conditions
.
Travellers are strongly advised to obtain comprehensive travel insurance as a matter of routine and to declare any underlying health conditions to their travel insurers.
Sufficient medical supplies, including prescribed medications, should be carried to cover the duration of the trip, including possible delays and change of plans. Toiletries should also be carried in sufficient quantity for the entire duration of the trip unless their availability at the travel destination is assured.","During travel
When travelling, always have important health documents with you, such as health insurance certificates and vaccine or malaria prophylaxis records. In some countries, some medications are illegal to carry (such as psychotropics), and travellers should have a letter written and signed by their doctor certifying the need to carry them. Have these documents ready to be presented if requested by officials.
Travellers should also:
continue to take medications for chronic health conditions, if applicable
be mindful of road safety
be mindful of food and water safety precautions
be mindful of the need for protection from extreme weather, such as heat waves.
After travel
Travellers should seek medical attention on their return home if they:
are ill in the weeks after they return home, particularly with fever, persistent diarrhoea, vomiting, jaundice, urinary disorders, skin disease or anogenital infection (genital warts);
received treatment for malaria while travelling;
may have been exposed during travel to an infectious disease, including sexually transmitted infections, even if they have no symptoms; or
have a previous health condition that gets worse.
Travellers should seek medical care immediately in these cases and not wait for a regularly scheduled consultation.
Providing health personnel with information on travel history, including vaccines and malaria prophylaxis taken before travel, can be helpful."
Tropical Cyclones,https://www.who.int/health-topics/tropical-cyclones,"Tropical cyclones, also known as typhoons or hurricanes, are among the most destructive weather phenomena. They are intense circular storms that originate over warm tropical oceans, and have maximum sustained wind speeds exceeding 119 kilometres per hour and heavy rains.
However, the greatest damage to life and property is not from the wind, but from secondary events such as storm surges, flooding, landslides and tornadoes.
Tropical cyclones are referred to by different names depending on where they originate in the world.
Hurricanes occur in the Atlantic Ocean and the eastern north Pacific Ocean.
Typhoons occur in the western Pacific Ocean.
Tropical cyclones occur in the south Pacific Ocean and Indian Ocean.
From 1998-2017, storms, including tropical cyclones and hurricanes, were second only to earthquakes in terms of fatalities, killing 233 000 people. During this time, storms also affected an estimated 726 million people worldwide, meaning they were injured, made homeless, displaced or evacuated during the emergency phase of the disaster.
Over the past 30 years the proportion of the world’s population living on cyclone-exposed coastlines has increased 192 percent, thus raising the risk of mortality and morbidity in the event of a tropical cyclone.","The health impacts of tropical cyclones depend on the number of people living in low-lying coastal areas in the storm’s direct path, the built environment including building design, and whether there is sufficient time for warning and evacuation.
Tropical cyclones, may directly and indirectly affect health in many ways, for example by:
increasing cases of drowning and other physical trauma;
increasing risks of water- and vector-borne infectious diseases;
increasing mental health effects associated with emergency situations;
disrupting health systems, facilities and services, leaving communities without access to health care when they are needed most;
damaging basic infrastructure, such as food and water supplies and safe shelter.
When tropical cyclones cause floods and sea surges, the risk of drowning and water- or vector-borne diseases increase. Additionally, flood waters may contain sewage and chemicals, hide sharp objects made of metal or glass and electrical lines, or host dangerous snakes or reptiles, which can cause diseases, injuries, electrocution and bites.","WHO works with Member States to build resilient and proactive health systems that can anticipate the needs and challenges during emergencies so that they are more likely to reduce risks and respond effectively when needed.
During disasters, such as tropical cyclones, WHO helps to restore primary care services so that facilities can deliver essential services, including immunization, basic treatment for common illnesses, acute malnutrition and maternal care while ensuring the ongoing supply of medications for people living with HIV, tuberculosis or diabetes.
As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO also works with partners to respond to:
ensure appropriate food supplementation;
assemble mobile health teams and outreach;
conduct epidemic surveillance, early warning and response;
call for emergency funding to support health action."
Tsunamis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/tsunamis,"Tsunamis are giant waves that are produced when a large volume of water is displaced in an ocean or large lake by an earthquake, volcanic eruption, underwater landslide or meteorite. Between 1998-2017, tsunamis caused more than 250 000 deaths globally, including more than 227 000 deaths due to the Indian Ocean tsunami in 2004.
Tsunamis can travel thousands of kilometres with speeds up to 800 kilometres per hour. Once they reach the coast, they can have devastating impacts on the community. Successive crests can arrive at intervals of every 10 to 45 minutes and wreak destruction for several hours.
More than 700 million people live in low-lying coastal areas and Small Island Developing States exposed to extreme sea-level events including tsunamis.
Resilient infrastructure, early warning systems, and education is critical to saving people and protecting their assets against tsunami risk in the future.","Drowning is the most significant cause of death due to tsunamis. Injuries from debris account for many of the health care needs in the immediate aftermath of the disaster. Falling structures and waters full of swirling debris can inflict crush injuries, fractures, and a variety of open and closed wounds.
The risk of communicable diseases depends on the size, health status and living conditions of the population displaced by the tsunami. The population could be at risk of water-borne diseases and respiratory diseases due to crowding in temporary shelters and inadequate water and sanitation, as well as vaccine-preventable diseases if there is a low vaccination coverage rate prior to the disaster.
Survivors of tsunamis often also face short- and long-term mental health effects due to loss of family, property, livestock or crops. The immediate health concerns after the rescue of survivors following a natural disaster are drinking water, food, shelter and medical care for injuries.","The magnitude of the physical and human costs from tsunamis can be reduced if adequate emergency prevention, preparedness, response and recovery measures are implemented in a sustainable and timely manner.
WHO works with Member States to build resilient and proactive health systems that can anticipate the needs and challenges during emergencies so that they are more likely to reduce risks and respond effectively when needed.
As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with partners to respond to:
ensure appropriate food supplementation;
restore primary care services, like immunization, child and maternal health, and mental health;
assemble mobile health teams and outreach;
conduct epidemic surveillance, early warning and response;
call for emergency funding to support health action."
Tuberculosis,https://www.who.int/health-topics/tuberculosis,"TB is caused by bacteria (Mycobacterium tuberculosis) and it most often affects the lungs. TB is spread through the air when people with lung TB cough, sneeze or spit. A person needs to inhale only a few germs to become infected.
Every year, 10 million people fall ill with tuberculosis (TB). Despite being a preventable and curable disease, 1.5 million people die from TB each year – making it the world’s top infectious killer.
TB is the leading cause of death of people with HIV and also a major contributor to antimicrobial resistance.
Most of the people who fall ill with TB live in low- and middle-income countries, but TB is present all over the world. About half of all people with TB can be found in 8 countries: Bangladesh, China, India, Indonesia, Nigeria, Pakistan, Philippines and
South Africa.
About a quarter of the global population is estimated to have been infected with TB bacteria, but most people will not go on to develop TB disease and some will clear the infection. Those who are infected but not (yet) ill with the disease cannot transmit it.
People infected with TB bacteria have a 5–10% lifetime risk of falling ill with TB. Those with compromised immune systems, such as people living with HIV, malnutrition or diabetes, or people who use tobacco, have a higher risk of falling ill.","Common symptoms of TB disease include:
• Prolonged cough
• Chest pain
• Weakness or fatigue
• Weight loss
• Fever
• Night sweats
Often, these symptoms will be mild for many months, thus leading to delays in seeking care and increasing the risk of spreading the infection to others.
If the healthcare provider suspects a patient to have TB disease, they will send the patient for testing. In the case of suspected lung TB disease, patients will be asked to give a sputum sample for testing for TB bacteria. For non-lung TB disease, samples
of affected body fluids and tissue can be tested. WHO recommends rapid molecular diagnostic tests as initial tests for people showing signs and symptoms of TB. Other diagnostic tools can include sputum smear microscopy and chest X-rays.
With TB infection, a person gets infected with TB bacteria that lie inactive in the body. This infection can develop into TB disease if their immune system weakens. People with TB infection do not show any signs or symptoms of TB. To identify TB infection,
healthcare providers will screen at-risk patients to rule out active TB, and they may use a skin or blood test to check for TB infection.","TB disease is curable. It is treated by standard 6 month course of 4 antibiotics. Common drugs include rifampicin and isoniazid. In some cases the TB bacteria does not respond to the standard drugs. In this case, the patient has drug-resistant TB. Treatment
for drug-resistant TB is longer and more complex.
The course of TB drugs is provided to the patient with information, supervision and support by a health worker or trained volunteer. Without such support, treatment adherence can be difficult. If the treatment is not properly completed, the disease can
become drug-resistant and can spread.
In the case of TB infection (where the patient is infected with TB bacteria but not ill), TB preventive treatment can be given to stop the onset of disease. This treatment uses the same drugs for a shorter time. Recent treatment options have shortened
the duration to treatment to only 1 or 3 months, as compared to 6 months in the past."
Typhoid,https://www.who.int/health-topics/typhoid,"Typhoid fever is a life-threatening systemic infection caused by the bacterium
Salmonella enterica
serovar Typhi (commonly known as
Salmonella
Typhi). Typhoid is usually spread through the ingestion of contaminated food or water.
Typhoid occurs predominantly in association with poor sanitation and lack of clean drinking water, in both urban and rural settings. However, urbanization, with associated overcrowded populations and inadequate water and sanitation systems, as well as climate change have the potential to further increase the global burden of typhoid. In addition, increasing antibiotic resistance is making it easier for typhoid to spread and more difficult to be treated.
An estimated 9 million people get sick from typhoid and 110 000 people die from it worldwide every year (2019 figures). Children and populations lacking access to safe drinking water and adequate sanitation are at highest risk.
Travellers are at risk of developing typhoid fever in many typhoid endemic countries, particularly in Asia and sub-Saharan Africa. Elsewhere, travellers are usually at risk when exposed to low standards of personal hygiene or food hygiene and poor water quality.
Even vaccinated travellers should take care to avoid consumption of potentially contaminated food and water as vaccination does not confer 100% protection.","Salmonella
Typhi lives only in humans. In persons with typhoid fever the bacteria enter through the intestinal tract and eventually invade the bloodstream. The resulting illness is often clinically non-distinguishable from other febrile illnesses. Symptoms include:
prolonged high fever
fatigue
headache
nausea
abdominal pain
constipation or diarrhoea
rash, in some cases.
Severe cases may lead to serious complications or even death.
Typhoid fever can be treated with antibiotics. However, increased resistance to antibiotics, including fluoroquinolones and newer antibiotics such as cephalosporins and azithromycin, as well as the emergence of extensively drug resistant strains of
Salmonella
Typhi leads to more complicated and expensive treatment options in the most affected regions.
Even after symptoms pass, approximately 2–5% of cases become chronic carriers and inadvertently spread typhoid through ongoing faecal shedding of the bacteria and contamination. It is important for people being treated for typhoid fever to do the following:
take prescribed antibiotics for      the full prescribed course;
wash their hands with soap and      water after using the bathroom, and avoid preparing or serving food to      other people, whilst the infection persists; and
have their doctor test (after      the antibiotic course) to ensure that no
Salmonella
Typhi bacteria remain in their body.","Access to safe water and adequate sanitation, health education, appropriate hygiene among food handlers, and typhoid vaccination are all effective strategies for prevention and control of typhoid.
There are three recommended typhoid vaccines :
typhoid conjugate vaccine, an injectable vaccine for children from 6 months of age and adults up to 65 years;
unconjugated Vi polysaccharide vaccine, an injectable vaccine for people over 2 years; and
live attenuated oral vaccine, suitable for people over the age of 6 years.
Typhoid conjugate vaccine has been recommended for routine use as a single dose in childhood immunization programmes since October 2017. The latter two vaccines have been used for many years in older children and adults at risk of typhoid, including travellers; they do not provide long-lasting immunity and require multiple doses to maintain protection.
Since December 2017, WHO has prequalified two typhoid conjugate vaccines, which are prioritized for introduction in endemic countries with high burden of typhoid or high levels of antimicrobial resistance. Widespread use of the conjugate vaccine in priority countries is expected to help reduce the frequent use of antibiotics for typhoid treatment and slow the increase in antibiotic resistance in
Salmonella
Typhi
."
Ultraviolet radiation,https://www.who.int/health-topics/ultraviolet-radiation,"Ultraviolet (UV) radiation covers the wavelength range of 100–400 nm, which is a higher frequency and lower wavelength than visible light. UV radiation comes naturally from the sun, but it can also be created by artificial sources used in industry, commerce and recreation.
The UV region covers the wavelength range 100-400 nm and is divided into three bands:
UVA (315-400 nm)
UVB (280-315 nm)
UVC (100-280 nm).
As sunlight passes through the atmosphere, all UVC and approximately 90% of UVB radiation is absorbed by ozone, water vapour, oxygen and carbon dioxide. UVA radiation is less affected by the atmosphere. Therefore, the UV radiation reaching the Earth’s surface is largely composed of UVA with a small UVB component.
The amount of UV radiation from the sun that hits the Earth’s surface depends on several factors, including the sun’s height in the sky, latitude, cloud cover, altitude, the thickness of the ozone layer and ground reflection. Reductions in the ozone layer due to human-created pollution increase the amount of UVA and UVB that reaches the surface. This can impact human health, animals, marine organisms and plant life. In humans, increased UV exposure can cause skin cancers, cataracts and immune system damage.","The rise in the number of cases of skin cancer over the past decades is strongly related to increased exposure to the sun during outdoor activities and to artificial sources of UV radiation such as sunlamps and tanning beds. Overexposure is also the underlying cause of harmful effects on the eyes and immune system.
Adopting a few simple precautions can greatly reduce the risk of these health conditions:
Limit time in the midday sun from 10 a.m. to 4 p.m., particularly on days when the UV index is high.
When UV rays are most intense and you must be outside, try to find shade and wear protective clothing, including a brimmed hat that provides sun protection for your head, face and neck.
Use a broad-spectrum sunscreen of at least 15 SPF – ideally higher– and reapply every 2 hours.
Avoid sunlamps and tanning parlours, as they are known to damage the skin and eyes.
Children’s UV exposure should be carefully limited because they are in a dynamic state of growth and therefore more susceptible to environmental threats than adults. Many vital functions such as the immune system are not fully developed at birth, and unsafe environments may interfere with their normal development.","WHO works with Member States and partners to increase public understanding of the effects of overexposure to ultraviolet radiation.
The INTERSUN Programme is a collaboration between WHO, the United Nations Environment Programme, the World Meteorological Organization, the International Agency on Cancer Research and the International Commission on Non-Ionizing Radiation Protection. It promotes and evaluates research on the health effects of UV radiation, and develops an appropriate response through guidelines, recommendations and information dissemination. The goals of the programme including providing practical and sound advice on the health and environmental impacts of UV exposure, to encourage countries to take action to reduce UV-induced health risks and to provide guidance to national authorities about sun awareness programmes.
To this end, the programme collaborates with experts and specialist agencies to implement key research activities, identifies and quantifies health risks from UV radiation, develops reliable predictions of health and environmental consequences of changes in UV exposure with stratospheric ozone depletion, and develops practical ways of monitoring change in UV-induced health effects over time.
The programme provides tools and guidelines related to the UV index, sun protection for children, artificial sunbeds, tourism and occupational health."
Universal health coverage,https://www.who.int/health-topics/universal-health-coverage,"Universal health coverage (UHC) means that all people have
access to the full range of quality health services they need, when and where
they need them, without financial hardship. It covers the full continuum of
essential health services, from health promotion to prevention, treatment,
rehabilitation and palliative care.
To deliver on this promise, countries need to have strong, efficient
and equitable health systems that are rooted in the communities they serve.
Primary health care (PHC) is the most effective and cost-efficient way to get
there. Every country has a different path to achieving UHC and to decide what
to cover based on the needs of their populations and the resources at hand.
Investing in PHC ensures that all those needs are identified, prioritized and
addressed in an integrated way; that there is a robust and equipped health and
care workforce; and that all sectors of society contribute to confronting the
environmental and socio-economic factors that affect health and well-being,
including preparing for, responding to and recovering from emergencies.","As a foundation for UHC, WHO recommends reorienting health
    systems using a primary health care (PHC) approach. Achieving UHC is a WHO
    strategic priority, with the goal of 1 billion more people benefitting from
    universal health coverage by 2025.
In countries with fragile health systems, we focus on technical
    assistance to build national institutions and service delivery to fill critical
    gaps in emergencies. In more robust health system settings, we drive public
    health impact towards health coverage for all through policy dialogue for the
    systems of the future and strategic support to improve performance.
This work is supported by normative guidance and agreements;
    data, research and innovation; and leadership in the realms of diplomacy,
    advocacy, gender equality, health equity and human rights, multisectoral
    action, and finance.","WHO’s work is aligned with the Sustainable Development Goals
(SDG) target 3.8, which focuses on achieving universal health coverage,
including financial risk protection, access to quality essential health-care
services and access to safe, effective, quality and affordable essential
medicines and vaccines for all.
Globally, progress towards universal health coverage is a
challenge. Progress in service coverage has stalled while the proportion of the
population facing catastrophic out-of-pocket health spending increases
continuously.
WHO monitors progress and publishes global reports to reveal the
latest evidence every two years. See the reports here and visit the
UHC
fact sheet
for more information."
Urban health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/urban-health,"Urbanization is one of the leading global trends of the 21st century that has a significant impact on health. Over 55% of the world’s population live in urban areas – a proportion that is expected to increase to 68% by 2050. As most future
    urban growth will take place in developing countries, the world today has a unique opportunity to guide urbanization and other major urban development trends in a way that protects and promotes health. This is important, not least because the health
    and well-being of citizens is perhaps a city’s most important asset.
However, most of the 4.2 billion people living in cities suffer inadequate housing and transport, poor sanitation and waste management, and air quality that fails WHO guidelines. Other forms of pollution, such as noise, water and soil contamination,
    so-called urban heat islands, and a lack of space for walking, cycling and active living further combine to make cities epicentres of a noncommunicable disease epidemic and drivers of climate change.
WHO Repository on Urban Health","Around 40% of urban growth is in slums that lack safe water and sanitation, and 91% of people in urban areas breathe polluted air. When it comes to healthy diets, urbanization increases the distance from farm to fork, driving demand for unhealthy, processed foods. Urban dwellers are also highly vulnerable to the effects of climate change because of their dependence on fossil fuels for transport, cooking and heating. Cities account for over two thirds of the world’s energy and emit 60% of greenhouse gases, and those inland may experience temperatures 3–5º C higher than surrounding rural areas because of their large expanses of concrete and limited open green spaces.
All of this puts urban dwellers’ health at risk. Most the top 10 causes of death are closely related to rapid and unplanned urbanization, and poor urban design and planning. Cities face the triple health burden of infectious diseases like HIV/AIDS, tuberculosis, pneumonia, dengue and diarrhoea; noncommunicable diseases like heart disease, stroke, asthma, cancer, diabetes and depression; and violence and injuries, including road traffic injuries.","Despite their challenges, cities can create opportunities for better health, cleaner environments and climate action. Strong urban policies must prioritize health, as it is essential for fostering good urban livelihoods, building a productive workforce, creating resilient and vibrant communities, enabling mobility, promoting social interaction and protecting vulnerable populations.
WHO’s approach to urban health focuses on better air quality, water and sanitation, and other environmental determinants; healthy urban planning; healthier and smoke-free environments; safe and healthy mobility; preventing violence and injuries; promoting healthy food systems and diets; environmental management of vector-borne diseases; and urban preparedness for emergencies.
Working across sectors and ensuring the coherence of policies across different areas is key to creating supportive and enabling environments for health, which ensures that health and equity considerations are integrated throughout the planning process, investments and policy decisions at the local level.
To help Member States address the above priorities, WHO works to strengthen the evidence base to help policy-makers make informed decisions when addressing health risks. It provides tools and guidance on what works, and supports monitoring of key health-related indicators. WHO leads and engages in fostering city-to-city exchanges and helps develop institutional and policy frameworks for good urban governance for health and well-being in cities."
Vaccines and immunization,https://www.who.int/health-topics/vaccines-and-immunization,"Immunization is a global health success story, saving millions of lives every year. Vaccines reduce risks of getting a disease by working with your body’s natural defenses to build protection. When you get a vaccine, your immune system responds.
We now have vaccines to prevent more than 20 life-threatening diseases, helping people of all ages live longer, healthier lives. Immunization currently prevents 3.5 million to 5 million deaths every year from diseases like diphtheria, tetanus, pertussis, influenza and measles.
Immunization is key to primary health care, an indisputable human right, and one of the best health investments money can buy. Vaccines are also critical to the prevention and control of infectious disease outbreaks. They underpin global health security and are a vital tool in the battle against antimicrobial resistance.
The COVID-19 pandemic strained health systems, resulting in dramatic setbacks.  The most recent data for diphtheria-pertussis-tetanus (DTP) immunization coverage underscores the need for ongoing catch-up, recovery and system-strengthening.
Measles, because of its high transmissibility, acts as a “canary in the coalmine”, quickly exposing immunity. In 2023, the routine first dose of measles vaccine was missed by 22 million children – far from the 2019 level of 19.3 million children.","Vaccines train your immune system to create antibodies, just as it does when it’s exposed to a disease. However, because vaccines contain only killed or weakened forms of germs like viruses or bacteria, they do not cause the disease or put you at risk of its complications.
Vaccines protect against many different diseases
, including:
cervical cancer
cholera
COVID-19
diphtheria
hepatitis B
influenza
Japanese encephalitis
malaria
measles
meningitis
mumps
pertussis
pneumonia
polio
rabies
rotavirus
rubella
tetanus
typhoid
varicella
yellow fever
Some other vaccines are currently being piloted, including those that protect against Ebola or malaria, but are not yet widely available globally.
Not all these vaccinations may be needed in your country. Some may only be given prior to travel, in areas of risk, or to people in high-risk occupations. Talk to your healthcare worker to find out what vaccinations are needed for you and your family.","WHO is working with countries and partners to improve global vaccination coverage, including through these initiatives adopted by the World Health Assembly in August 2020.
Immunization Agenda 2030
IA2030 sets an ambitious, overarching global vision and strategy for vaccines and immunization for the decade 2021–2030. It was co-created with thousands of contributions from countries and organizations around the world. It draws on lessons from the past decade and acknowledges continuing and new challenges posed by infectious diseases (e.g. Ebola, COVID-19).
The strategy has been designed to respond to the interests of every country and intends to inspire and align the activities of community, national, regional and global stakeholders towards achieving a world where everyone, everywhere fully benefits from vaccines for good health and well-being. IA2030 is operationalized through regional and national strategies and a mechanism
to ensure ownership and accountability and a monitoring and evaluation framework to guide country implementation.
Immunization Agenda 2030: A Global Strategy to Leave No One Behind
Implementing the Immunization Agenda 2030: A Framework for Action"
Violence against children,https://www.who.int/health-topics/violence-against-children,"Violence against children includes all forms of violence against people under 18 years old. For infants and younger children, violence mainly involves child maltreatment (i.e. physical, sexual and emotional abuse and neglect) at the hands of parents and other authority figures. Boys and girls are at equal risk of physical and emotional abuse and neglect, and girls are at greater risk of sexual abuse. As children reach adolescence, peer violence and intimate partner violence, in addition to child maltreatment, become highly prevalent.
Violence against children can be prevented. Preventing and responding to violence against children requires that efforts systematically address risk and protective factors at all four interrelated levels of risk (individual, relationship, community, society).
A May 2016 World Health Assembly resolution endorsed the first ever WHO
Global plan of action on strengthening the role of the health system within a national multisectoral response to address interpersonal violence, in particular against women and girls, and against children.
According to this plan, WHO in collaboration with Member States and other partners, is committed to:
Monitoring the global magnitude and characteristics of violence against children and supporting country efforts to document and measure such violence.
Maintaining an electronic information system that summarizes the scientific data on the burden, risk factors and consequences of violence against children, and the evidence for its preventability.
Developing and disseminating evidence-based technical guidance documents, norms and standards for preventing and responding to violence against children.
Regularly publishing global status reports on country efforts to address violence against children through national policies and action plans, laws, prevention programmes and response services.
Supporting countries and partners in implementing evidence-based prevention and response strategies, such as those included in
INSPIRE: Seven strategies for ending violence against children
.
Collaborating with international agencies and organizations to reduce and eliminate violence against children globally, through initiatives such as the Global Partnership to End Violence against Children, Together for Girls and the Violence Prevention Alliance.","Child maltreatment is the abuse and neglect that occurs to children under 18 years of age. It includes all types of physical and/or emotional ill-treatment, sexual abuse, neglect, negligence and commercial or other exploitation, which results in actual or potential harm to the child’s health, survival, development or dignity in the context of a relationship of responsibility, trust or power. Exposure to intimate partner violence is also sometimes included as a form of child maltreatment.
Child maltreatment has enormous immediate and long-term repercussions. Beyond death, physical injury and disability, violence can lead to stress that impairs brain development and damages the nervous and immune systems. This in turn is associated with delayed cognitive development, poor school performance and dropout, mental health problems, suicide attempts, increased health-risk behaviours, revictimization and the perpetration of violence. The good news is that child maltreatment can be prevented through interventions that support parents and caregivers, promote non-violent norms and values, provide education and life skills training, strengthen families’ income and economic security, offer high quality response and support services, create and sustain safe environments for children, and implement and enforce laws against child maltreatment.
WHO, in collaboration with a number of partners:
provides technical and normative guidance for evidence-based child maltreatment prevention;
advocates for increased international support for and investment in evidence-based child maltreatment prevention;
provides technical support for evidence-based child maltreatment prevention programmes in several low- and middle-income countries.","Youth violence is a global public health problem. It includes a range of acts from bullying and physical fighting, to more severe sexual and physical assault to homicide.
Youth violence dramatically increases health, welfare and criminal justice costs; reduces productivity;  and generally undermines the fabric of society. Beyond deaths, injuries and psychological harm, youth violence can lead to increased health risk behaviours such as smoking,
substance abuse
, unsafe sex, and further violence. These in turn are associated with chronic respiratory diseases, cancer, cardiovascular diseases, diabetes, early pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases. Effective prevention and response strategies include those that promote parenting and early childhood development; school-based bullying prevention, academic, and life and social skills development programmes; therapeutic approaches with high-risk individuals, and community- and society-level approaches like reducing access to and
misuse of alcohol
and firearms, hotspots and problem-oriented policing, urban upgrading, and poverty de-concentration.
WHO and partners decrease youth violence through initiatives that help to identify, quantify and respond to the problem, these include:
developing a package for schools-based violence prevention programmes;
drawing attention to the magnitude of youth violence and the need for prevention;
building evidence on the scope and types of violence in different settings;
developing guidance for Member States and all relevant sectors to prevent youth violence and strengthen responses to it;
supporting national efforts to prevent youth violence; and
collaborating with international agencies and organizations to prevent youth violence globally."
Violence against women,https://www.who.int/health-topics/violence-against-women,"Violence against women – particularly intimate partner violence and sexual violence – is a major public and clinical health problem and a violation of women's human rights. It is rooted in and perpetuates gender inequalities.
Globally 1 in 3 women experience physical and/or sexual violence in their lifetime, mostly by an intimate partner. This is a stark reminder of the scale of gender inequality and discrimination against women.
The
United Nations defines
violence against women as ""any act of gender-based violence that results in, or is likely to result in, physical, sexual, or mental harm or suffering to women, including threats of such acts, coercion or arbitrary deprivation of liberty, whether occurring in public or in private life.""
Intimate partner violence refers to behaviour by an intimate partner or ex-partner that causes physical, sexual or psychological harm, including physical aggression, sexual coercion, psychological abuse and controlling behaviours.
Sexual violence is ""any sexual act, attempt to obtain a sexual act, or other act directed against a person’s sexuality using coercion, by any person regardless of their relationship to the victim, in any setting. It includes rape, defined as the physically forced or otherwise coerced penetration of the vulva or anus with a penis, other body part or object.""","Violence against women is a global problem of pandemic proportions. It causes devastating, harm to women’s lives and that of their children. It also hurts the economic and social health of their families, communities, and countries.
While some women are more at risk than others, violence can happen to any woman, in any country – regardless of culture, religion or economic status. Gender inequality including harmful gender norms are key drivers of violence against women.
Violence can negatively affect women’s physical, mental, sexual, and reproductive health. It is associated with increased risk of injuries, depression, anxiety disorders, unplanned pregnancies, sexually transmitted infections,  HIV and many other health problems .
Children who grow up in families where there is violence may suffer a range of behavioural and emotional disturbances. These can lead to mental and development problems and also be associated with perpetrating or experiencing violence later in life.","WHO plays a key role in bringing attention to and responding to violence
against women as a public health and gender equality issue through:
Research and evidence-building to highlight the magnitude of violence against women, its risk factors and consequences, and to identify effective interventions for prevention and response.
Developing guidelines and tools, setting norms and standards for an effective health response to violence against women.
Strengthening country capacity of health systems and providers to prevent and respond to violence against women.
Encouraging leadership in health systems and building political will to address violence against women through advocacy and partnerships.
The
WHO 13
th
General Programme of Work
(GPW) includes violence against women as part of its contribution to Sustainable Development Goal (SDG) 5 on gender equality and women’s empowerment (specifically, SDG 5.2 on the elimination of violence against women and girls).
At the World Health Assembly in May 2016, Member States endorsed a
global plan of action
on strengthening the role of the health systems in addressing interpersonal violence, in particular against women and girls and against children."
Volcanic eruptions,https://www.who.int/health-topics/volcanic-eruptions,"A volcano is a vent in the Earth’s crust from which eruptions occur. There are about 1500 potentially active volcanoes worldwide. When volcanoes erupt they can spew hot, dangerous gases, ash, lava and rock that can cause disastrous loss of life and property, especially in heavily populated areas. Volcanic activities and wildfires affected 6.2 million people and caused nearly 2400 deaths between 1998-2017.
There are different types of volcanic eruptive events, including:
pyroclastic explosions, with is fast-moving hot gas and volcanic matter
hot ash releases
lava flows
gas emissions
glowing avalanches, when gas and ashes release.
Volcanic eruptions can also cause secondary events, such as floods, landslides and mudslides, if there are accompanying rain, snow or melting ice. Hot ashes can also start wildfires.
Volcanic eruptions can impact climate change through emitting volcanic gases like sulfur dioxide, which causes global cooling, and volcanic carbon dioxide, which has the potential to promote global warming.","Volcanic eruptions can pose multiple health threats depending on the proximity of the volcano to the community and whether there was any warning.
Volcanic eruptions can cause:
suffocation
infectious diseases, such as conjunctivitis
acute and chronic respiratory diseases from falling ash and breathing gases and fumes
burns and traumatic injuries, such as lacerations from falling rock
eye and skin irritations from acid rain.
Ash and chemicals from the eruption can also generate risk of food and water contamination, and compromise basic services, like water, transportation, communications and health services. Likewise, the accumulation of ash on roofs can cause damage or collapse of buildings, both immediately and after the event.","WHO works with Member States to build resilient and proactive health systems that can anticipate the needs and challenges during emergencies so that they are more likely to reduce risks and respond effectively when needed.
The magnitude of the physical and human costs from volcanoes can be reduced if adequate emergency prevention, preparedness, response and recovery measures are implemented in a sustainable and timely manner. This includes, ensuring early warning systems are in place, evaluating the population, and raises awareness about the risks of volcanic activities.
As the health cluster lead for global emergencies, WHO works with partners to respond to:
ensure appropriate food supplementation;
restore primary care services, like immunization, child and maternal health, and mental health;
assemble mobile health teams and outreach;
conduct epidemic surveillance, early warning and response;
call for emergency funding to support health action."
"Water, sanitation and hygiene (WASH)",https://www.who.int/health-topics/water-sanitation-and-hygiene-wash,"Safe drinking-water, sanitation and hygiene are crucial to human health and well-being. Safe WASH is not only a prerequisite to health, but contributes to livelihoods, school attendance and dignity and helps to create resilient communities living in healthy environments.
Drinking unsafe water impairs health through illnesses such as diarrhoea, and untreated excreta contaminates groundwaters and surface waters used for drinking-water, irrigation, bathing and household purposes.
Chemical contamination of water continues to pose a health burden, whether natural in origin such as arsenic and fluoride, or anthropogenic such as nitrate.
Safe and sufficient WASH plays a key role in preventing numerous NTDs such as trachoma, soil-transmitted helminths and schistosomiasis. Diarrhoeal deaths as a result of inadequate WASH were reduced by half during the Millennium Development Goal (MDG) period (1990–2015), with the significant progress on water and sanitation provision playing a key role.
Evidence suggests that improving service levels towards safely managed drinking-water or sanitation such as regulated piped water or connections to sewers with wastewater treatment can dramatically improve health by reducing diarrhoeal disease deaths.","Safe drinking-water, sanitation and hygiene (WASH) are crucial to human health and well-being. Safe WASH is not only a prerequisite to health, but contributes to livelihoods, school attendance and dignity and helps to create resilient communities living in healthy environments. Drinking unsafe water impairs health through illnesses such as diarrhoea, and untreated excreta contaminates groundwaters and surface waters used for drinking-water, irrigation, bathing and household purposes. This creates a heavy burden on communities. Chemical contamination of water continues to pose a health burden, whether natural in origin such as arsenic and fluoride, or anthropogenic such as nitrate. Safe and sufficient WASH plays a key role in preventing numerous neglected tropical diseases (NTDs) such as trachoma, soil-transmitted helminths and schistosomiasis.
However, poor WASH conditions still account for more than one million diarrhoeal deaths every year and constrain effective prevention and management of other diseases including malnutrition, NTDs and cholera.
Evidence suggests that improving service levels towards safely managed drinking-water or sanitation such as regulated piped water or connections to sewers with wastewater treatment can dramatically improve health by reducing diarrhoeal disease deaths.","WHO develops, updates and disseminates health-based guidance documents and best practice guides, norms and standards
that support standard-setting and regulations at national level, particularly for drinking-water safety, effective surveillance approaches, recreational water quality, sanitation safety, safe wastewater use, WASH in health and educational facilities, and WASH monitoring.
WHO empowers countries through multi-sectoral technical cooperation, advice and capacity building to governments, practitioners and partners including on health and WASH sector capacities with respect to their public health oversight roles, national policies and regulatory frameworks, national systems for effective water quality and disease surveillance, including outbreak response, national systems for WASH monitoring, and national WASH target-setting.
WHO provides reliable and credible WASH data to inform policies and programmes
including on WASH risk factors and burden of disease, the status of key output indicators for WASH, progress towards relevant WASH-related SDG targets, the enabling environment for WASH including WASH finance, and wastewater and SDG 6 interlinkages.
WHO coordinates with multi-sectoral partners, leads or engages with global and regional platforms, and advocates for WASH to influence political will and policy uptake of effective WASH strategies, increase focus on effective WASH regulations and policies, and expand and strengthen multi-sectoral collaboration at national level.
WHO promotes integration of WASH with other health programmes, for example disease programmes for cholera and NTDs, emergencies programmes, quality care and infection prevention control, especially through WASH in health care facilities, nutrition programmes and antimicrobial resistance programmes."
Wildfires,https://www.who.int/health-topics/wildfires,"Wildfires are increasing around the globe in frequency, severity and duration, heightening the need to understand the health effects of wildfire exposure. The risk of wildfires grows in extremely dry conditions, such as drought, heat waves and during high winds.
Wildfire smoke is a mixture of hazardous air pollutants, such PM
2.5
, NO
2
, ozone, aromatic hydrocarbons, or lead. In addition to contaminating the air with toxic pollutants, wildfires also simultaneously impact the climate by releasing large quantities of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases into the atmosphere.
With climate change leading to warmer temperatures and drier conditions and the increasing urbanization of rural areas, the fire season is starting earlier and ending later. Wildfire events are getting more extreme in terms of acres burned, duration and intensity, and they can disrupt transportation, communications, water supply, and power and gas services.","Wildfires that burn near populated areas can have significant impact on the environment, property, livestock and human mortality and morbidity depending on the size, speed and proximity to the fire, and whether the population has advanced warning to evacuate.
Wildfire smoke is a mixture of air pollutants of which particulate matter (PM) is the principal public health threat.
PM
2.5
from wildfire smoke is associated with premature deaths in the general population, and can cause and exacerbate diseases of the lungs, heart, brain/nervous system, skin, gut, kidney, eyes, nose and liver. It has also been shown to lead to cognitive impairment and memory loss. Firefighters and emergency response workers are also greatly impacted by injuries, burns and smoke inhalation, particularly at high concentrations.
More interdisciplinary research is warranted to understand the latent and long-term health effects of wildfire exposure on vulnerable populations (children, older people, pregnant people, chronically ill people), particularly for geographic areas enduring repeated and cyclical exposure to these wildﬁre events.","The magnitude of the physical and human costs from wildfires can be reduced if adequate emergency prevention, preparedness, response and recovery measures are implemented in a sustainable and timely manner.
Working with Member States, WHO helps to build resilient and proactive health systems that can anticipate the needs and challenges during emergencies, so that we can be more likely to reduce risks and respond effectively when needed.
WHO works with partners in preparing, preventing, detecting, responding and recovering from emergencies and disasters, including environmental exposures, such as
implementing early warning systems and issuing health and air quality advisories;
containing the release of hazardous materials;
assessing health needs of the community and infrastructure damage;
restoring primary care services, like immunization, child and maternal health, and mental health;
strengthening human resources for disaster management;
collecting, analysing and disseminating information related to emergencies and disasters that are likely to occur in a region;
establishing and managing stocks of relief supplies and equipment;
calling for emergency funding to support health action; and
developing national policies, recommendations and national emergency response plans."
Women's health,https://www.who.int/health-topics/women-s-health,"Being a man or a woman has a significant impact on health, as a result of both biological and gender-related differences. The health of women and girls is of particular concern because, in many societies, they are disadvantaged by discrimination rooted in sociocultural factors. For example, women and girls face increased vulnerability to HIV/AIDS.
Some of the sociocultural factors that prevent women and girls to benefit from quality health services and attaining the best possible level of health include:
unequal power relationships between men and women;
social norms that decrease education and paid employment opportunities;
an exclusive focus on women’s reproductive roles; and
potential or actual experience of physical, sexual and emotional violence.
While poverty is an important barrier to positive health outcomes for both men and women, poverty tends to yield a higher burden on women and girls’ health due to, for example, feeding practices (malnutrition) and use of unsafe cooking fuels (COPD).",N/A,N/A
Yaws (Endemic treponematoses),https://www.who.int/health-topics/yaws,"Yaws is a chronic skin infection characterized by papillomas (noncancerous lumps) and ulcers. It is caused by the bacterium
Treponema pallidum subspecies pertenue
, which
belongs to the same group of bacteria that causes venereal syphilis.
Yaws primarily affects children aged under 15 years who live in poor communities in warm, humid and tropical forested areas of Africa, Asia, Latin America and the Pacific islands. The majority of affected populations live rural areas, far from health services. Poverty, low socio-economic conditions and poor personal hygiene facilitate the spread of yaws.
Although there are over 80 000 cases of yaws each year, experts believe the disease can be controlled and ultimately eradicated for several reasons. First, it only occurs in humans, not animals, making control much easier. It is also easy to treat with readily available drugs and has already been eliminated in some countries, including India. The remaining pockets of yaws infection, although usually in remote places, means further spread is less likely with proper surveillance and control measures.","There are two stages of yaws infection. The early stage is when the patient is infectious and can spread the disease to others. In this stage, a papule (a noncancerous, outward-growing lump) develops at the site of infection. This papule is full of the organisms and may persist for 3–6 months followed by natural healing. Without treatment, this is followed by disseminated skin lesions over the body. Bone pain and bone lesions may also occur.
The second stage is noninfectious and typically appears five years after infection. It is characterized by disabling consequences of the nose, bones and palmar/plantar hyperkeratosis (thickening).
After a field diagnosis based on these symptoms, the disease can be confirmed by examining a sample from a skin legion under a special type of microscope (darkfield examination). Blood tests are not typically used because yaws is closely related to the bacterium that causes syphilis and the two diseases will show the same result.","There is currently no vaccine for yaws. Health education and improved personal hygiene are the most important tactics for prevention.
Two antibiotics can be used to treat yaws. A single oral dose of azithromycin (30 mg/kg, maximum 2 g) is the recommended treatment. Benzathine penicillin (single intramuscular dose) at 0.6 million units (children aged under 10 years) and 1.2 million units (people aged over 10 years) can be used for patients with suspected clinical treatment failure after azithromycin, or patients who cannot be treated with azithromycin. This treatment will result in complete clinical healing in 95% of cases but patients should be re-examined 4 weeks after receiving the antibiotics.
A review of the historic documents from 1950s shows that over 90 countries and territories were endemic for yaws. Only 14 out of the 90 countries and territories have recent data on yaws based on the routine surveillance system; however, these figures may just be an indication of the presence of the disease and not its full extent. Ghana, Papua New Guinea and the Solomon Islands report over 10 000 cases per year. Ecuador and India appear to have interrupted transmission."
Yellow fever,https://www.who.int/health-topics/yellow-fever,"Yellow fever is a viral disease that is transmitted to humans by the bites of infected mosquitoes. It is prone to epidemics and is preventable with a vaccine.
These day-biting mosquitoes breed around houses (domestic), in forests or jungles (wild), or in both habitats (semi-domestic). Yellow fever is a high-impact, high-threat disease, with a risk of international spread, representing a potential threat to global health security.
There are 3 types of transmission cycles:
Sylvatic (or jungle) yellow fever spreads when monkeys are bitten by wild mosquitoes that pass the virus on to other monkeys and humans.
Intermediate yellow fever spreads when semi-domestic mosquitoes infect both monkeys and people. This is the most common type of outbreak in Africa.
Urban yellow fever can cause large epidemics when infected people introduce the virus into heavily populated areas with high mosquito density and where people have little immunity.
Occasionally, infected travellers have exported cases to countries that are free of yellow fever. However, the disease can only spread easily to a new country if there are mosquito species able to transmit it, specific climatic conditions, and the animal reservoir needed to maintain it.","Yellow fever can present with a wide range of symptoms and severity. Once contracted, the yellow fever virus incubates in the body for 3–6 days. Many people do not experience symptoms, but when these do occur, the most common are fever, muscle pain with prominent backache, headache, loss of appetite, and nausea or vomiting. In most cases, symptoms disappear after 3–4 days.
A small percentage of patients enter a second, more toxic phase within 24 hours of recovering from initial symptoms. High fever returns and several body systems are affected, usually the liver and kidneys.
In this phase, people are likely to develop jaundice (yellowing of the skin and eyes, hence the name yellow fever), dark urine, and abdominal pain with vomiting. Bleeding can occur from the mouth, nose, eyes, or stomach. Half of these patients die within 7–10 days.
Yellow fever is difficult to diagnose, especially during the early stages. More severe cases can be confused with severe malaria, leptospirosis, viral hepatitis (especially fulminant forms), other haemorrhagic fevers, infection with other flaviviruses (such as dengue haemorrhagic fever) and poisoning. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) testing in blood and urine can sometimes detect the virus in early stages of the disease. In later stages, testing to identify antibodies is needed (IgM).","Yellow fever infections can cause serious illness and can be fatal in severe cases. Early supportive treatment in hospitals improves survival rates. There is currently no specific anti-viral drug for yellow fever, but specific care to treat dehydration, fever, and liver and kidney failure improves outcomes. Associated bacterial infections can be treated with antibiotics. Patients need to stay under mosquito nets during the day to limit the risk of spreading to others through mosquito bites.
Vaccination is the single most important measure for preventing yellow fever. The prevention of outbreaks can only be achieved if the majority of the population is immunized. The yellow fever vaccine is safe and affordable, and a single dose provides life-long immunity against the disease. People who recover from yellow fever infection are also protected for life.
Read more about the yellow fever vaccine.
Mosquito control can also help to prevent yellow fever and is vital in situations where vaccination coverage is low or the vaccine is not immediately available. Mosquito control includes eliminating sites where mosquitoes can breed and killing adult mosquitoes and larvae by using insecticides in areas with high mosquito density.
Community involvement through activities, such as cleaning household drains and covering water containers where mosquitoes can breed is an important and effective way to control mosquitoes."
Zika virus disease,https://www.who.int/health-topics/zika-virus-disease,"Zika virus is primarily transmitted by the bite of an infected mosquito
from the
Aedes
genus,
mainly
Aedes aegypti
,
in tropical and subtropical regions.
Aedes
mosquitoes
usually bite during the day, peaking during early morning and late
afternoon/evening. This is the same mosquito that transmits dengue, chikungunya
and yellow fever.
Zika virus is also transmitted from mother to fetus during
pregnancy, through sexual contact, transfusion of blood and blood products, and
organ transplantation.
WHO declared a
public health emergency of international concern
regarding microcephaly, other neurological disorders and Zika virus from February to November 2016. Cases of Zika virus disease declined from 2017 onwards globally; however, Zika virus transmission persists at low levels in several countries in the Americas and in other endemic regions. To date, a total of 89 countries and territories have reported evidence of mosquito transmitted Zika virus infection, however surveillance remains limited globally.
No vaccine is yet available for the prevention or treatment of
Zika virus infection. Development of a Zika vaccine remains an active area of
research
The history of Zika virus","The incubation period (the time from exposure to symptoms) of Zika virus disease is estimated to be 3
–
14 days. The majority of people infected with Zika virus do not develop symptoms.
Symptoms are generally mild including fever, rash, conjunctivitis, muscle and joint pain, malaise, and headache, and usually last for 2
–
7 days.
Complications of Zika virus disease
Zika virus infection during pregnancy is a cause of microcephaly and other congenital abnormalities in the developing fetus and newborn. Zika infection in pregnancy also results in pregnancy complications such as fetal loss, stillbirth, and preterm birth.
Zika virus infection is also a trigger of Guillain-Barré syndrome, neuropathy and myelitis, particularly in adults and older children.
Research is ongoing to investigate the effects of Zika virus infection on pregnancy outcomes, strategies for prevention and control, and effects of infection on other neurological disorders in children and adults.","Protection against mosquito bites during the day and early evening is a key measure to prevent Zika virus infection. Special attention should be given to prevention of mosquito bites among pregnant women, women of reproductive age, and young children.
Personal protection measures include wearing clothing (preferably light-coloured) that covers as much of the body as possible; using physical barriers such as window screens and closed doors and windows; and applying insect repellent to skin or clothing that contains DEET, IR3535 or icaridin according to the product label instructions.
Young children and pregnant women should sleep under mosquito nets if sleeping during the day or early evening.  Travellers and those living in affected areas should take the same basic precautions described above to protect themselves from mosquito bites.
Prevention of sexual transmission of Zika virus
Aedes
mosquitoes breed in small collections of water around homes, schools, and work sites. It is important to eliminate these mosquito breeding sites, including: covering water storage containers, removing standing water in flower pots, and cleaning up trash and used tires. Community initiatives are essential to support local government and public health programs to reduce mosquito breeding sites.  Health authorities may also advise use of larvicides and insecticides to reduce mosquito populations and disease spread.
Vector control operations framework for Zika virus"
